Authors
Chuck Schwartz
Number of Reviews
110

Title
Review for Pokémon the First Movie: Mewtwo Strikes Back (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Pokémon: The First Movie
English Screenplay by Norman J. Grossfeld, Michael Haigney and John
Touhey
with voice direction by Michael Haigney
Original screenplay by Takeshi Shudo
Based on characters created by Satoshi Tajiri
Directed by Kunihiko Yuyama
website: http://www.pokemonthemovie.com
The phenomenon that is Pokémon so outstrips early kidlet addictions such
as Power Rangers or Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles that you should be glad
that the American movie has been totally reedited and aimed at the
insistent low digit kidlet demographic target. Pokémon: The First Movie
is the final result of editing three Japanese vids into a single,
English dubbed movie. What was removed was described to me as a
slaughter sequence in which the Pocket Monster called Mewtwo,
scientifically cloned from the remnants of a long lost Pokémon, Mew,
goes on a bloody killing rampage that would make Kurosawa turn his eyes
away from the screen. Having problems with the concept that Pokémon are
subservient to their human masters puts this monster in such a funk
that, in the original film, it goes on a killing rampage that lasts
close to eight minutes. That's more reference to the Source Material
than I'm supposed to give you but, on the off chance that you come
across any of the bootlegged, subtitled versions of the original
Japanese versions, be very warned that the violence level in the
non-American released is far beyond what any adult would consider
acceptable for single digit kidlets.
That being said, in the American version, Mewtwo still questions his
Reason for Being, but only blows everybody up. No blood or anything that
would warp sensitive young minds. Just a Big Bang, unleashing upon the
Universe something that makes sense only to the properly initiated.
There's no explanation of what Pokémon are, why they are or where they
come from. Nothing about humans training them for battle or the unique
relationship between Ash Ketchum and his `friend' Pikachu. Either you
know what it is, or you sit with only the vaguest comprehension of what
is playing out on screen
Mewtwo's plan is to clone the existing Pokémon into super warriors who
have no inclination to be subservient to the Humans. Afterwards the new
Pokémon will destroy the old and Mewtwo will do his part by wiping out
humankind. The only thing in his way is the original, the very bestest
and mostest powerfulest Mew and a Pokémon battle unlike anything seen
before. The net result is that Mewtwo realizes that fighting is wrong.
He and the rest of the SuperPokémon fly off into the sky, but not before
wiping the memory of their existence out of the minds of the Pokémon and
trainers that witnessed the battle. Net result? The trainers and Pokémon
don't get to keep the knowledge that fighting is bad, and thus can go
off and have more Pokémon battles. Just as they did at the beginning of
the movie. Just as they''ve always done.
Does that strike anyone else as a screwed up message to send to the
kidlets?
The kidlets in the audience, especially the six year old sitting in his
uncle's lap, were happy as clams. They cheered and applauded and, for
the life of me, I can't tell you why. If you've had no exposure to
Pokémon, there's nothing here to widen your horizons. Two years from
now, there'll be something else to hold the next generation of kidlets
in its sway.
Preceding The First Movie is a short called Pikachu's Vacation. This has
something to do with how Pokémon behave when they're free of their human
masters. Beyond that, I was totally lost.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
IN SHORT: Killer comedy. Killer creepshow. Killer indie arthouse flick.
As always, no comparison is made to the Source Material.
It will probably help your appreciation of American Psycho if you hit
the ground running during the 1980s, or were close to the kind of yuppie
mentality that was oppressive during those days -- kidlets just out of
college making way too much money and spending that cash freely and
openly on status stuff. The right kind of suit, tie, eyeglass frame,
luggage and so forth. All flash and little substance. The stereotype
that generated catcalls of "DIE YUPPIE SCUM DIE!" (Understand here that
Cranky was a director for NBC back in them days, making way too much
money at way too young an age . . .
.. . . but good God, it was nothing like the Wall Street buttholes that
are center stage in American Psycho.)
Perhaps it's a good thing there's a whole lot of breathing room between
now and then. That makes this story of a serial killer to whom DIE
YUPPIE SCUM DIE is a manifestation of incredible self-hatred and/or
guilt  -- and/or just another career choice  all the more bearable.
American Psycho so perfectly recreates that 80s Yuppie bullshit that,
despite the fact that it's been well publicized as being about a serial
killer, the film is very funny. From the title credits on out, where
what appear to be droplets of blood fall across a virgin white screen,
this flick is killer funny. Four lookalike Yuppie's drop their platinum
cards to split the dinner check at an ever so trendy restaurant. Their
conversation consist of vainglorious egocentric boasts, one after
another (when they're not dissing anyone not like them, or backstabbing
fellow employees at the Wall Street firms where they work)
Center of the story is Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale), a Wall Street
type working for Dad, making insane amounts of money and doing very
little obvious work. When in the process of picking up a model type at a
trendy club, Bateman  is asked what line he's in. "Murders and
Acquisitions," he says, quite honestly. "Mergers and Acquisitions" is
what everyone hears. That's the perfect slam on 80s yuppie-dom. If it
ain't about the green, it ain't never gonna be seen on the internal
radar. Welcome to the morgue . . .
Bateman carefully details for us every aspect of his life, from the
number of stomach crunches he can do to the kind of exfoliant he uses to
keep his skin looking young and fresh. He lives in a world where the
printing on a business card speaks volumes. Where he doesn't mind taking
his sexual fantasies out on street hookers and "high class" call girls,
sometimes two at a time. Where he believes that his fiancee Evelyn
Williams (Reese Witherspoon) is probably having an affair, which is all
right 'cuz he's sleeping with her zonked to the gills best friend
Courtney (Samantha Mathis). There's something perversely funny about all
of this, which makes American Psycho a very funny movie.
Just when you begin to get the comfortable with the notion that the
"Psycho" of the title refers only to a headcase slash nutjob, out comes
a knife and a homeless man goes down for the count. Bateman doesn't
restrict his kills to the anonymous street folk, however. One side
effect of yuppie-dom is that everyone tended to look alike . . . and
Bateman does not like being confused for someone higher on the corporate
food chain. His bloodlust is such that he doesn't mind taking out people
in his own circle. Prior to the upper-class kills, Bateman spouts like a
music critic, analyzing the complexities and deep meanings in songs by
Phil Collins and Whitney Houston -- artists disdained by the general 80s
Yuppie establishment (even as we bought the CDs and hid them under the
mattress). When Bateman goes into his spiel, well, certain characters
you'll meet you won't want to see snuffed. Mary Harron's direction
evokes some unbearable tension, even as the modus operandi elevates from
knife to ax to industrial strength construction equipment, and so on.
You know in your guts that it's just a matter of time before the killing
spree catches up to Bateman. When it does; let's just say that "Psycho"
has a lot of meanings, all of which you may find yourself discussing
after the fact. Also of note in the cast are Chloe Sevigny as Bateman's
secretary Jean and Jared Leto as Paul Allen, one of those other yuppies
who disappears from view. A private detective (Willem DaFoe) comes a
calling. It's just a question of whether he's in the case to find a
killer, or if he's in the case to protect the upper-upper-class from
embarrassment in the New York Post.
There's a third alternative answer to this equation . . . but that would
be telling.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to American Psycho, he would have
paid...
Cranky bought in whole hog. American Psycho is so perfect for the
arthouse circuit that it may not break out of that after the first week.
As written, if you don't lock into the period, you may not find much to
laugh about and, in that case, it's a long time until you get to the
unpleasant parts.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Dog Park (1998)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Dog Park
Rated [R], 90 minutes
Starring Luke Wilson, Natasha Henstridge, Janeane Garofalo, Kathleen
Robertson, Gordon Currie, Amie Carey and Mark McKinney
Written and Directed by Bruce McCulloch
IN SHORT: A sweet little nothing of a movie.
Dog Park comes from the pen of Kids in the Hall founding member Bruce
McCulloch. It is a fairly pleasant piece of writing, with not much to
recommend or diss it, and the hardest kind of review to write. The low
rating is not an indicator of a bad movie (and if you haven't learned
how this system works, click">http://www.crankycritic.com/history.html">click here), just of
a very small movie that will probably vanish fairly quickly. The story
is OK. The performances are OK. Production values are definitely low
budget but suitable to the story.
Simply, Dog Park is just OK. Nothing awful. Nothing special. Just OK.
Welcome to the world of Toronto dog parks, where we meet a population of
predominantly single thirtysomethings who know each other by the names
of the dogs they take there for exercise. New to the single crowd is
Andy (Luke Wilson), who hasn't been without a partner of some kind since
eighth grade but has been freshly dumped by Cheryl (Kathleen Robertson)
for a pink haired (sometimes blue haired) punk named Trevor (Gordon
Currie). Stuck in between is their dog Mogley, who has "not been the
same" since he's got a front row seat watching his "mom" getting
shtupped by a different "dad". The solution is to bring Mogley to a
doggie shrink Dr. Cavan (Mark McKinney) for therapy.
Dining alone in a singles bar, Andy inadvertantly catches the eye of
Lorna (Natasha Henstridge), herself riding solo for the first time in a
long whiles. One sex-less rendezvous later, Andy is smitten and Lorna is
looking for a way out. Lorna is advised in her dating life by co-worker
Rachel (Amie Carey). Andy is similarly advised by the only couple in our
story, Jeri (Janeane Garofalo) and her virtual husband Jeff (McCulloch).
Lest you think all these folk have in common is their love of dogs, no,
they are all links in the same dating chain -- a concept explained one
way by Rachel but demonstrated in a different way as you see how this
plays out.
The positive is that McCulloch presents us with a full set of relatively
normal people. It would have been easy to make 'em all dog geeks,
obsessed with their puppies to the exclusion of all else, but his focus
seems to be what happens to those of us who aren't bound by ball and
chain at the age when we should be making babies. The true geek,
McKinney's doctor character, shows an obsession that has ravaged his own
family, wife and two kidlets. McKinney's performance, he's also a member
of the Kids in the Hall, is one of the few sparks in this otherwise
emotionally steady and mildly amusing story.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Dog Park, he would have paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Ready to Rumble (2000)
IN SHORT: You will laugh until it hurts. Or hurt until you laugh.
There is no question about it, David Arquette is one very starange dude.
he's strange when he does talk show. He's very strange in his 1-800
telephone ads. But he's off the charts as Gordie Biggs, son of and
brother of cops, who faces certain redneck cop doom in his hometown of
Lusk, Wyoming. He resists wearing the badge, instead driving a septic
tank with best buddy Sean Dawkins (Scott Caan) at his side.
Like lots of almost adults facing years of dreary hell in the only life
available to them, Gordie and Sean find a fantasy outlet to take away
the pain and make it all better. [actually, with twenty minutes or so of
jokes about Number Two, the pain was pretty much inflicted on these old
reviewers bones]. Not drugs. Not sex. Something far more important on
the vast scale of things cosmic. The eternal battle of good versus evil,
Order versus Chaos, Blood and Sweat versus Pernicious Evil brought about
by lying, cheating and distracting the referees. Yes, the merger of Ted
Turner and Time Warner has led us down the path to a movie starring
World Championship Wrestling, called Ready To Rumble, which surely is as
close a representation of Hell as anything Cranky has ever sat through .
.. .
Well, it felt that way for the first twenty minutes, in which we made
the observation that if Bill and Ted had the intelligence of Beavis and
Butt-head, they would be Sean and Gordy, who find the Meaning of Life in
their quest to restore the greatest WCW wrester of all, Jimmy King
(Oliver Platt) to his throne as heavyweight champion of the WCW. In
their way is Titus Sinclair (Joe Pantoliano), evil mastermind of the
WCW, and every wrestling actor who ever dreamed of wearing the belt,
which means appearances by just about everyone you see on WCW Monday
Night Nitro. Except Hulk Hogan.
Ready to Rumble is no great film, but it is a bust a gut funny piece of
[deleted]. One that will go down in the anals of film comedy (its heroes
suck out port-a-potties) as a jaw dropper stinker that keeps coming back
at you, like a bad bit o' beef, until you have no choice but to roll
over and cackle, guffaw, chuckle, grimace, shudder, or, failing that,
apologize profusely to your date (or all of the above).
Yep, it's American Pie all over again. From director Brian Robbins (of
Varsity Blues, which I liked) and Steven Brill, the writer of
Heavyweights (Cranky's 6 year old nephew's favorite film of all time)
and Mighty Ducks One Two and Three comes a movie which bombards you with
joke after joke until you just can't stand it no more. Teenlets will eat
this stuff up from the word go. Old farts like Cranky were writhing in
pain Ready to Rumble then unleashes the greatest gag of all . . .
Martin Landau in the role of a retired wrestler whose skills and
attitude are such that he could turn Sid Vicious (whoever) into a whiny
little girly man.
OK that's it. Three taps and I give. Ready to Rumble is funny. Once it
gets past the dumb jokes and brings in the inevitable sex element, in
the persona of Nitro Girl Sasha (Rose McGowan), it gets even funnier.
Once you fall into the gaping maw of jokes it will chomp you up and spit
out an exhausted, laughed out mess.
Ready to Rumble is buffoonery stretched to the limit, culminating in a
three cage wrestling death match, in which the sound levels on the
special effects are pushed up to ear cracking levels. Professional
Wrestling may be "fake" but that doesn't stop these mammoth-men from
hurting each other, which happens in "real life" and in this flick and,
all the while, they keep cracking jokes.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Ready to Rumble, he would have
paid...
Yep, it's a dateflick (lighten up, it's just a movie). Best guide I can
give is that, if you're in to WCW or WWF right now, or have been and
remember flicks like Bill and Ted or or the Beavis and Butt-Head stuff
with affection, you'll probably piss yourself laughing at Ready To
Rumble
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Light It Up (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Light  it Up
Rated  [R], 98 minutes
Starring Usher Raymond, Rosario Dawson, Robert Ri'chard, Clifton
Collins,  Jr., Fredro Starr, Sara Gilbert, Judd Nelson and Forest
Whitaker,  Vanessa L. Williams and Glynn Turman Screenplay and Directed
by Craig Bolotin
website: www.foxmovies.com/lightitup
Someone must have thought this was a good idea: Take half a dozen inner
city kidlets, have one of 'em accidentally shoot a cop and then hold
said wounded Officer hostage while they make demands for better school
conditions and bond as human beings.
I guess if you come from a place where your mindset is that the police
are the enemy, regardless of guilt or innocence or accident or
deliberate intention, then this thing will make sense to you. Cranky
doesn't come from that place.
The High School is in Queens, New York. The area holds a full run of
races and the school itself is far beyond habitable. No heat. Broken
windows in the middle of winter. No new textbooks. A veritable
educational hell on earth. When the one teacher who gives a damn (Judd
Nelson) is pushed to the limit he takes his class off campus, to a warm
diner, 'cuz every other habitable extra-curricular area in the school is
already full. This action, thanks to a plot device we won't tell, gets
the man suspended. The students stage a protest in the principal's
office (Glenn Turman as the stressed out principal, more concerned with
appearance and his forthcoming pension) and when the on campus cop is
called in to break the protest up an incomprehensible set of
circumstances leads one of the kids to shoot the cop (Forest Whitaker).
What makes the circumstances incomprehensible is properly explained down
the line. What makes it impossible for me to be sympathetic, even to
suspend any kind of belief system for 90 minutes, is that in a hall full
of witnesses, an accidental shooting is just that. That five of the six
kidlets can look at a wounded cop and decided that he isn't hurt so bad
is beyond me. The decision to hold the cop hostage so that the kidlets
can make demands for improvements in the school might make sense if you
can buy into the thought processes, but I can't.
The six kidlets: a sports star (Usher Raymond), a hustler (Clifton
Collins Jr.), a gangsta (Fredro Starr), a artist (Robert Ri'Chard), a
smart girl on the Student Council (Rosario Dawson), and a pregnant white
kid with attitude (Sara Gilbert). Vanessa L. Williams plays the
negotiator who is, ultimately, helpless and the film moves towards the
inevitable.
Those that survive get happy endings. Those of us who sat through a
preview of Light It Up stared at the screen wondering how the hell we
were going to write this thing up without sounding racist. From an
analytical point of view, writer/ director Craig Bolotin follows the
path it sets out for itself. Some of the dialog is awful. All of the
characters fill some sort of stereotype.
The idea that our society has reached a point where this kind of story
idea is possible makes me want to scream. You can argue that Light It Up
brings up issues. I'll argue back that it promotes an absolutely
despicable treatment of human beings.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Light It up, he would have paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Bringing Out The Dead
Rated [R], [110] minutes
Starring Nicolas Cage, Patricia Arquette, John Goodman, Ving Rhames, Tom
Sizemore
Screenplay by Paul Schrader
Based on the novel by Joe Connelly
Directed by Martin Scorsese
website:www.bringingoutthedead.com
As always, we don't compare to Source Material.
Nicolas Cage has so perfected the hang-dog, wasted, puppy-eyed, lost in
his own body look that it would be really, really nice if he did
something else for a change. After five years as an Emergency Medical
Technician, EMT for short, Frank Pierce (Cage) is doing just about
everything he can to get his ass busted off the job. His gig has turned
into an endless rut of cardiac failures and drug overdoses. He can't
remember the last time he saved a call. His sleep isn't restful and he's
haunted by the ghostly face of Rose, a girl he accidentally helped to
kill in the earliest days of his career. Pierce is a man who has hit
bottom so hard, well, we've seen Cage do it before. . .
The only distraction from what has become a mind-numbing, soul
destroying career is Mary (Patricia Arquette), daughter of yet another
cardiac arrest. Mary has got some drug-taking backstory which adds a
couple extra interesting actors of supporting stature -- Marc Antony
plays Noel, a brain damaged street loon, said damage caused by an
enforcer named Tiger, employee of Stress Reduction Specialist (ie. drug
dealer) Cliff Curtis (Cy Coates), a real slick dude -- but she's another
wrecked soul and the start of their "relationship" has all the spark of
a wet match.
Over the course of two plus days of the story, three different partners
comment on Pierce's attraction to Mary and his obvious problems with the
job. Larry's (John Goodman) is the partner who dreams of Captain bars
and "retirement" to a different unit in the suburbs of Long Island; he
faces his shift with utter indifference, to keep the pain away. Marcus
(Ving Rhames, sporting a full head of hair for a change), the brightest
spark in the entire flick, is having the time of his life saving souls
and preaching to the same Souls as a counterpoint to the daily grind of
seeing the destitute, drug addicted, and frail old folk that are the
residents of his route. His stern warning about getting involved with
the daughter of a call follows the more important rule number one, don't
get emotionally attached to the work, ever. Which, of course, is
Pierce's problem. Partner number three, Tom Walls (Tom Sizemore) is in
the game for the blood, regardless of the cause. If he's got to beat up
on some poor shnook, mentally or physically, to get the job done, so be
it.
If you want to make a movie which pushes the limits of acceptable
behavior in favor of moving the story along, it would be greatly helpful
if there was a minimum of material that the audience can connect to, to
help us believe in the character that is at the center of the story. The
supporting characters, from Rhames on down, are the only elements that
bring a feeling of "real-ness" to the story. Nicolas Cage's recurring
hang-dog looks are no substitute for character development. His
character's ups and downs are so arbitrary that it is inconceivable that
any job supervisor would look the other way and allow the man to climb
behind the wheel. Yet, that is exactly what happens as the coming
crackup is pointedly ignored ("I'll fire you tomorrow!") by a captain
who barks like a dog.
Director Martin Scorsese has brought to the screen, I'm guessing,
everything he knows about visual story telling. There are lovely
slow-speed shutter shots where headlights blur into streaks of light;
super-focused overhead shots of the speeding EMS truck and other
visually impressive elements. Problem is, beautiful stuff doesn't
necessarily have soul, and Cage's character is so dead on his feet that
his redemption, when it comes, doesn't bring anything but a sigh of
relief from the audience that the film is finally over. At a relatively
short 110 minutes, the two plus days shown on screen feel like three
months.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Bringing Out The Dead, he would have
paid...
Midweek rental level, solely for Goodman and Rhames and the soundtrack.
Cranky guesses that way too much money was spent on clearing the rights
for songs by the Stones, Bob Marley, The Clash, Joe Jackson and more,
'cuz they intrude with distracting regularity. In a serious story, this
trivial stuff shouldn't draw attention to itself. It does.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Love's Labour's Lost (2000)
Love's Labour's Lost
Rated [PG], 95 minutes
Starring Kenneth Branagh, Alicia Silverstone and Nathan Lane
Based on the play by William Shakespeare
Adapted and Directed by Kenneth Branagh
website: www.miramax.com
IN SHORT: An all-singing, all-dancing, all-sensational revamp of a play
first staged in 1596.
As I've written it before, you could put Shakespeare's words through a
meat grinder, add an egg and some bread crumbs, whack it into palatable
little meat loafs and serve with a nice chianti and you still would have
to double over backwards to do serious harm to his stories. That's why
said stories still work four hundred plus years later. It's also a
matter of fact that the full text of his plays can take hours to unfurl,
when orated from the stage (or screen. Rent Kenneth Branagh's uncut
Hamlet if you want to test your endurance levels -- and we liked KB's
version, btw). So here we have Love's Labour's Lost, Branagh's audacious
take on one of Shakespeare's simplest stories; his version owing as much
to vaudeville and the Marx Brothers as it does to certain stylish movies
of the 1930's and 40's.
What Branagh does to Shakespeare is something that is so simple, and
simply outrageous that we hunkered down to an early morning screening
'cuz we had to see his adaptation of Love's Labour's Lost with fresh
eyes. Now, remember that we don't compare to Source Material, not that
our knowledge of Shakespeare extends very far, which allows us to avoid
the purist view which may liken Branagh's take as the first sign of
Armageddon. It's not.
Like Richard III a couple of years back, LLL is set in the World War II
time period, here with France preparing for war. In the neighboring
country of Navarre, the King (Alessandro Nivola) has decided that war is
for sissies and has issued a proclamation that all men of his kingdom;
in this case specifically himself and his three closest courtiers, shall
devote themselves to intellectual study and spiritual enhancement. This
means a full day's fast each week, food every other day, and only three
hours of rest before returning to their study of all things wise and
wonderful.
Oh, one more thing. No women. Not to talk to, to consort with, to wine
and/or dine and/or ... you know ... for three years. Penalties for
breaking their solemn vows include having your tongue ripped out, or
more major stuff. And while, Longaville (Matthew Lillard) and Dumaine
(Adrian Lester) acknowledge their Word of Honor by signing their names
to the Proclamation, Berowne (Kenneth Branagh) hesitates, pointing out
that "the Princess of France is an intelligent woman and you may need to
negotiate treaties with her" (I'm paraphrasing badly), so a lack of
tongue could prove to be a problem. Besides, he sings to the King while
cueing an offscreen orchestra, "I'd Rather Charleston". Yes, sings. The
women will eventually respond (I won't dance. Don't Ask Me) as the men
find themselves smitten by the Princess (Alicia Silverstone) and her
Court (Emily Mortimer, Carmen Ejogo and Natascha McElhone). Love's
Labour's Lost is a randy comedy where the boys must sneakily communicate
with the girls -- their chosen messenger is an illiterate clown named
Costard (Nathan Lane, mixing Harpo Marx and Senor Wences into one
racoon-coated personage) who delivers the right letters to the wrong
people -- which evolves into a bittersweet romance mode as the
inevitable war reaches the border of Navarre.
Until that point, though, the flick is packed with just about every song
worth remembering from any Fred and Ginger movie. The songs by George
and Ira Gershwin, Irving Berlin and Cole Porter, among the best known
names all take the place of pages of dialog that has been excised. All
of 'em, unlike most musicals, fit with their placement and move the
story along. If you're old enough to know what came before rock 'n'
roll, there's not a dud song in the bunch. What remains, according to
the notes, is about 30% of the original play and, frankly, had I not
read that in black and white I wouldn't have known it.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Love's Labour's Lost, he would have
paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Lucie Aubrac (1997)
In French, with subtitles. Based on the book Outwitting the Gestapo by
Lucie Aubrac.
A fact of life of the CrankyCritic.com boards is that there is little
interest in foreign films. Long time readers know that Cranky still sees
and recommends 'em when they strike me as something above average. Well,
here we go again.
The WWII movies we've seen in the last year or so, like many of the
black and white John Wayne starrers Cranky grew up on (on teevee, I'm
not that old) tend to concentrate on battles or the bonds formed by
soldiers because of those battles. How nice then that we see a movie
about the folk who fought the battle back home, and still had the
opportunity to live "normal" lives -- to the extent that you could
assuming that the Nazis who overran your country allowed it. The country
is France. The stars of the story are members of the French Resistance
and most of what you see on the big screen actually happened.
Allow me to digress: back in my film school days the screenwriting
teacher was fond of saying that all great stories are love stories. She
was right. In this film, as you would expect, the Nazis are the bad guys
and the Resistance are the good guys. Central to the story is Lucie
Aubrac (Carole Bouquet) and her husband Raymond (Daniel Auteuil) and her
year-plus old son Jean-Pierre (Maxime Henry), nicknamed Boo-Boo. It is
1943 in the city of Lyons in what is called the Southern Zone. The
government which rules the zone is more collaborationist (they would say
realistic) than patriotic and the Nazi grip is noticeably, but not much,
looser. The Aubracs follow leader in exile Charles DeGaulle, who directs
their efforts via coded broadcasts from the BBC in London. These
"terrorists" are particularly effective, as is seen in the opening
sequence of the film and escaping from the clutches of the French police
is as much an intellectual exercise as a legal challenge.
But . . . and you knew there was a but coming, right? you can only
change your location and identity a couple of time, evade the jaws of
tyranny once or twice before they come snapping down on you. When they
do, do you choose saving your country or saving the ones you love? The
few members of the Resistance that you'll come to know all make
different choices, and you can argue them over coffee afterwards. In a
forged identity in which he is single, Raymond must deny all knowledge
of the woman he loves; to do so saves her skin and that of the few
freedom fighters still on the loose. But the Gestapo has figured out who
he really is, and have sentenced the man to death. For Lucie, saving her
husband preserves the fragile remnants of Resistance leadership in the
Southern Zone and more important, saves her husband. This desire to have
her cake and eat it too leads to some compelling and very dramatic
scenes on the big screen, as she coordinates efforts to free her man
before his date with the executioner.
This small story of Lucie Aubrac within the big story of "The Big One"
is a fine one, well acted and well told in a fairly matter of fact
style. One subplot involves the question of what happened to the Jews of
France, but rather than being an acknowledgment of the Holocaust, it
presents a most interesting twist to the main story, which I'll leave
you to discover on your own. Blink and you'll also miss the fact that
one of the Gestapo officers in the story is the notorious Klaus Barbie.
If you don't know who Barbie was or what he did, you won't miss much in
terms of the main story. It's just an extra layer of icing on the cake
of a beautifully put together script.
And, being a French film, the woman is gorgeous and her guy is not. Ah,
if only real life were really that way (said all the single male critics
on the way out of the screening room. This one included.) 
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Lucie Aubrac, he would have paid...
The subtitles don't get in the way of the story. That's important. The
story is great and the stuff I didn't tell you makes it even greater.
Lucie Aubrac is highly recommended.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland, The (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland
Rated  [G]
Starring elmo, Mandy Patinkin, Vanessa Williams
Story by Mitchell Kriegman
Screenplay by Kriegman and Joseph Mazzarino
Directed by Gary Halvorson
website: http://www.sony.com/elmo
IN SHORT: The best li'l kidflick of the year.
And, yes, I know that kids past the age of five or so think Elmo is for
"babies". We'll get to the guts of the flick in a second. For those of
us to whom the Muppets of Sesame Street (or otherwise) were our teevee
pals growing up, and we're talking over 25 years of growing kidlets
here, Elmo in Grouchland  makes everything complete in the Sesame Street
Universe.
Unless something to the contrary has happened on Sesame Street (which I
don't watch), Bert and Ernie were retired as active characters when Jim
Henson died a number of years ago. The first thing you see in Elmo is
the pair, directly addressing the audience -- a brilliant idea by
screenwriters Mitchel Kriegman and Joseph Mazzarino, all of whom seem
aware that kidlets have limited attention spans and love to bother their
parents with questions throughout any movie they watch. Well, Bert and
Ernie are just like the kids, Bert moreso, and every couple of minutes
the film stops and Bert comes frantically into frame, wondering what is
happening and why. Ernie plays parent, the pair exit and the film moves
on. More important, they make the viewing experience an interactive one,
asking the kids to yell at the screen, counting down the timing strip
that precedes every film. It's a great idea, and is used several times
during the film.
Elmo is, after all, a li'l monster who communicates on a one to one
basis with his audience. He's polite but extremely self centered (think
of a terrible two year old screaming MINE! MINE! MINE!) which has always
annoyed the heck out of me on the small screen. On the big screen, it's
not so bad.
Elmo loves his blanket (didn't we all??) which seems to have a life of
its own. Possessive li'l monster that he is, he gets annoyed when his
friend Zoe wants to cuddle with blankie. Push comes to shove, the
blanket tears (oh! the horror!) and before you know it Elmo is climbing
into Oscar the Grouch's garbage can to get it back. But it's not a trash
can, it's a portal to another place called Grouchland populated by more
of Oscar's kind all of whom live in fear of the monstrous Huxley (Mandy
Patinkin), who covets everything he sees. Which includes the blanket.
Sure, other residents of Sesame Street take the trip down the can to try
and help Elmo. The joy here is the appearance of dozens of new
characters and non-stop jokes that work for both kidlets and parents.
Aided by Grizzy Grouch (Stephanie D'Abruzzo), Elmo must climb Mount
Pickanose to Huxley's Castle, avoid a giant chicken and an "ultimate
test" by the luscious Vanessa Williams as the Queen of the Dump. The
kidlets were yelling at the screen to help the Red One (though they got
help from the surround soundtrack) and this grownup couldn't believe
what a blast it all was. And lots of Bert and Ernie. Oh happy happy joy
joy!
Lest I forget, a tip of the hat to the Muppet Players: Kevin Clash
(Elmo), Carroll Spinney (Big Bird and Oscar), Martin P. Robinson (Telly
Monster), Frank Oz (Bert, Grover, Cookie Monster), Fran Brill (Zoe),
Steve Whitmire (Ernie), Jerry Nelson (The Count). First time bigscreen
director Gary Halvorson does a bang up job keeping everything moving
quickly (but not too quickly -- us adults are a lot slower than the
kidlets), dropping in a musical nod to STOMP! and concentrating more on
story and muppets, than on songs and cameos as have other Muppet flicks.
Technically, this can't be called a "Muppet" movie, which has something
to do with trademarks and creative rights and the original deal made
between Henson and the Children's Television Workshop. Luckily, I can
call Elmo what it is. It's the best Muppet movie since The Muppet Movie.
And you know how almost every kidlet flick gets the rental rating 'cuz
that's where they all wind up? Think again.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Adventures of Elmo in
Grouchland, he would have paid...
Gee. I haven't thought about my blankie in years . . .
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
"Good morning Mr. Hunt (Tom Cruise). The picture you see is a Dr.
Nekhorvich (Rade Sherbedgia) of Biocyte Pharmaceuticals. Dr. Nekhorvich
was killed in a plane crash while on his way to deliver something to us.
We don't know what but it's really dangerous. IM agent Sean Ambrose
(Dougray Scott) was on the plane, too, and we haven't found the body.
We're not sure where he is, if he's screwed us, or exactly what your
mission is, other than to stop something really nasty from happening.
We're sure you'll figure it out along the way. Oh, you can only use two
agents and you must include a civilian thief named Nyah Hall (Thandie
Newton) on the team. We know we're not supposed to configure your team,
but we can discuss that when you come over and discuss the matter in
person with us (Anthony Hopkins). If you or any member of you IM team
should be caught or killed, yada yada yada. Have a nice day."
With all the baggage of the past buried and forgotten, John Woo takes up
the director's reigns, overseeing the one-man strike force that is Ethan
Hunt, leader of the Impossible Mission "team," in Mission: Impossible 2.
Woo, whose visual sense can make a boy giddy, lets loose with both
barrels and all the visual fireworks he can put on the big screen.
That's a good thing 'cuz the M:I2 script stinks. Like its big screen
predecessor this flick has very little in common with the television
series it is based upon, other than a self-destructing set of
instructions and characters pulling rubber mask disguises off their
faces. We don't compare to Source Material. Fans of the series can
figure out what's different from the paragraph above.
Then again, it's summertime, when all most of us want out of a movie is
onscreen fireworks and a reason to plunge our mitts into the
extra-large-super-sized popcorn up to our elbows. M:I2 delivers that in
spades, refusing to cut fight scenes that run on too long, resorting to
makeup gimmicks instead of developing a great story and, in short,
refusing to roll over and play dead when its story was done. It's almost
as if the writers and Woo sat down and figured out what would be really
cool to do and which really cool bits would be even cooler if shot in
slow motion, and then wrote the script around them. That means a
motorcycle duel, a half naked Cruise on a rock and the gun in the sand
bits that are in the teevee commercial, and a wee bit of "aerobatic
insanity" that reprises something in the last flick and which had the
audience happily giggling.
Absolutely giddy. Myself included. I told you.
If you're a novice to the concept, the IM is a secret force that
manipulates situations to bring about conclusions that punish the evil
guys and ensure that truth, justice and the American way win out. In
this case, it's the story of one renegade agent and his possession of an
artificially created strain of influenza that could devastate the world.
The "good" IM team -- our heroes include Ving Rhames, the only returnee
from M:I1 and John Polson as an almost utterly dispensable guy with an
Australian accent, useful since the film is set in Australia -- must
track and destroy another -- Richard Roxbury is the muscle on bad guy
Ambrose's side -- using the civilian and a small tracking device
implanted in Newton's ankle, as bait. The notion of one IM team against
another one is a good one. The problem is that one team leader knows all
about the moves of the other, and not vice versa. The bad guys also have
all the IM technology, so how they miss the tracking device is news to
me.
 No, it's not. It's scriptwriters ignoring the obvious. It's
scriptwriters ignoring what they've written earlier in the script. But,
just as in the last flick, this series is not so much about the story as
it is about Ethan Hunt, $20 million dollar action figure. That being the
case, Tom Cruise is absolute dynamite in black clothing. He makes a
great John Woo movie action toy. The action sequences, as in everything
John Woo does, are the reason to lay out hard cash to see the flick.
Bullets fly. Explosions, um, explode. Cruise does unbelievable physical
things believably and gets a love interest to boot. So the hell with
history and any requirement of logic in the script.
Buy the extra big popcorn and stick to the small soda. This sequel is
less complicated than the last one, but if you have to make a quick run,
you'll still miss something important.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Mission: Impossible 2, he would have
paid...
It's a summertime, popcorn dateflick. All sweetener and no nutritional
value at all.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Basket, The (1999)
IN SHORT: Wholesome story with a deadly slow pace
And sometimes the name in the trademark works against me . . .
Here in the urban jungle of New York City we have no problem with the
desires of grownups on the other coast who wish to make a old-fashioned
"family" movie. One with no sex or swearing, gratuitous nudity or
violence. What they produced is called The Basket, and it is all that
they wanted. That it took four writers and a "script consultant" to get
it into shape is the film's undoing, for any family with more than a
passing acquaintance with a Sony Playstation or Nintendo console. It all
comes down to what kind of kids you've got: if they're old enough that
they can sit still and pay attention to a slow moving story (my ten year
old niece could), you're fine. If they can't (my seven year old nephew)
you're gonna have a very restive kidlet on your hands.
My gut reaction is that the creators were so determined to write
traditional family values into the film, the kind that you can sit
around with your kids and discuss afterwards, that they failed to relax
enough to let the story and their cast do that work for them. It's a
good story, too...
The setting is Waterville, Washington state in the waning days of World
War I. The war is not an abstraction to this rural town. Ben Emery
(Elwon Bakly) has come back from France missing a leg and his father
Nicholas (Jock MacDonald) and brother Nathan Emery (Brian Skala) carry a
nasty hate towards all things German; Pastor Simms (Tony Lincoln) has
adopted Helmut (Robert Karl Burke) and Birgitta (Amber Willenborg),
German children whose parents were killed by American troops. All the
kids, regardless of age, are in the same school classroom, just brimming
with all that war driven racism and hatred.
The new teacher in town is Martin Conlon (Peter Coyote), who has come
from Boston carrying a Victrola and a basketball and a nasty secret.
With the Victrola, he uses a German opera recording to teach -- which
alternately pisses off half the town 'cuz it's a German opera and
enthralls the other half, 'cuz the story is intriguing. With the ball,
he teaches the kids the relatively new sport of basketball, hoping to
inspire cooperation. Both work against Helmut, because he can translate
the opera for the class and because he is small, the five larger boys in
the school can keep him off the team. So Helmut decides to teach himself
how to play and his sister pawns an emotionally priceless locket to help
buy a ball.
The other story involves the need to raise $500 for a downpayment on a
harvester tractor that can be shared by the farmers of the town. Conlon
enters his team in a match with the "professional" Spokane Spartans
(undefeated in 70 straight games) hoping to win the cash prize,
coincidentally $500. All the while Bessie Emery (Karen Allen) is trying
to hold her family together as son Tom Emery (Eric Dane) has fallen for
Birgitta, with all that entails.
As you make your way through the film, it's as if you could see a
checklist of important points: hatred is bad; racism is bad; helping out
is good; tolerance is good and so on. We applaud all of that. The
problem is that as The Basket builds towards its big finale, its
dedication to making the little points keep the story from building the
dramatic elements to make the ending work as the thrilling, life
enhancing moment it was meant to be. That ending involves shady friends
of the teacher and the 1918 equivalent of the Immigration Service. The
emphasis that should have been placed on those two factors isn't there.
The dramatic impact of the third act of the movie is thus diluted. Too
bad.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Basket, he would have paid...
which is rental level and not a diss on the film at all. If your kids
can sit still, go to the theater. If not, rent and discuss with the
kidlets after. That way the restive ones can work through a piece at a
time.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Sunshine (1999)
IN SHORT: Ralph Fiennes finely acting in yet another epic . . .
An epic tale of five generations of (what begins as) a Jewish family in
the heart of the Austro-Hungarian Empire, writer/director Istvan Szabo's
Sunshine allows star Ralph Fiennes to flex his acting muscles as he
plays three separate roles as a hundred years of time rolls endlessly
across the big screen. With its three hour running time, two thoughts
may flow through your heads...
1) if it's so good, why isn't it being held until November?, and
2) if the air conditioner is broken, three hours in a cool theater is
better than a hundred and twelve degrees in the shade . . .
Both thoughts are legit and both make it sound as if Sunshine is an
utter bomb, which it is not. It is, actually, a splendidly acted and
dazzling-to-watch two hours of film, recreating a world that hasn't
existed in almost a century. The problem is that this two hour wonder is
followed by a third, which essentially kills all the fun. But, says the
film student inside, historical epics aren't supposed to be fun!, to
which I reply that I would rather be left wanting to see more, than to
walk away without a positive, spirit enhancing conclusion to the piece
-- which Sunshine tries to deliver and doesn't.
Sunshine is the story of the family Sonnenschein, whose patriarch
Emmanuel (David De Keyser) made his fortune peddling an herbal tonic,
brand-named "Sunshine," from a pack on his back. Once successful and
established, with a factory cranking out his product and its recipe
secreted inside a hidden notebook, Emmanuel takes a wife and raises his
family. Gustave (James Frain) and Ignatz (Fiennes) are his pride and
joys. Valerie (Jennifer Ehle), an orphaned cousin on his wife's side, is
also raised as a sister to the boys. The family is nearly split in two
by political affiliations and the declared love of Ignatz and his
cousin, who marry despite "their" father's wishes. Ignatz, an
incorruptible judge, changes his name to "Sors" for political reasons --
no obvious Jews are allowed government -- and rises higher and higher in
the Empire, until historical events shuffle him off the screen. Gustave
flees to France, to be seen later, and Valerie raises her son Adam
(again, Fiennes), who becomes a champion fencer and a Gold Medal
recipient on the Hungarian Olympic team in Berlin.
To do so, Adam must turn his back on his religion and become a Roman
Catholic. In doing so, he meets his also-to-be-converted wife Hannah
(Molly Parker) and fathers a son, Ivan (again, Fiennes). Then comes The
Big One, where conversion and/or status in the country cannot protect
everyone in the family from doom. All of this, the epic tale of a
family's rise and fall and redemption and survival, is enough.
Once you get past the War (you'll hear a crowd chanting "Stalin! Stalin!
Stalin!") we suggest you pack up and leave, wanting more. If you wish to
sit through the Communist era, prepare to emerge like a balloon that has
deflated. It isn't that Sunshine fails here, it is just that the film
(perhaps all too accurately) portrays a love-less, joy-less, and fully
hypocritical time. Ivan and the remains of his family, including his
grandmother Valerie (Rosemary Harris) a returned uncle Gustave (John
Neville) must survive under Communism. Ivan must deal with his
experience in the camps and can never let the war go; his job is to hunt
down the traitors, first from the war and then the witchhunt of the
Stalinist purges. Important characters in this stage include William
Hurt as Ivan's boss and Deborah Kara Unger as the wife of a connected
party. For Ivan and his family this era, called "The Great Diminishing"
by Szabo is one bad turn after another. Even with a conclusion set in
the post-Communist free era, all that is left for the living is a sense
that they have survived.
And survival is not enough. Ivan's redemption, such as it is, is not
enough -- and I've left out tons of material laying out the bare bones
of the story for you. The first two hours are truly a magnificent
recreation of that time and world . . . and here you should know that I
can trace my family back to a time they were called Wittenbourg and
lived dead center in the middle of the Austro-Hungarian Empire. I may
bring more historical baggage into the theater with me, but this does
not mean I've overinflated my enjoyment of the first two acts. Fiennes'
roles, and Rosemary Harris' later, are both unique and touching. The
staging and production values are equally great. Szabo's original five
hour long script, in Hungarian, has survived both translation and
reduction with the help of noted playwright Israel Horwitz. The film
dearly needs an intermission and, I'm guessing, another half hour to
show if and how Ivan is truly redeemed.
The Commies wrecked it for everybody, I guess . . .
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Sunshine, he would have paid...
Rental level. If you can find it on the big screen at a decent price,
the first two hours are well worth the expenditure of cash.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
IN SHORT: a passable GenX demo targeted flick
For two hours try to enjoy the new cinematic game "You Be The
Therapist," as self-proclaimed [expletive + impolite euphemism for lower
body part, hereafter] FA Rob Gordon (John Cusack) recounts his Top Five
Most Humiliating Relationships in the wake of being dumped by current
live-in flame Laura (Iben Hjejle). Perhaps in uncovering the reasons why
he was dumped, he will find enlightenment and a permanent relationship.
God knows it would make his weeping mother happy.
Rob runs a failing used record store and has borrowed cash from Laura, a
lawyer, so there's that income insecurity to deal with, amidst all his
other self-perceived problems. The man dumps his problems and
revelations upon us which, by the end of the two hours and what passes
for a happy ending, you may be sympathetic Rob or you may look on his
continuing plight with a smug satisfaction born of passing through the
kind of relationship Hell that he has experienced. Either way, you'll
have no disagreement on the fact that, yes indeedy, Rob is a FA.
At least Rob is self-aware enough to realize what he is. That's not the
case for his employee Barry (Jack Black) an overweight, abusive music
elitist who, without deliberate intention, does his best to drive away
what few customers wander in to Championship Vinyl on the North Side of
Chicago. The record store itself is so empty that thoughts of television
sitcom settings ran through Cranky's head. Indeed, most of the gags set
inside the store are, language excepted, fit for teevee. Much meeker,
but still an elitist, is co-worker Dick (Todd Louiso). The part-time
pair, who show up for work full time because they have no other lives,
have no girlfriends, don't seem to date or have any apparent hobbies
other than a manic devotion to music and things vinyl. (Kinda like
Cranky in his twenties, except for the dating and hobbies thing, which
means I can almost empathize and I'm certainly amused). At least this
pair have places to go in the course of this flick.
Said course will introduce us to the current whereabouts of all five of
Rob's humiliators, beginning with a the hot and heavy first clutch of
all, with Allison Ashmore (played at age 13 by Shannon Stillo) who
strung poor Rob along for six hours over the course of three whole days,
and destroyed whatever notions of respect of women his parents had tried
to instill. We never see the adult Allison for reasons I won't spill,
other than to say that she's not dead. There was Penny (Joelle Carter),
the "nice" girl who actively refused anything more than a kiss and
bedded a chem geek, who boasted of the experience, after dumping Rob.
Ah, the humiliation . . . but it's nothing next to the two year
relationship with Charlie Nicholson (Catherine Zeta-Jones) whose beauty
puts her so far beyond Robs perceived status that his inadequacies, real
or perceived, push the coupling towards certain doom. Finally there is
Sarah (Lili Taylor) who has been suffered mightily in her affairs. So .
.. it's better to sleep with another wretched soul than to sleep alone.
Chicago winters being what they are (and they are all you might expect
-- I've lived through 'em) keeping cozy is fine until spring fever
breaks.
That brings us back to Laura, now shacked up with a "conflicts
resolution counselor" named Ian (Tim Robbins). If anything, Rob's
thoughts on what he'd like to do to the man who stole his gal are the
funniest part of the movie. As rough as the breakup was, things just
aren't settled between the two. They don't settle out in the way you'd
expect 'em to. Rob at all times looks directly into the camera to
explain it all to us which may help you bond with the FA or may not.
Cranky settled for the smug satisfaction option, and Jack Black's
character is funny enough that he wasn't bored.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to High Fidelity, he would have paid...
High Fidelity is probably Dateflick for most GenXers and they can battle
over how big a jerk Rob is afterwards. For the rest of us, its fit for a
smaller screen and so is at pay per view level.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Gladiator
Rated [R], 150 minutes
Starring Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed and
Richard Harris
Screenplay by David Franzoni and John Logan and William Nicholson; Story
by David Franzoni
Directed by Ridley Scott
website: www.gladiator-thefilm.com
IN SHORT: Fast moving, very cool battles. Slower moving story.
Being an epic-type film, "slow" is about the only negative I can toss at
Ridley Scott's Gladiator and those of you that are into "epic" length
flicks should not have any kind of problem with the flick. Everyone
else, stick to the small soda and popcorn, 'cuz you won't want to be
ducking out on the story, whose recreation of ancient Rome is a wondrous
thing to behold. Scott wanted to recreate a long lost world and, with
seamless integration of CG effects, has. So a tip of the hat to him, and
to whichever of the writers came up with the line "At my signal, unleash
hell." That's how we begin this film, with a battle between the Roman
Legions led by General Maximus (Russell Crowe) and the barbarian hordes
of Germania. Far behind the battlelines, watching hell unleashed, is the
dying Roman Emperior Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris) who has decided
that Maximus should succeed him as Emperor.
This doesn't sit well with the first born son Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix)
who, through a good deal of dramatic manipulation, takes the throne and
sentences Maximus and his family to death. Gladiator is still firing on
all cylinders at this point, as Maximus survives to find himself sold
into slavery for the gladiator pits in the outer reaches of the Empire.
Nicknamed "the Spaniard" and believed to be a deserter from the Roman
Legion, he is befriended by an African named Juba (Djimon Honsou) and
battles for his life under the ownership of freed former Gladiator
Proximo (Oliver Reed). Newly crowned Emperor Commodus orders the
Gladiators back to the Colosseum and you can guess what's coming from
there.
That's where politics rears its ugly head and slows the story down . . .
or adds a whole ton of real story to what would otherwise be a simple
man seeking vengeance scenario. The political end involves Commodus'
sister Lucilla (Connie Nielsen), who would've been Emperor save for an
accident of birth and Marcus Aurelius' final wish, to restore the Roman
Republic and the democracy founded there. The head of the Roman Senate,
and a co-plotter in these actions is Gracchus (Derek Jacobi), who
brought the story of Claudius to Masterpiece Theater years ago. We
wonder what Jacobi made of the fact that the story of Claudius plays a
key role in the twists in the story of Gladiator. Debate and discuss.
On the grand scale of the big screen, this is the kind of movie that
should be seen on the biggest one available. The opening battle and the
CG reconstructions of the Colosseum alone are worth the price of the
ticket. The battles could force some of us into testosterone overload.
Once the pace slows down, though, so does the rush and the excitement.
Gladiator is gonna make Russell Crowe a major star, his nomination for
The Insider notwithstanding. His characterization of Maximus, the
maturity of the relationship with Lucilla and sheer hatred of Commodus
are the stuff that people talk of.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Gladiator, he would have paid...
Seven less a deduction for the length. Speaking strictly from a guy's
standpoint, the rush from the  opening battle alone will carry you
through the first hour and a half.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: What Planet  Are You From?
Rated  [R], 105 minutes
Starring Garry Shandling, Annette Bening
Story by Garry Shandling & Michael Leeson
Screenplay by Shandling & Leeson and Ed Solomon and Peter Tolan
Directed by Mike Nichols
website: www.sony.com/whatplanet/
IN SHORT: "It's Garry Shandling's Movie..."
....which is how the advertising folks should have billed this very funny
flick, 'cuz none of 'em obviously watched the damned thing. Thus the ad
campaign which implies that an alien being from a planet of men and only
men, comes to earth to father a child and save his planet. Nope. The
advanced society of said planet wants to conquer earth. It's said so
right at the top of the flick, as Star Wars-like background titles roll
up the screen. Why making one baby with an earthling would enable these
aliens to conquer earth is beyond me, but logic needs no reason in this
story, a perfect setup to Garry Shandling's type of reaction humor,
which is firing on all cylinders in this flick.
And just forty or fifty years ago, all alien planets were stocked with
busty, barely clad women, all desperately in need of a good shtup. Now,
in the first Year Zero in a century, we are confronted with the
intellectual and technological inhabitants of a Planet we'll call X, all
male and all dressed in black and gray Armani suits, looking like the
clones that they are. Without women, this society has gone beyond the
need for emotions or relationships or the private parts that play such
an important part in each.
Thus, H1449-6 (hereafter Harold Anderson) is dispatched to Arizona, USA,
to find and knock up one of our own. This being accomplished, their
dastardly plan to do away with our various lifestyles would be underway
.. . . except that they've sent Garry Shandling. Harold's assignment has
him posing as a loan officer at a bank, where an incredibly sleazy
co-worker (Greg Kinnear) shows him the ropes of picking up chicks. One
chick happens to be Susan Hart (Annette Bening) who has enough problems
of her own and has dealt with them by deciding, among other things, not
to have sex until she is married. Harold, whose mind is on nothing but
procreation, pops the question after one date. From there on in, What
Planet... quickly becomes a learning experience for the ET as to what
relationships truly mean. Just as director Mike Nichols' The Birdcage
wasn't as much about gay life as it was about families, so is What
Planet... more about the male/female thing than alien conquest.
OK, we'll forgive the marketing people for this one...
What Planet Are You From? is a Garry Shandling comedy and it delivers
all the chuckles you associate with GS, once again taking a concept fit
for a trashy TV sitcom (and, yes, I do sorta kinda like 3rd Rock From
The Sun, though it took awhile) and elevates it to a level of comedy fit
for adults. Any fan knows that Shandling has made an art of creating
inept, and intellectually funny, characters. Any fan will not be
disappointed. With a very small dose of low-brow humor added to the mix,
the folks just looking for a good time will not be disappointed, either.
John Goodman plays the FAA investigator hot on Harold's tail. Teevee
faces Nora Dunn, Camryn Manheim play Susan's friends. Ben Kingsley plays
Graydon, leader of Planet X (and while July 14 is still months -- and a
different movie studio -- away, any X-Men fanboy is going to catch at
least two very in jokes at the end of this flick). All are positive
reinforcement to the gags.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to What Planet Are Your From?, he would
have paid...
If you're not a Shandling fan, What Planet... is still a better than
average time in the dark. For those of us that wonder why we should
shell out for something that's been done in broad comic strokes on
teevee . . . 'cuz it's funny. That's why.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Bowfinger
Rated  [PG-13], 97 minutes
Starring Eddie Murphy and Steve Martin;
Heather Graham, Christine Baranski, Terrence Stamp
Screenplay by Steve Martin
Directed by Frank Oz
website: http://www.bowfinger.com
IN SHORT: A delirious and insanely funny Eddie Murphy-Steve Martin
flick.
Cranky wishes he had bought popcorn futures when he had the chance 'cuz
we're on such a run of fast paced fun flicks that I'm having serious
trouble maintaining this Cranky veneer. What makes it even worse is
that, very close to the beginning of Bowfinger which, unlike Holy Man,
is an Eddie Murphy movie, the number one action star in the entire
BF-Universe, Kit Ramsey turns full figure to the camera and proclaims
"We're trying to make a movie here, not a film!"
And how many Fall Oscar wannabe Seasons have come and gone with poor old
Cranky trying to explain the difference? For once, we get a movie that
sets out purely to entertain strictly on the simplest level. By whacking
the funnybone with all the strength it can muster. And not a single
vomit joke or instance of gratuitous nudity in any of the whacks. Good
old fashioned funny stuff.
This may be one of those times when I get more than my fair share of the
jokes, having worked both sides of the film production fence. Simply,
anyone who sees enough movies to have a general image of what
"Hollywood" is like won't have any trouble following this saber-sharp
satire of what the have-nots in Hollywood will do to become part of the
in-crowd, that crowd being the respected (however temporary) A-list
producers.
Let's begin with Robert "Bobby" Bowfinger (Steve Martin), sole
proprietor of Bowfinger International, a run down hacienda somewhere in
the lesser neighborhoods of LA. Bowfinger, known for his commercial work
and extraordinary documentary "The Yugo Story" is down to his last
nickel when he discovers the script that he thinks will turn his dregs
of a life into gold. It's called Chubby Rain, featuring an invasion of
aliens so tiny they ride raindrops. Thus, chubby. The problem is, the
only way to get it made is to have a heavy duty producer behind you.
Someone like Jerry Renfro (Robert Downey Jr.) who will support the
project only if a name-brand star signs for the title role. Someone like
Kit Ramsey (Murphy) a paranoid racist superstar, firmly in the clutches
of a support organization called Mind Head (which is not like
Scientology at all. My lawyers say I should say that so I don't get
sued) whose upper member wear standard grey suits (n.l.s.a.a.) and who
use a brain-meter to monitor their members actions and emotions
(n.l.s.a.a.). Bowfinger comes up with the idea that, as long as they get
it in one take and shoot covertly, they can walk up to the star and do
their stuff and bingo! A film.
Let's talk about the cast, 'cuz to say much more about the story would
mean revealing the jokes and though there are many, many of them, they
just build up upon each other until entrepreneur comes into conflict
with the grey suited ruler of Mind Head, Terry Stricter (Terence Stamp).
I won't spoil it. There's Carol (Christine Baranski), who passes up a
small way-Off-Broadway part to do her finest work, a la Norma Desmond.
Daisy (Heather Graham), fresh off the bus from Ohio, but a sexual
manipulator par excellence. Scream star Jamie Kennedy is Bowfinger's
right hand cameraman and newcomer Adam Alexi-Malle is the accountant
turned screenwriter, who gets to show off all the top-dollar (well,
maybe top half-dollar) special effects. Finally, there's Jiff (also
Eddie Murphy) a soft-brained lookalike who does all the hard parts and
makes runs to the local Starbucks. With stolen equipment and the
cheapest crew possible, Bowfinger manages to undercut the legendary
Troma Films by producing his epic on a staggering budget of $2814.
Eddie Murphy does his best work when he plays more than one character.
Here, doing only a pair he delivers his sharpest work since Dr. Dolittle
1. Steve Martin, also responsible for the script, continues to prove
that the less crazy he gets, the funnier he gets. And director Frank Oz
continues to prove that he's got a substantial talent, even when his
hand isn't up a Muppet's butt.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Bowfinger, he would have paid...
At the bottom of Bowfinger, is the simple fact that this pathetic little
man does what he does because he's made promises to his friends that he
will not break. It could have been exploited for a big "Aw" but it
wasn't. Thanks, Frank. All the characters fit some kind of stereotype;
all are 2 1/2 dimensional, but that's more than fine for a killer
popcorn flick.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark and Copyright Š 1999 by Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. On the web at http://www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
IN SHORT: For once, a Bullock flick I didn't like. . .
Even while going through the alcoholic/pill-popper withdrawal that
occurs early on in 28 Days, the closest thing to a "heavy" flick Sandra
Bullock has done in the last few years, try as she might Bullock just
can't look bad. And while you might assume that, since the premise is
party-girl-in-forced-rehab, this flick is one bit of bad news after
another, you'd be wrong. It's not a giggle a minute,
let's-make-fun-of-the-addicts, laugh-fest either, though there is a
helluva lot more humor in the piece than you would expect. Once again,
we point the finger at director Betty Thomas who has, since moving up to
the movie director's chair after many years as a teevee actor on an
"obscure" show called Hill Street Blues), taken material that we all
thought was impossible to bring to the big screen (last time out with
Howard Stern's Private Parts) and made the impossible happen. A fistful
of talent and the earnest endeavors of her cast almost do it again.
Almost.
That's about as close to a rave as you're gonna get from me, 'cuz over
all this is one of those situations where good intentions fall flat and
we get just an OK movie.
Gwen Cummings (Bullock) is the party girl. She likes The Clash, beer (or
anything else suitably alcoholic to wash down the Vicodan pills she
pops) and night long sloppy sex with boyfriend Jasper (Dominic West).
Not necessarily in that order. When a nightmare hangover pushes Gwen to
reup the stupor levels, she ruins her sister Lily's wedding and in short
order trashes a wedding cake, a limousine, and a suburban home (complete
with ornamental lawn jockey, so un-PC these days, on its front lawn).
Given the choice of jail time or 28 days in rehab, Gwen chooses door
number two. . .
.. . . and is welcomed with open arms to Serenity Glen, a lovely oasis of
tranquility and positive affirmation out in the country. Here, Lawrence
Welk blares from the public address system, Bill Wither's "Lean on Me"
is transformed into a life enhancing chant and your first day includes a
full search of your possessions and confiscation of any cell phone,
coke, booze, pills, heroin, pot, syringes or glass objects (heck, if you
had to chant "Lean On Me" a dozen times a day, you'd wanna slash your
wrists, too!) that you'd try to sneak in.
Cigarettes are fine, though. Virtually all the characters smoke like
fiends. That may be the way it is in real life but that little
inconsistency is like a stone stuck in your shoe that you can't shake
out. It's always calling attention to itself. Onwards...
While the flick is filled with characters whose backgrounds are colorful
and just well developed enough that they're not stereotypes -- Gwen's 17
year old junkie roommate Andrea (Azura Skye), a famous baseball player
(Viggo Mortensen), a gay German guy (Alan Tudyk) whose problem even I
couldn't figure out -- Gwen must battle the question of whether to dump
her enabler (that would be Jasper) who willingly smuggles in booze and
pills (One at Gwen's request. The other as an attempt to lure her back
to the Dark Side) or shovel horsepoop with a smiling face (it's
therapeutic) for a month and then get back to "normal".
As proof that there is life after rehabilitation, we get to meet
Counselor Cornell (Steve Buscemi). Buscemi's casting alone is such a
stroke of genius that I can only report that the sum of the parts is not
greater than the whole. Nor is it a total disaster. The plus is that the
flick doesn't resort to stereotypes for a cheap laugh. The minus is that
I didn't care even a whit for Bullock's Gwen.
That lack of sympathy doesn't come from my own baggage, which I've
always laid those out so you can decide if I've tinted the picture: I'm
virulently anti-drunk driving, having lost a dear friend to one. On the
flip side I go through a self-imposed detox every three months off the
addictive medications that keep me alive. Personally, I think one
offsets the other and now you know.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to 28 Days, he would have paid...
Pay per view level. As much as I adore Sandra Bullock (yeah, I do), I
didn't adore 28 Days.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
www.CrankyCritic.com
    Syndicated in South America and Japan by Entertainment Drive
 (In rotation) Fax Message:
CrankyCriticŽ on the web: www.crankycritic.com; www.filmfrenzy.com;
www.ofcs.org; www.edrive.com
CrankyCriticŽ syndicated to South America and Japan by Entertainment
Drive
CrankyCriticŽ on TV: in rotation on CNN Saturday Morning
CrankyCriticŽ on radio: Fridays on techedgeradio.com. Commercial
syndication is in negotiation. Really.
Chuck Schwartz/ CrankyCritic.com  223 East 61st Street  Apt 5B  New
York, NY 10021
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: The Blair Witch Project
not rated, 87 minutes
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
website: www.blairwitch.com
IN SHORT: The buzz was better than the movie.
Cranky has written before of how those of us who make our living
reviewing movies are a small, compact community, who share the buzz on
"small" or independent flicks that may otherwise be overlooked. Over the
last six months there's been major buzz about a no-name flick -- that
means no star actors or production folk. It's no reflection on talent --
called The Blair Witch Project. Word was this documentary style horror
flick was tremendous, which explains the packed house in the screening
room when we got our first look at the flick this past June.
The story concept was great: Three budding filmmakers, Heather Donahue
(director), Michael Williams (sound), and Joshua Leonard (camera) are
shooting a documentary on an 18th century "witch" named Elly Dedward
when they vanish forever into a Maryland woods. A year later, their film
and tape is found and is edited into a coherent form by the team of
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, revealing the physically
deterioration and psychological self-destruction of eight lost days
during which the group finds themselves hunted by an unknown entity.
The only problem is, the history of the "Blair Witch" isn't well
documented in the film. The "filmmakers" spend more time focussing on a
1940s child killer who stalked the town and don't make a strong link
between that "possession" and others that have occurred over the past
two centuries (I'll get back to that). Residents of the town of
Burkittsville (formerly Blair) are interviewed about what they know of
the witch or the killer in the first half of the film that is very
entertaining. Once they get lost in the woods, and I'll not give most of
that away, the film begins to feel like something that was made up on
the spot.
Which it was. Myrick and Sanchez gave the three actors film and video
equipment to shoot with and story notes from which they were then left
to improvise. The net result are scenes that sometimes look totally
natural, and sometimes look like a bunch of scenery chewing. "Mike" goes
through mood swings that a) make you wish he had brought a Valium drip
with him and b) detract from the better than usual improv job done by
"Heather" and "Josh". That pair are more consistent in their
characterizations but the overall picture just isn't scary.
No one ever implied that BWP was a slice 'n' dice flick. If that's what
you expect in your scareflicks, you won't like this.
This is one of the few times that the website is a vital resource, and
more entertaining, than the film. There's a tremendous amount of
material documenting the "witch" or the alleged possessions (there are
more than one). Having the background details down cold will help fill
in the gaps for you and may raise the tension levels high enough that
you get a fright or two. Cranky got the material just before his
screening, and knowing the details only pointed out the failure of the
improvisations.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Blair Witch Project, he would
have paid...
and, as we used to say in school, an "A" for effort. The sum of the
parts do not make for an enthralling whole.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
For those out there that aren't long time readers, Cranky's a 'toonhead.
Loves animation. Almost wept when he had to sell a Gertie the Dinosaur
cel to support this site (didn't 'cuz I had two). In general, of the
post-Lion King run of animations from all the major studios, in general
I hate the second banana characters and really don't have much temper
for the multitude of songs that usually get in the way. Now that you're
up to speed . . .
What's a Cranky Critic to do when there are no second banana characters
-- to keep the kidlets giggling at the expense of grown up attentions --
to complain about? You know the type -- supporting monkeys or gargoyles
or whatever that usually infest toons from the other "D" studio but less
so from Dreamworks. You can blame or thank Jeffrey Katzenberg for this,
he did oversee The Lion King and many others at the Mouse, and is the
partner in charge of animation at Dreamworks SKG. The 'toons we've seen
from them in the last couple of years, Antz and The Prince of Egypt have
both aimed a wee bit higher, with more themes for the post thumb-sucking
set and less base comedy for the kidlets. Cranky likes that.
This year's offering, The Road To El Dorado, upgrades the second banana
type from support to lead and tries to duplicate the kind of chemistry
that made Hope & Crosby (or Lemmon & Matthau) a good screen team. El
Dorado tries and succeeds for the 'Works, delivering the most family
friendly of all their 'toon output. I know 'cuz I saw El Dorado twice.
Once with other critics, in preparation for StarTalk interviews with
lead voices Kevin Kline and Kenneth Branagh. Again, on the biggest
screen in New York, with an audience filled with media and their
kidlets. The kidlets were cackling at stuff that makes kidlets cackle
(don't ask me why) and the double entendre went right over their heads.
The big screen effect is discussed a couple of inches down.
Branagh and Kline voice Tulio and Miguel, two Spanish con artists who,
through every fault of their own, find themselves stowed away on the
conquistador Cortez' flagship on its journey to the New World. Cortez
(Jim Cummings) is searching for the legendary City of Gold called El
Dorado and has no tolerance for the stowaways (who just happen to have a
map to the city in their possession). The pair get washed overboard,
along with Cortez' stallion Altivo (who never speaks a word but is
"voiced" by the most expert and rightfully legendary Frank Welker) and
make it to the New World ahead of Cortez.
We're not telling how. It's funny. As is the pair's personal search for
El Dorado, which culminates in their finding it and being declared Gods
by the Chief Priest of the City, Tzekel-Kan (Armand Assante), who is
fighting a political battle with the Chief (Edward James Olmos) for
control of the tribe. Their Protector and Partner in Crime is the lovely
and equally greedy Chel (Rosie Perez) who tries to guide these
nincompoops in the how-to of breaking the bank, and winds up breaking
Tulio's heart. The interplay between Kline and Branagh's characters is
incredibly funny and dead on target (Kline's the Crosby, btw) and both
are topped by the vocal effects of Welker. To say the horse is smarter
than both men put together is a fine compliment, indeed. As for the
animation . . .
Let's talk honestly for a second. We all know the biggest market for all
feature toons is the post bigscreen video market. All of you with
kidlets know that for a fact -- how many times have you parked your
kidlets in front of [title here] or, for that matter, been parked by
your kidlets in front of [title here]? As I wrote, I saw The Road To El
Dorado twice. First, on a screen that was probably the size of the
bigger theaters in your local multiplex, which was enjoyable though some
of the CGI/traditional animation mix onscreen seemed obvious. Second
time was on a monstrosity of a screen with no such apparent "problem".
While there have been notable improvements in the technology of
background CGI character movement and water animation ('toonheads'll
catch it all), the climax of the film, in which a boat with sail
unfurled and filling with air evades a stone pillar crashing into the
water behind it -- absolutely breathtaking.
If you've got a theater nearby with a screen the size of the side of a
house, that's where you want to see The Road To El Dorado.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Road To El Dorado, he would have
paid...
Elton John and Tim Rice pick up their partnership where they left off on
The Lion King, though they've just done Aida for Broadway as well. The
songs in this flick are meant to narrate which they do better than
entertain, though the opening title and the Kline/Branagh sung "It's
Tough To Be A God" two (of five) are real toe-tappers. The radio hit
runs during the end credits, so it doesn't count. Sorry.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Luminarias (1999)
Luminarias
Rated [R], 100 minutes
Starring Evelina Fernandez, Marta DuBois, Diana Ortelli, Angela Moya
Screenplay by Evelina Fernández, based on her play
Directed by Jose Luis Valenzuela
website: www.sleepinggiantweb.com
Sometimes a movie with a minority cast will do big business, even if
it's a real stinkeroo, because that minority will turn out to see their
fellows on the screen. Such is the case with Luminarias, a histrionic
stage play which has forgotten that moviemaking requires actors to turn
it down a notch. Even though its stage production came first, Luminarias
is a lowbrow Waiting to Exhale . . . and I didn't care for that poorly
made flick either. If I wanted to watch incredibly negative Latina
characters, I'd be popping a beer in front of MadTV. If I wanted to take
it on the chin for being in the majority according to skin tone, then
Luminarias  would sure teach me a thing or two. This film is so focussed
on, what I'm guessing to be, the rage of the Latina author that anyone
outside with non-Hispanic origins is dissed. And so, for that matter,
are non-Mexican Hispanics.
The film begins at the anniversary party of Andrea (Evelina Fernandez)
and Joe (Robert Beltran of Star Trek: Voyager) at which Joe is caught
swapping tongues with the blonde gringa hottie he's been doing on the
side. Apparently he's done this many times before and Andrea boots him
out of the house. Usually Joe comes back all respectful and apologetic.
This time he wants a divorce.
So we've got four single Latinas who hang out at a restaurant called
Luminarias, doing shots and talking about looking for love. Besides
Andrea, a divorce lawyer, there is Sofia (Marta Du Bois), a therapist,
who likes white guys and is in such denial of her heritage that she
barely speaks the language; Irene (Diana Ortelli) the clothing designer
who likes her studs young and Latin (but has given up sex for Lent); and
Lilly (Angela Moya), a visual artist, usually ends up with men who are
most likely undocumented, unemployed and married.
Sofia, hoping to get her friend a taste of something exotic, fixes up
Andrea on a surprise blind date with Jewish lawyer Joseph Levinson
(Scott Bakula) -- who, unknown to Sofia, is handling the opposite side
of a divorce case Andrea is working on. Andrea, as noted, doesn't like
white guys, but a couple of shots of tequila, and the sight of her ex
and his blonde, take care of that. Joseph finds himself introduced to
Andrea's family, including cousin Jesus (Cheech Marin) and a pair of
horny aunts. They're more excited about having a gringo in the family
than Andrea seems to be.
It must be noted that only Bakula, Marin and Liz Torres (in a very minor
role) know how to play to the camera. Everyone else is overacting so
badly that many of the smaller stories -- the effect of the divorce on
Andrea's son; Lilly facing the kind of discrimination the girls discuss
and/or preach, because she's fallen in love with a Korean -- are
overshadowed by weaker, lowbrow gags -- Irene's homosexual transvestite
brother. Regardless, every story turns sloppy sentimental as the play
forces one happy ending on top of another.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Luminarias, he would have paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews:The Iron Giant
Rated [PG]
Starring Eli Marienthal, Harry Connick Jr., Jennifer Aniston, Vin
Diesel, Christopher McDonald and John Mahoney
Screenplay by Tim McCanlies and Brad Bird
Based on the book The Iron Man by Ted Hughes
Directed by Brad Bird
website: http://www.theirongiant.com
IN SHORT: The first "must see" movie of the summer. . .and how many
times do you see that pair of words in a CrankyCriticŽ review?
Long time readers know that Cranky is an admitted 'toon-head. They also
know that he's been waiting for the one animated feature that could
appeal to adults as well as children, without forcing us to sit through
bad songs or a marketing machine's cute anthropomorphic, animated
sidekicks. Princess Mononoke, coming in October, is definitely not for
little kidlets. Disney's Tarzan came close, but didn't leave me with
lump in my throat and a pounding in my chest as the end credits hit, as
was the case with what I'll declare to be my now discovered Holy Grail
of Animation. It is called The Iron Giant, based upon a book written by
England's poet laureate Ted Hughes for his children, after the death of
their mother, the poet Sylvia Plath. The Who's Pete Townshend adapted
the story into rock opera format a number of years ago. This version is
created under the eye of animator/director Brad Bird, who studied at
Disney, did his teevee writing/directing/creative consulting work on The
Simpsons, The Critic and King of the Hill and who has produced a feature
length masterpiece his first time out.
Set in 1957, a time of sputnik and the political paranoia that went
along with coming in Number Two, The Iron Giant confronts the prejudice
of the time and wraps it all in a heavy duty layer of nostalgia -- for
us old coots. Duck and Cover educational films, cheesy Sci-Fi Horror
films, and Maypo commercials. For those too young to endure a thirty
year trip in Professor Peabody's Wayback Machine, it is the story of
nine year old Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal) and his
discovery of a "hundred foot tall" robot in the backwoods near Rockwell,
Maine. Hogarth isn't the only person to have seen the Giant. Earl Stutz
(M. Emmet Walsh) An old fisherman who ran his boat into the robot has
called in the Army to investigate this mysterious thing that may be from
Outer Space; may be a Commie, for all we know. The rest of the town
laughs at the old man, equating the sighting to pink elephants, but that
doesn't explain why huge chunks are missing from their cars and
tractors. They look like big bite marks, but nothing could be that big,
right?
Hogarth is a mischievous kidlet. His single mother Annie (Jennifer
Aniston) works as a waitress in town, and that leaves the kidlet with
too much time on his hands. Once he saves the Giant from electrocution
in the high power cables at the local power plant, the story offers
echoes of the old "He followed me home. Can I keep him?" stories. In
this case, Hogarth doesn't tell mom, nor does he tell the incredibly
nosy investigator, Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) who has rented
the extra room across the hall. While Hogarth can teach the Giant to
speak (Vin Diesel does the voice) and the ways of right and wrong --
straight from the pages of Action Comics, home of Superman -- he doesn't
have enough metal around to feed the big guy. Enter our final player,
Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick Jr.) a beatnik junk dealer who creates art
out of the scrap metal he picks up for a penny a pound, give or take.
Dean hides the Giant from the U.S. Army, which has come to town at the
behest of Kent Mansley, to destroy that which it fears.
That's the way it was in the '50s. That which we could not identify we
assumed was the enemy. That which was the enemy we threatened to nuke.
And all the while, the air was filled with beat and jazz and the
beginnings of rock 'n' roll music.
Now, don't think the Giant is a warm and fuzzy, new age 90s in the 50s
kind of robot. When Hogarth plays "Atomo" (based on the evil star of one
of his comic books) and aims a toy blaster at the Giant, said Giant
undergoes a metamorphosis that would make any Transformer jealous.
Destructo-Rays, Plasma Energy balls, Vaporizing beams, almost anything
you could have imagined in any 1950s sci-fi epic is at his beck and
call, and only a quick witted Dean keeps Hogarth from meeting his Maker.
More important than any other story element, this sequence is the key
which makes The Iron Giant unique. Hogarth has taught, and the Giant has
learned, that living beings have souls and anything with a soul can
choose to be good or bad.
The Giant chooses to be Superman. Literally. The Army, led by Kent's
boss General Shannon Rogard (John Mahoney), chooses nukes. I've left out
a vital piece of the story which, if revealed, would steal from you the
wonder that you will experience as you experience this most wonderful
piece of work.
Deep down, The Iron Giant ain't no lightweight kidlet fare but it is
totally accessible to the little kidlets sitting near Cranky and even
more accessible to the little kidlet tucked inside all of adults. I've
made no mention of the animation technique because The Iron Giant
achieves what most animators can only dream of, a story so affecting and
characters so real that you forget that you're watching a animated film.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Iron Giant, he would have
paid...
If you remember the 50s, you're gonna love it. If you were into comic
books or Sci-fi, you're gonna love it. If you're nostalgic for the
"family values" orientation now applied to 50s teevee shows, you're
gonna love it. If you've got little kids, you're gonna love watching
them love it and then you'll get the tape so you can love it all by
yourself.
Even the teen kidlets, who never like anything I do, will love it. But
they'll never admit it.  End of gush.
CrankyCriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz All Rights Reserved

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Deep Blue Sea
Rated [R], 110 minutes
Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Michael
Rapaport and LL Cool J
Screenplay by Duncan Kennedy and Donna Powers & Wayne Powers
Directed by Renny Harlin
website: http://www.deepbluesea.net
IN SHORT: Smart Sharks. Human sushi. Yum.
As far as investment dollars are concerned, this week's wide release of
The Blair Witch Project has got the majors running scared. As far as us
folk that pay hard earned dollars for thrills and chills, the better
investment (as far as Cranky is concerned) is Renny Harlin's Deep Blue
Sea. The e-mail that's come in to Cranky indicates folks either adore or
detest Witch, with no evident middle ground. Deep Blue Sea, on the other
hand, almost requires an extra large popcorn and soda, so that the
greasy golden topping stuff can go splattering all over your date when
you applaud at the end of the flick. Even if you don't rave, you won't
feel cheated by this top notch popcorn flick.
OK, enough preaching. Let's get down to the nitty gritty chomp chomp.
A lovely moonlit night. Two collegiate couples on a sailboat. Girls in
bikinis, men pouring wine and a boombox booming out suitably appropriate
music. This night was not made for skinny dipping, or anything else
previously filmed 20 years ago in Jaws. This time out, it isn't a case
of prehistoric killing machine following genetic programming to lunch on
human flesh. This time the mako shark, bred in captivity as part of
experiments designed to find a cure for Alzheimer's Disease, has
deliberately attacked. How he escaped from captivity at the Aquatica
research lab is unknown. What is known is that, when Wall Street hears
the story, prime investor Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson) is going
to be out $200 million or so. With 48 hours to prove her experiments can
keep Franklin out of the poorhouse, Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron
Burrows) pushes her research team to the limit.
One thing you should know about the mako. It's fast. It's intelligent
and illegal DNA enhancements as part of the experiments have made it
even smarter. You know this from the trailer and commercial. What you
don't know, yet, is that there are two generations of mako shark
resident at Aquatica. Gen-1 tips the scales at an even ton in a fifteen
foot package. Gen-2 adds ten feet and three more tons of mean. They hunt
in packs. They can swim backwards. They know where all the security
cameras are. Just like any prison inmate, they are biding their time,
taking stock of the human sushi on the station: shark expert Carter
Blake (Thomas Jane), who likes to swim with the beasts; marine
biologists Janice Higgins (Jaqueline McKenzie) and love-of-her-life Jim
Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgard); engineer Tom Scoggins (Michael Rapaport)
and evangelist cook Sherman "Preacher" Dudley (LL Cool J). Pick your
favorite and place your bets on who survives.
The gimmick is great: it isn't man hunting shark on the wide open ocean,
which is the classic. It's shark hunting man inside all of the security
precautions designed to keep man safe and protected from the elements
(until a freak accident and a raging storm break those defenses) and
from the power of the genetically bred animals (who are a lot stronger
than they look). The effects, a combination of animatronics, real
footage and CGI look "real" for the most part. The killing effects occur
so quickly that there is little time to react with more than shock.
These sharks are so big they can swallow their prey whole, so the gore
isn't exploited, much.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Deep Blue Sea, he would have paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: The Next Best Thing
Rated [PG-13]
Starring Madonna, Rupert Everett, Benjamin Bratt
Screenplay by Tom Ropelewski
Directed by John Schlesinger
website: www.nextbestthingmovie.com
IN SHORT: A lightweight modern comedy
Cranky truly was not looking forward to The Next Best Thing, after
reading the movie summary that crossed his desk. The straight woman /
gay man make a baby scenario sounded like something soon to be seen on
Will and Grace (who apparently got down to doing the nasty in last
week's episode). The Next Best Thing, thankfully, doesn't go that route.
Madonna talks about the evolution of the script over in CrankyCriticŽ">http://www.crankycritic.com/qa/madonna.html">CrankyCriticŽ
StarTalk, which also explains the reasoning behind her cover of Don
McLean's "American Pie". I'll come back to that.
So, what exactly is The Next Best Thing supposed to be? As a raw idea,
it's a workable one. Abbie (Madonna), a single, straight woman in LA --
where "there are no straight men" -- has another relationship collapse
under her and hears her biological clock ticking ever louder. She calls
on her best friend Robert (Rupert Everett), for solace (They are best
friends in each other's lives, though we don't see what exactly brought
them together or what they have in common). One really drunken Fourth of
July night they acknowledge what they've known all along, that were it
not for the preferences problem, they'd be a perfect couple. Alcohol
being what it will, twenty four hours later they wake up hungover in
each others arms. Nine months later, after much discussion as to what
role he is going to play, there is a blessed event. Being a perfectly
90s couple, the pair decide to raise the kidlet together, but not get
married (so there won't be any messy legal separation problems if either
on falls in love).
That's just the first half of the flick, which includes Everett doing a
rave up flaunting every Queen-ish stereotype imaginable, and the funeral
of an AIDS victim whose family won't acknowledge the cause, or the
deceased's request to have "American Pie" sung at his funeral. It's
deadly serious stuff versus raucus comedy and it feels like the
proverbial kitchen sink. To be fair, both Madonna and Everett's
characters lovingly sling mud at each other's lifestyles, and those
elements demonstrating their relationship are funnier than everything
else. But if you don't buy the relationship from this first half of The
Next Best Thing, the second half is going to be difficult.
That half is seven years down the line, with a beautiful boy named Sam
and a relationship holding its own, right down to the separate rooms and
beds (kind of like my grandparents. hmm.) Robert maintains a regular
dating life, Abbie raises Sam and doesn't seem to be looking for love in
any place whatsoever. Until investment banker Ben (Benjamin Bratt)
mistakenly wanders into her yoga joint one day. Ping. Quickly, a lesser
continuation of My Best Friend's Wedding turns into a lesser version of
Kramer vs. Kramer. Lyrics from "American Pie" pop up incessantly and
annoyingly in this second half as well.
We also get to see Abbie and Rupert's other friends comment on the
relationship. Abbie's are all straight, Robert's gay, which makes the
how and why of their relationship all the more intriguing. While the
film tries to put all the pieces together, it feels like a number of
story ideas stapled together rather than one solid story.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Next Best Thing, he would have
paid...
Lightweight date flick. Cranky watched the flick with and without an
audience. The Next Best Thing works much better with a crowd -- laughter
being contagious and all that. If you're going to go, go with a crowd.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Road Trip
Rated  [R], 97 minutes
Starring Tom Green, Breckin Meyer, Amy Smart
Paulo Costanzo, Seann William Scott, DJ Qualls, Rachel Blanchard
Screenplay by Todd Phillips and Scot Armstrong
Directed by Todd Phillips
website: www.roadtrip-itsgood.com
>From the time they were five, Josh (Breckin Meyer) and Tiffany (Rachel
Blanchard) swore undying love. Then college came and they were separated
by 1800 long and lonely miles, he in New York, she in Texas, and one
burning hot telephone line. One day, Tiffany stopped returning calls
and, having aggravated her roommate to death, Josh is told that she
didn't come home the night before. Crushed, Josh falls into the arms of
the very hot for him Beth (Amy Smart) -- actually, he buys her for
twenty six dollars, but that's a whole 'nother story -- and being the
90s kind of guy that he is, gets the entire sordid encounter on
videotape. Beth's idea, for that matter.
It wasn't Josh's idea to send the tape to Tiffany, but that's what
happens and that's what kicks Road Trip into motion. Sure, it's one
boner joke after another with a couple of doobie gags, fat jokes and toe
sucking tossed in to break the monotony of nubile young ladies parading
about starkers on the big screen . . .
Yep, another teenflick. Not as politically incorrect as a Farrelly
Brothers flick. Not as flat out below the belt disgustingly funny as
American Pie, Road Trip nonetheless is consistently funny -- moreso if
you've never seen anything like it before. I have, God knows over the
last twenty years I've seen more than my share, but I can honestly
report that there was a consistent grin plastered to my face. Road Trip
didn't crack the cranky crust as American Pie did, but it was not
unamusing to this fossil.
The story is narrated by campus tour guide Barry (Tom Green), who's made
a full time career out of college life (he's eight years in to his four
year undergrad program). While leading a campus tour, Barry spins his
tale of sex, sex, dope, a snake and a mouse, to the disbelieving ears of
the freshmen to be and their folks. Quite honestly, there's nothing more
to tell you about the story without giving the jokes away. What I will
say is that everything you may have thought about what Tom Green does to
the mouse (as hinted in the previews and teevee spots) is nothing
compared to how sick his character is. It's the one performance that
kept Road Trip interesting for this old fart of a reviewer.
Well, that and Rachel Blanchard with red hair. Someone stuff me in a
freezer until she's my age . . .
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Road Trip, he would have paid...
'cuz the youth are gonna go and they're gonna take dates. If I was still
tokin' Road Trip would be a rental.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Stop Making Sense (1984)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Stop Making Sense
[not rated]
Starring The Talking Heads, live in concert
David Byrne, Chris Franz, Jerry Harrison and Tina Weymouth
Filmed at the Pantages Theater, Hollywood CA
Directed by Jonathan Demme
website: http://www.palmpictures.com
IN SHORT: The Return of the Big White Suit
CrankyCritic.com doesn't put the dollar rating on reissues. This being
the 15th anniversary of the release of the Talking Heads concert film,
Stop Making Sense is reason enough to re-release the old chestnut, with
an upgraded sound mix and video remastering to CD, DVD and other such
modern initialed tech like that. Which means I get to wax nostalgic and
talk about my days in the music biz and, more important, I get to tell
you about Stuff I Like.
The hard part about reviewing concert films is twofold: It isn't fair to
the performing artist if the reviewer couldn't care less about the
music. It isn't fair to the reader if the reviewer is an unabashed fan,
and doesn't tell you. So, in the interest of full disclosure: Cranky
likes the Talking Heads. He played their first records on college radio.
He produced an appearance on the King Biscuit Flower Hour syndicated
concert series, and met both David Byrne and Jerry Harrison of the band,
back around 1980. If I wanted to wade through the pre-computer
paperwork, there is probably a review of Stop Making Sense from its
first release back in 1984. I never saw the band live.
Raving fan? No, not at all. The Talking Heads were an acquired taste.
TH'77 and Fear of Music were difficult albums to listen to, because the
Talking Heads didn't sound like anything else that had been pressed in
black in the Seventies. When you're young, it only takes a song or two
to make you go back to an album looking for more gems, and tracks like
"Psycho Killer" and "I, Zimbra" (or "Don't Worry About The Government"
and "Life During Wartime") were better than good starting points. When
the band as a whole discovered funk in the early 80's, collaborating
with Parliament's Bernie Worrell among others, the change seemed so
radical it threw us off. Now, we'd call them "ahead of their time".
Truth is, the band was always ahead of the great curve. But not so far
ahead of the fans that we couldn't keep up.
Stop Making Sense captures the Talking Heads at the peak of their
powers. Live, the Heads took their music so far beyond anything captured
on vinyl that the only disappointment was that the original soundtrack
delivered only half the film's music. Cranky is informed that the
re-release of the CD contains the whole megilla. If you've sprung for a
DVD player, that's on its way too. Let's talk about the film . . .
The first thing that comes to your mind, if you're old enough to
remember the original theatrical run, is the Big White Suit that David
Byrne sports in the show. Odds are you, like Cranky, confused the
numerous parodies of the suit (on whatever teevee comedy shows were in
vogue at the time) with reality. The suit doesn't show up until close to
the end of the show, and it wasn't as huge as I remember. But that isn't
the wildest thing about Stop Making Sense, version 1999.
The wildest thing was sitting in a packed, private screening room with
40 or so other reviewers, watching all but one of 'em try not to move at
all while the concert unspooled. Byrne, who spoke briefly before the
screening, said he was surprised when the remix was shown at the San
Francisco Film Festival earlier in the year because the audience got up
and started dancing. Cranky doesn't understand his surprise. Even if you
only roll the soundtrack, regardless of whether you like the studio
albums or not, it's hard to keep in your seat. The Stop Making Sense
soundtrack album is a kickass groove start to finish. In its perfect
creation of an audience POV, you don't have to be close to the screen to
get the feeling that you're at a Talking Heads concert. The need to
dance will follow naturally.
As a snapshot of where the band was in December 1983, Jonathan Demme's
film stands as what some rock critics have labeled it, one of the best
rock concert films of all time. It is, as with Martin Scorsese's The
Last Waltz, one of few concerts that were designed to be photographed on
film. Unlike Waltz, Stop Making Sense confines itself strictly to the
performance stage. From David Byrne's entrance onto the bare stage, with
acoustic guitar and boom box in hand, for a solo performance of Psycho
Killer through the song by song assemblage of stage set and performers
-- Tina Weymouth (bass) joins Byrne to duet on Heaven as black clad
stagehands wheel out instrument platforms for Chris Franz (drums) and
Jerry Harrison (guitars and keyboards) -- and touring bandmembers stroll
out to their positions, Stop Making Sense takes on all the qualities of
a theatrical presentation.
Even better, until an audience shot at the very end, you never see a
film camera in any shot, a practice in other films that always bothered
me. The actual cinematography, by Jordan Cronenweth (and restored by his
son Jeff), is remarkable because is uses the actual stage lighting of
the show, rather than bringing all the f-stop levels up to the norm by
pouring light out of fills. Byrne and Demme headed back into the mixing
room and brought their work up to 1999 technical specs. Now with full
surround sound, the audience reaction wraps around you as does the
music, like a loving mother.
Happy happy joy time. Play it all night long.
[If there's no Laserdisc release, Cranky may have to shell out for DVD
]
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Plunkett & Macleane (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Plunkett  & Macleane
Rated  [R]
Starring Robert Carlyle, Jonny Lee Miller and Liv Tyler
Screenplay by Robert Wade & Neal Purvis and Charles McKeown,
based on an original screenplay by Selwyn Roberts
Directed by Jake Scott
website: www.reellife.com/plunkett.html
IN SHORT: Best guilty pleasure of the year, and I'm not embarrassed to
admit it. tee hee . . .
. . . and while you will probably see the high brow critics savage video
director Jake Scott's bigscreen debut, Plunkett & Macleane, Cranky will
tell you that he wishes he had purchased the humongous sized popcorn
combo. As far as "guilty pleasures go", and I'm one of the few who gave
thumbs up to Wild Things and The Big Hit and Ringmaster, this "new wave
take on historical drama" is a killer.
Or maybe it's that I worked in the music biz in the heydey of new wave.
Plunkett & Macleane sets itself in the 18th century, while all the
characters speak with 1990s attitude and language. Visually, think of
the darkness of some Ultravox vids crossed with Jimmy Somerville's fey
vocals, Adam Ant costumes and a pounding Eurobeat rhythm track. In
short, it's every mid to late 80s "new wave" video cuisinart-ed together
and played again and again, blasting out at you from the big screen with
occasional pauses for things like plot and story to seep through.
Extremely loosely based on the fact that a pair of highwaymen called
Plunkett & Macleane actually existed back around 1745 or so, one of whom
(Macleane) was so polite and well mannered to his victims that he was
dubbed "The Gentleman Highwayman". The England of this time had no
organized Police Force and any villain of means could buy his way out of
jail with a well placed bribe to a guard or judicial official.
When we first meet James Macleane (Jonny Lee Miller) he is a Gentleman
in Debtor's Prison, a dank and dirty place whose quiet is disturbed by a
violent robbery gone awry. This introduces us to Will Plunkett (Robert
Carlyle), who has been after a fairly large ruby. Through a series of
sequences I won't describe, the pair form an alliance to escape from a
prison they are in. From the start, it is obvious how great the economic
gap is between the rich and the poor, even in prison! On the outside,
the pair decide to go with their strengths (they don't particularly like
each other, but Partners rarely do). Macleane will impersonate a
Gentleman and get the goods on who has what, where it is and when it can
be stolen.
First victim is the pompous and corrupt Lord Chief Justice Gibson
(Michael Gambon) and his lovely niece Rebecca (Liv Tyler). Maclean is
lovestruck at first sight. Rebecca is more observant than she lets on,
though she'll drop clues that she's discovered the identity of the
Gentleman Highwayman as she flirts with an unmasked Macleane at various
events. The sexual innuendo is shoveled on thick. It drips from every
scene it can and wraps itself around as much of the dialog as possible.
Not just from these two. Also from the bisexual Lord Rochester (Alan
Cumming), a friend of Macleane and a man that would as soon cut your
heart out with a rapier as he would perform a wee act of buggery . . .
The "good guy" is called Mr. Chance (Ken Stott), a sadistic and corrupt
lawman for hire. He, too, has a thing for the lovely Rebecca and a good
mind for landing on the right side of the churning political waters. His
pursuit of the pair takes up most of the movie and the resolution
borrows heavily from Bonnie and Clyde. The bad guys must die and the
Good Guy must win out, but in this case the bad are good and vice versa,
even the "bad guys must die" rule still applies.
How does the film manage both? I ain't telling.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Plunkett & Macleane, he would have
paid...
Which is dateflick level for a flick that probably should be rated down
at rental or pay-per-view. Sue me. I enjoyed it. Plunkett & Macleane is
just as clever as Wild Things, only with a little bit of class . . .
warfare.
That doesn't excuse the blatant ripoff of (the chorus section of)
Talking Heads' Houses in Motion in the end credits tune "Horses In
Motion" -- Yeah, right. It's a tribute. Puh-leeze. David Byrne should
call a lawyer.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
IN SHORT: Jackson and Jones starpower saves a lackluster script.
We begin with a mob of Arab natives cursing at, throwing rocks and
shooting rifles at, the American Embassy in Yemen. A team of Marines is
sent in to reinforce the security at the Embassy and, depending on how
bad the situation gets, safely evacuate the personnel if necessary.
Ambassador Mourain (Ben Kingsley), by the time 32 year veteran Colonel
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) gets there, is hiding under his desk.
His wife (Anne Archer) and child are terrified. Colonel Childers does
his job, evacuates the embassy and sees three of his men die from sniper
fire and gunshots from the crowd. Having been fired upon, he orders
return fire, and 83 people are killed. The world's press (that includes
domestic) are outraged! National Security Advisor William Sokal (Bruce
Greenwood) decides that not prosecuting the Colonel would be akin to a
cover-up, and orders the Corps to put the vet out to hang. This, despite
the fact that the NSA is in possession of a videotape from the Embassy
security system, clearly showing women and children in the crowd firing
upon the Embassy.
Gee whillickers, ladies and gents! A movie with something to piss off
both Conservatives ("dee-FENSE! dee-FENSE") and whiny Liberals
("government conspiracy!") . . . and there's more blatant manipulative
stuff in what passes for a script based upon a story by former Secretary
of the Navy James Webb, but I'll leave that be. You'll catch it
immediately. Director William Friedkin trowels it on top of a pair of
combat sequences (one in Vietnam, the other the riot in Yemen) which set
up everything that scriptwriter Stephen Gaghan decides not to bother
with.
With eight day to muster up a defense, one colonel calls on another,
Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) whom he had saved in Vietnam and who has
lived out his days in the corps as a self-admitted bad lawyer. Simply
put, Good Soldier. Self-admitted Bad Lawyer. Evil Government Stooge
withholding evidence. Do I believe any of it?
Hell no. 'cuz we all have that little switch inside our heads that can
lock out everything that would piss us off 'cuz the star performances
are so much damned fun to watch. Sure, it would be nice if we got to see
a little more background on both men -- everything we need to know is
found in expository dialog. And it would have been nice if the film
didn't offer up a nod to Fight Club as a way of showing the deep
friendship between these men. We know from their previous screen
characters that Samuel L. Jackson plays the man against the system very
well, just as we know that Tommy Lee Jones is Crankier than I. Both of
'em generate such electricity on the screen (and we're talking the
inevitable trial that ends the movie. We've already pointed out that
major character development in their parts just doesn't exist) that
Rules of Engagement is a fun flick to watch.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Rules of Engagement, he would have
paid...
Absolute Star Power rules in this one. There's so little story
development here that, with lesser actors, Rules of Engagement would've
gone down in flames. There was a Gulf War vet sitting behind me -- who
wouldn't keep his mouth shut as he commented on the military sequences
-- who called the whole thing "stupid" when the final credits rolled.
But did he "hate the flick," I asked? Hell no.
Simply, buy the big popcorn and check your logic circuits at the door.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Brokedown Palace
Rated [PG-13], 100 minutes
Starring Claire Danes, Kate Beckinsale, Lou Diamond Phillips, Jacqueline
Kim and Bill Pullman
Screenplay by David Arata
>From a story by Adam Fields & David Arata
Directed by Jonathan Kaplan
website: http://www.foxmovies.com
Sure, stories of innocent Americans wrongfully busted and languishing in
the hellish conditions of foreign jails have been done before . . . but
we don't compare to 'em. Probe your video store owner's memory 'cuz
Cranky can only think of two, offhand.
Brokedown Palace is the story of two bestest of friends who sneak off to
Thailand (their parents think they're in Hawaii) as a post-high school
graduation jaunt. Why Thailand? Well, it's a particularly teenage bit of
reasoning that leads 'em to this destination, and an amusing couple of
seconds of film which I won't spill. It's one of the lighter moments in
David Arata's screenplay, which tries to stress the bonds of friendship
between Alice (Claire Danes) and Darlene (Kate Beckinsale). It doesn't
work well, which explains some of the audience reaction reported below.
Most of the front half of Palace is narrated by Danes via a cassette
tape she's managed to send to "Yankee Hank" Greene (Bill Pullman), an
American lawyer partnered legally and matrimonially with a Thai local
named Yon (Jacqueline Kim). Hank ain't no white collared, built on
principle, legal eagle. He's not above shmoozing the local Drug
Enforcement Agency liaison (Lou Diamond Phillips) for information or
doing the investigative work the local police don't (or won't) do. But
when the money is gone, so is Hank.
And money doesn't go very far in the Thai justice system.
What remains is a friends against all odds story, with all the twists
that that would imply, and another twists and turns filled subplot which
I won't spoil. Danes' character is more street savvy, Beckinsale's more
naive and both actors do decent work. The problem, at least for me, is
that the pair didn't click as true friends. They come off more as
partying buddies, though that may be the generation of years gap between
Cranky and these kidlets.
When the big dramatic climax came, the woman to my right was sniffling
mightily. Those in front of me were cackling like hyenas and many walked
out calling Brokedown Palace "ridiculous." Those were the women, who
should be more sympathetic. Geez, I'm the one who's supposed to be
cranky . . .
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Brokedown Palace, he would have
paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. On the web at
http://www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: The Thomas  Crown Affair
Rated  [R], 114 minutes
Starring Pierce Brosnan and Rene Russo;
Denis Leary, Ben Gazarra and Faye Dunaway
Screenplay by Leslie Dixon & Kurt Wimmer
Based on the original story by Alan R. Trustman
Directed by John McTiernan
website: http://www.mgm.com/thethomascrownaffair
IN SHORT: Watching rich folks is a tedious chore.
As always, no comparison is made to the Source Material, a 1968 film
written by Alan R. Trustman and starring Steve McQueen and Faye Dunaway.
You may remember Cranky griping about concept over execution in the
discussions over another movie. Well, The Thomas Crown Affair is
lovingly executed, but there's so little story content in relation to
scenes of how the richest of the rich live, as we watch the passionate
but romance-less game being played by the main characters, that you
could easily duck out to refill the popcorn and soda and not miss a darn
thing. You could do that several times and add a bathroom break, too.
So, while Cranky sat in his chair watching the lovely exotic scenery
that those who own their own jets can jet off to when Manhattan gets
them down, he got creative. Here now, the background of The Thomas Crown
Affair.
She's a poor girl from Ohio. He's a poor boy from Scotland.
She got wealthy. He got grand stinking rich. Like Billions.
She likes to chase. He likes the challenge.
She's tempting. He's a temptation.
He steals valuable art. She gets it back for the insurance company.
He has woman troubles. She has no man. A match made in Heaven, eh?
He's Thomas Crown (Pierce Brosnan), who buys and sells companies before
lunch. An ex-boxer who has put so many competitors to the canvas that
life isn't thrilling anymore gets his kicks ripping off art galleries.
She's Catherine Banning (Rene Russo), who stands to make a cool $5
millions if she can find the Monet painting (she's sure) he's purloined
in an audacious attack on the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York.
It's a brilliantly conceived attack, punctuated by an annoying
techno-flavored underscore by Bill Conti. Director John McTiernan 's
languid direction stretches the thing out way too long for my taste. And
we're just getting started.
McTiernan, who directed Die Hard, offers up long luxuriating cinematic
passages designed to set a mood of elegance and a rich texture on a
cinematic canvas. As Crown and Banning do their little dance, are they
flirting or are they manipulating each other and if so, is it into bed
or into the clink, the only member of their manage a trois to enjoy the
chase is Crown's shrink, played with an amusing grin, by Faye Dunaway.
Crown's inability to let women get close enough to him, and his attempts
to deal with it (he says he can get a woman to trust him, but never the
other way around) is a running theme. Also in the middle, is Denis Leary
as the New York Police Detective in charge of the investigation, who may
or may not care about the sins of the rich. It's something you may want
to debate when this is done.
He knows he stole the painting. She knows he stole the painting and is
more than willing to break the law to get it back. When all is said and
done, Crown wants Banning. Banning wants the painting almost as much as
she wants Crown. When he offers to prove his feelings by returning the
painting to the museum, hanging it in the same spot it was stolen from,
will she bust him or will she join him as a fugitive, living the high
life on an island in the sun. The shame is that when this final gimmick
comes down, it's a brilliant scene. A scattering of applause greeted it
in the preview Cranky sat in. There are a couple of surprises held to
the very end, but by then, it's too late. The leisurely pace and padding
kill this sucker dead.
Watching two rich people that are so cold to the world try to fire up an
almost-middle-aged passion leads to much nudity, but no sense of spark
between the pair. There is more life and spark in the very brief scenes
with Faye Dunaway to put Rene Russo's performance to shame. Brosnan is
doing a cold Remington Steele. The disappointment is such that I may hit
the video store to see what worked about this story the first time out.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Thomas Crown Affair, he would
have paid...

Title
Review for Dudley Do-Right (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Dudley Do-Right
Rated [G]
Starring Brendan Fraser, Alfred Molina and Sarah Jessica Parker
Screenplay by Hugh Wilson and Jay Ward
Based on characters developed by Jay Ward
Original Dudley Do-Right theme by Fred Steiner
Directed by Hugh Wilson
website: http://www.dudley-do-right.com
For those of us ancient enough to remember Rocky and Bullwinkle, this
year's big screen revamp of Dudley Do-Right kicks off with a nod to the
past, a "brand new" Fractured Fairy Tale cartoon, entitled The Phox, The
Box and The Lox. It doesn't resemble anything Grimm that I can recall,
but it was a pleasant way to kick off the festivities at a sneak preview
packed with parents and kids. Keith Scott again steps in for the late
and unrelated Bill Scott. June Foray's pipes are still in good form, and
we'll be treated to the lady's return to her best known work in next
summer's The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle, starring Robert De
Niro. If you'll allow me one last indulgence of dropping another name
(and a killer piece of trivia) into this historical reminiscence;
composer Fred Steiner, responsible for teevee themes to Perry Mason,
most of underscore of Star Trek, and The Bullwinkle Show has oft told
his cousin Cranky that of all his work, the Dudley theme is his
favorite. It sounds damned fine coming off the big screen.
Jay Ward's cartoon was a parody of silent movie serials like "The Perils
of Pauline" -- a helpless damsel in distress faced a deadly demise
and/or torture at the hands of a dastardly villain in a black coat,
always waiting for her pure-hearted and always upright Hero to find and
rescue her in the nick of time. Under Ward's direction, Our Hero was
dimmer than a two watt light bulb, the Fair Maiden was not much brighter
and The Villain had all the fun.
Not much has changed in the 1990s. Dudley Do-Right (Brendan Fraser), is
the Royal Canadian Mounted Policeman that he always wanted to be. Love
of his life Nell Fenwick (Sarah Jessica Parker), is off discovering the
world and evil, nefarious and dastardly Snidely K. Whiplash (Alfred
Molina), is having a wonderful time leading and, in turn, double
crossing his Gang of 999 black masked marauders. Their homestead of
Semi-Happy Valley has fallen on hard times. The mines are closed. The
slawdog stand is empty. The only profitable business in the town is the
nightly Indian Corn Festival, a dinner dance extravaganza with fireworks
run by the far from native born Kumquat Nation, headed by The Chief
(Alex Rocco).
Snidely's plan is to take control of the town, rename it after himself,
salt the mines and streams with gold and then reap huge profits from the
gullible prospectors who will descend seeking the nonexistent metal. The
only potential bump in the road is Do-Right, who is easily diverted into
chasing things that go bump in the night. When Nell returns from her
world travels, she must choose between the savior of the town who cheats
at miniature golf or the man in uniform whose beloved Horse has run
away.
Nell may be dim but she ain't stupid. That's about all I need to say,
lest I make Dudley Do-Right sound like a movie with a logical story. The
gags in the original were all slapstick, bad puns and innuendo and only
the first of that list has made it to the big screen. It isn't the
slapstick that got the kids rolling in the aisles, it was the sight of
Do-Right getting slapped around by a stick wielding Prospector (Eric
Idle) in a play on Pat Morita's role in The Karate Kid that did the
trick. Dudley Do-Right also homages Return of the Jedi and Raiders of
the Lost Ark as it weaves unsteadily through the creative minefield that
confronts any 8 minute cartoon expanded to the full 90 minutes. The
basics of the cartoon are still there: The Announcer (Corey Burton) that
explains the action and drops in jokes to fill the gaps; Nell's father
Inspector Fenwick (Robert Prosky), and Do-Right's Horse who supplies all
the brain material our hero is lacking.
Those of us who are old enough to remember the original have kidlets
small enough to enjoy it for the first time. Said kids are the target
for this flick, not us nostalgia bound coots. What little of the plot
I've laid out collapses under the weight of visual gags and a couple of
Indian dance numbers that will confuse the grownups and keep the
youngsters enthralled. A handful of really funny
you've-got-to-be-an-adult-to-get-'em gags come close to saving the day
for us fogeys, as does a terrific performance by Alfred Molina. But
Brendan Fraser's Dudley is so totally off the mark that Cranky doesn't
know where to point his stubby little fingers -- at the actor or at
writer/director Hugh Wilson for taking a two dimensional character to
the big screen and creating an even smaller hero.
The single digit kidlets who don't have years of friendship with the
original won't have much problem with v.1999 but this wasn't "my" Dudley
Do-Right. Saying any more would break my rules about not comparing to
Source Material so Cranky's gonna shut his face and get this over with.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Dudley Do-Right, he would have
paid...
Rental level for the grownups. Dudley Do-Right is one of those movies at
which you can let your kidlets feel like big boys and girls -- you can
let 'em see the flick unsupervised without any worry about anything on
the screen.
And if you're like any of the parents I know, you won't have any problem
in it while you're standing in the back of the theater keeping an eye on
the kidlets from a safe distance. Ain't it great to be a grown up?
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Double Jeopardy
Rated [R], 105 minutes
Starring Tommy Lee Jones and Ashley Judd
Written by David Weisberg & Douglas S. Cook
Directed by Bruce Beresford
website: www.doublejeopardymovie.com
It's never a good sign when a movie reveals almost all there is to know
in its trailer or teevee spot. So, this CrankyCriticŽ review comes to
you guest hosted by Alex Trebek
Cranky: I'll take "Deja Vu" for $400, Alex.
Alex: The answer is: Busted for a murder she didn't commit, an innocent
runs from the law
Cranky: What is The Fugitive?
Alex: No, I'm sorry. "She" is the catch. The category is "deja vu"
Cranky: OK, then, same category for $800
Alex: The answer is: "Tommy Lee Jones hot on the trail of a Fugitive"
Cranky: Ah, you're not gonna fool me this time. What is U.S. Marshals?
Alex: Nope. Sorry. The answer to both questions is, well how about this,
Double Jeopardy!
Which, had the producers gone the low budget route and cast Priscilla
Presley and Mike Farrell, could have been sold as a Lifetime Exclusive
Movie under the title -- "I Killed My Husband . . . And Then He Stole My
Baby!"
Sentenced to jail for a gruesome murder she swears she didn't commit,
rich young thing Libby Parsons (Ashley Judd) is obsessed with finding
her young son, who has disappeared with the best friend into whose care
he had been placed. When she tracks this pair down, to a new identity in
a new city, she makes the awful discovery that her husband isn't dead!
Since authorities don't want to hear it (they've heard it all before,
don'tcha know) Libby heeds the sage advice of another ex-lawyer, also
imprisoned for murder: "You've killed him once. You were convicted. They
can't try you again for the same crime so, bide your time..."
That's a twist on the Fifth Amendment with reasoning that I'm sure any
lawyer out there could take apart in a second. It doesn't get in the way
of the story (unlike the problems I had with last year's A">http://www.crankycritic.com/archive98/asimpleplan.html">A Simple
Plan), a neat package whose loose ends are neatly tied up before the
by the book heart tugging ending. Release on parole after six years,
Libby is ensconced in a halfway house, under the eye of depressed ex-law
professor turned parole officer Travis Lehman (Tommy Lee Jones) who has
also lost a child to a thieving ex-spouse. Driven by the need to find
her son, Libby will eventually break parole and Travis will follow. You
get a cross country chase, at least one near death escape, an
interesting story twist that Edgar Allen Poe probably dreamed and forgot
a hundred years ago and a cute boy with a fuzzy mop top. Nothing you
haven't seen before. With A-list stars to keep your attention, Double
Jeopardy is a perfectly average way to pass the time, but it isn't
gripping and thrilling storytelling. Blink twice and you'll see it on
the rental racks.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Double Jeopardy, he would have
paid...
Only the star names kick this thing into rental range.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Mickey Blue Eyes
Rated [PG-13], 102 minutes
Starring Hugh Grant, James Caan, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Burt Young, James
Fox, Joseph Viterelli
Screenplay by Adam Scheinmand and Robert Kuhn
Directed by Kelly Makin
website: http://www.mickeyblueeyes.com
IN SHORT: Like striking the comedy motherlode. Delightful.
Mickey Blue Eyes hasa gotsa everyting yousa wantsinna Mafia movie...
Waitasec. Backup to the English thing. My femme friends tell me that
should read "A well dressed cuddly bunny cute Englishman . . ." 'cuz
lightning has struck for the second time this summer; Hugh Grant stars
in a great date movie. Here's the secret to Grant -- he's a
non-threatening cuddly bunny, a perfect everyman in a strange land;
whether it's in the Hollywood star system or the generic Mafia
stereotype it makes no difference. He makes men and women laugh. He
makes us all happy when he lands the woman he wants. Warm fuzzies all
around in most of his flicks; simply great date material.
This time out, Grant is Michael Felgate, an auctioneer at the New York
based Cromwell's Auction House. He is madly in love with a school
teacher Gina (Jeanne Tripplehorn) and, after three months, is ready to
propose marriage. This comes early in the movie -- she's going to say
"no", but that's just a comic coda to a scene side splitting enough
that, in any other "ordinary" dateflick, it would be enough to make you
happy you spent the cash on tickets. Luckily, there's a lot more, and a
lot more funny stuff, coming.
Trying to figure out this unpleasant turn of events, Michael tracks down
Gina's father Frank Vitale (James Caan), owner of an Italian restaurant
called "The La Trattoria". The sight of actor Joseph Vitterelli, you'll
know him when you see him, sitting at the bar clues us in to the fact
that Michael has never seen a Godfather-style movie in his life. He is
not ignorant of The Mob, and his protestations that they will never
affect his love or his life to be with Gina are, of course, the
cinematic equivalent of spitting in the wind. Which leaves a standard
stranger in a strange land premise, always good for a story and, in this
case, perfect for a Hugh Grant romantic comedy.
The plot points include money laundering, murder, an FBI sting and the
inevitable bloodbath. Each sets up a series of gags that are
increasingly funny. I don't have to tell you about Grant trying to fake
the accent when he's passed off as a mobster from Kansas City -- it's in
the teevee commercial. The strength of this flick is that, even when you
know the joke from the advertising, there's still plenty left in the
flick that tops what you know. Like I wrote, a motherlode.
Unlike the earlier Mob spoof Analyze This, Mickey Blue Eyes is virtually
profanity free. Yes, the Italian Mob stereotype gets shredded for comedy
punchlines, making Cranky wonder where the Italian-American
Anti-Defamation League is, but Grant allows Adam Scheinmand and Robert
Kuhn's screenplay to lob a couple of grenades towards the English as
well. You'll know it when you see it.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Mickey Blue Eyes, he would have
paid...
Damn fine fun.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ  The Sixth Sense
Rated [PG-13], 107 minutes
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment
Written and Directed by M. Night Shyamalan
website:http://www.thesixthsense.com
IN SHORT: Creepy and enthralling, with a twist you won't see coming.
Here's the hard part about writing up The Sixth Sense. If I tell you
anything that may clue you in to what is going on in this flick, I will
not be doing what I consider to be my job, 'cuz I'll be giving it away.
So I'm going to tell you a true set of stories to help illustrate some
of the shrink stuff going on in this fine flick.
When a person goes through extreme trauma, as when I broke my neck ten
years back, it is a normal psychological reaction to push away those
people who remind (him) of the trauma. It could be someone who was
present at the time. In my case it was "fix-up dates," all of whom had
suffered some major distraction, shall we say, in their lives. They had
been damaged, as had I and I didn't need to be reminded. It may seem
shallow, but that's life. When my closest friend lost a breast to
cancer, she pushed me out of her life by emasculating me in front of her
friends. I knew what she was doing and when I couldn't stand it anymore
I walked away. We haven't spoken since.
Which brings us to ace child psychiatrist Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce
Willis), who's just been awarded the highest citation that the City of
Philadelphia can give to one of its citizens. His loving wife Anna
(Olivia Williams) doesn't mind playing second fiddle to her hubby's
devotion to his kidlet patients. Then the good doctor's past comes back
to bite him on the ass and extreme trauma kicks in.
A year later, post trauma, the normally quiet doctor has changed. He is
physically and emotionally distant to his wife, misses dates and
anniversaries, spends nearly all his free time with an exceptional case
concerning a potentially psychotic 8-year old boy named Cole Sear (Haley
Joel Osment). Most little kidlets have imaginary friends, but these tend
to fade at Cole's age. His "friends" are terrifying him because they're
not fuzzy li'l Dr. Seuss-type characters. They are the ghosts of people
long dead, all of whom have shuffled off this mortal coil in shocking
and/or violent ways.
Of course, he's probably nuts. He's hides in the local church, and has
scratches and gashes all over his body. His mom (Toni Collette) might be
abusing him, but that doesn't seem likely. His schoolmates all consider
him to be a freak, and as his therapy drags on, this poor kid shrinks
into a world where he is terrified beyond belief. Can the Doctor help
this poor kid? And what of helping his wife? How far should your work
take you from the people you love?
Writer/Director M. Night Shyamalan has done an exceptional job on this,
his third feature. Everything you see is presented in a matter of fact
style, even the icky stuff. There may be a moment where you could feel
as if you've been manipulated in standard horrorflick mode, but there's
no slice 'n' dice. Nothing you see will seem out of place once you
accept the fact that this poor kidlet isn't nuts. And you will. And the
truth will blow you away.
Bruce Willis is doing something unusual for him. He's being a quiet man.
No big action stunts, just quiet speak and doctorly concern. It's a nice
change. The real find is Haley Joel Osment, a kidlet who holds the
screen in a way not seen since Anna Paquin did it in The Piano.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Sixth Sense, he would have paid
. . .
After the Blair Witch Project failed to scare me silly y'all wanted to
know what creeps Cranky out. The Sixth Sense did. Don't confuse creepy
with scary, there's a lot more going on here than I'll even hint at.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. On the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Crazy in Alabama (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Crazy in Alabama
Rated [PG-13], 104 minutes
Starring Melanie Griffith, David Morse, Lukas Black
Screenplay by Mark Childress, based on his novel
Directed by Antonio Banderas
website: www.crazyinalabama.com
IN SHORT: Good work from Melanie Griffith. Decent first flick from
Antonio Banderas, director.
Juxtapose one very serious story about a child witnessing a racial
murder in 1965 Alabama with a quirky story of his homicidal aunt's
journey to Hollywood, where fame and a TV career await, and you've got
actor Antonio Banderas' directorial debut Crazy in Alabama in a
nutshell. How one story influences the events of the other is so subtle
that Cranky didn't get it. Both stories, individually, are good in and
of themselves. So let's get to them.
Melanie Griffith hasn't gotten the great character roles all that often
in her career but when she gets a good one, as she does here, she goes
to town. As Lucille, a would be actress who gets a call from the coast,
nothing is going to keep her from obtaining her dream. Not the seven
kids. Not the abusive husband who, before the film even begins, is
beheaded and stuffed in a freezer. Lucille (Griffith), character that
she is, takes the head with her as she drops off the kids and says
good-bye to her best nephew, Peejoe (Lucas Black) who, in the round
robin or restructured families, is shuffled off to live with another
uncle, Dove (David Morse).
The setting allows for PeeJoe's story to focus on the racial strife of
the time, which includes the usual redneck sheriff (Meat Loaf Aday) who,
in the course of beating up some black kids who wanted to swim at the
public pool, accidentally kills one. PeeJoe is the only witness but
Sheriff Doggett, still after Lucille for the (now) discovered killing,
is not beyond making some sort of deal to keep his fat butt free.
Lucille's cross country trek paves the way for lots of small scenes of
interactions with "real" people across the heartland. The girl can flirt
her way out of trouble and, by the time she hits LA, she's got an agent
(Robert Wagner) and a handful of men in her thrall. She still has that
head, by the way, which speaks to her regularly.
Eventually, both stories come back together in a courtroom run by Rod
Steiger. His judge is a total cartoon, and would work well up against
teevee's Judge Judy, but Crazy in Alabama is, at heart, a light flick.
Two good stories. Good performances. Easy to rate...
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Crazy in Alabama, he would have
paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Joe Gould's Secret (1999)
IN SHORT: One good one for us grownups.
There should be no secrets kept about Stanley Tucci's third outing as a
director. Joe Gould's Secret is an intelligent, touching, beautifully
written and acted film. A flat out fine film for those of us who don't
require explosions, foul mouthed rap music, gratuitous sex or violence
from our movies.[Not that there's anything wrong with that, but . . .
]
Writing from the experience of a life-long New Yorker, I can honestly
report that in the decades while the homeless were anonymous, this city
had what we called "characters". Some may or may not have been homeless
or living in shelters, some may or may not have been addicts of any
kind, but they all stood out from the average bum in the gutter. In the
last twenty years, two come to mind. One, a very tall, blind poet, used
to stand on the corner of Sixth Avenue and 53rd street in full Viking
Warrior gear, spear and all, and recite for spare change. When he died
last year, after a number of years in Europe, he got a full write-up in
the New York Times. The second, Adam Purple (as in dressed head to foot
in) squatted in an abandoned tenement downtown and built, over the
course of a decade or two, an astounding garden on an abandoned plot of
land. When the City trashed it to build low cost housing not only was it
news, it broke our hearts.
Which brings us to the subject of Stanley Tucci's third feature as a
director, Joe Gould's Secret. Joe Gould (Ian Holm) was, thanks to an
article by Joseph Mitchell (Tucci) in The New Yorker, such a character.
Initially known as Professor Sea Gull, because of his self proclaimed
ability to converse in the language of the gull, the article made Gould
a minor celebrity in the growing bohemian counterculture down in the
Greenwich Village of 1942 or so. Planted in a window table at the
Minetta Tavern, scribbling in a school composition notebook and/or
reciting poetry or speaking the language of the gulls, Gould would
solicit contributions to the "Joe Gould Fund" all of which was to
support his massive written work in progress, "An Oral History of Our
Time".  Every conversation with every person Gould has met is written
down and, he claims, stored in a lockbox of a memory that recalls every
word.
Among Gould's famed contributors and supporters are Ezra Pound and e.e.
cummings, neither of whom appear in the flick. We do get to meet artist
Alice Neel (Susan Sarandon) and publisher Charlie Duell (Steve Martin)
who do their best to try and give Joe the exposure they think he
deserves. We do see his acceptance in The Raven Poetry Society, a group
of snobs who, after ten years tolerating Joe's mooching at their buffet,
allow him entry after fame strikes.
What we see best is a pair of great character performances by Tucci and
Holm. Joe Mitchell's family life is rounded out by Hope Davis, as his
photographer wife Therese and two kidlets (of whom one real life
surviving kidlet consulted on the film) and it is a fully formed
picture. We see a working guy do his story and try to move on -- except
for the fact that the story keeps coming back. In this case, Gould camps
out in the lobby of The New Yorker, waiting for Mitchell. And waiting.
And waiting.
Joe Gould's "secret" is revealed in the film. What is more interesting
is an even darker secret that pops up in the middle of the film and
promptly disappears. You'll know it when you see it. Unless, of course,
I'm suffering from an overactive imagination.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Joe Gould's Secret, he would have
paid . . .
Much better than the average arthouse fare and, IMO, a return to the
solid film-making talent Stanley Tucci showed in Big Night.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Last Night (1998)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Last Night
Rated [R], 69 minutes
Starring Don McKellar, Sandra Oh, Sarah Polley, Callum Keith Rennie,
David Cronenberg and Genevieve Bujold
Written and Directed by Don McKellar
website: http://www.lastnight.net
If one must see only one Canadian film this year . . . wait until next
year and hope to see two better films than Last Night, a production that
approaches the quality of middle echelon college flicks. Meaning? Last
Night should've stayed on the festival circuit or the Sundance Channel.
At minimum, I'll give writer/actor Don McKellar credit for trying to
stretch himself as a director. While his first effort, Last Night, may
have been good training for what it takes to be a director, it has all
the looks of a fair to middling senior student project. All the
interesting stuff is tied up in the script, which, as with his work on
The Red Violin, shows where his strengths lie.
The concept is good: What would you do if the world was about to end? No
hope of salvation. No Bruce Willis to blow up his spaceship and save the
day. It's an idea fit for Millenium Fever, but the execution is
uninteresting.
McKellar's characters cover a good range of reaction save one: panic.
Patrick (McKellar) just wants to be alone, though he does suffer through
a final Christmas dinner with his family, unwrapping `presents' of
discarded toys of Christmas past. His sister Jennifer (Sarah Polley)
wants the dinner over with so she can go and party like there's no
tomorrow -- picture New Year's Eve in Times Square. The ball drops.
Everybody dies.

There's Sandra (Sandra Oh) whose efforts to get home for a
murder-suicide pact with her husband go astray when a mob trashes her
car. It's a long walk home, during which she meets Patrick and a sort of
friendship is formed. Patrick brings her to his best friend Craig
(Callum Keith Rennie) who has cars to spare. Craig also has a detailed
chart of every sexual activity, position and partner type that he can
think of, and is working his way down the list to the very end. Duncan
(David Cronenberg) works at the gas company, and calls every customer to
let them know that the gas will still be on all the way to the end.
That's about as clever as the film gets. Cronenberg's name should ring
some bells with you, as should French actress Genevieve Bujold, who has
a small part as one of the checkboxes on Craig's list.

All the while, an elderly marathoner runs through the empty streets
yelling out how much time is left at the top of her lungs. On the radio
a DJ is playing the `Greatest 500 Songs Of All Time,' including timeless
tunes by Burton Cummings, the DeFranco Family, The Looking Glass and
Edward Bear. The songs alone  would be enough to make any music lover
put a pistol in the mouth, but Last Night is a Canadian film and that's
Canadian content. The song list doesn't even come off as a sly bit of
satire, that's how remarkably unemotional and ineffective this flick is.

Last Night has the look of a 16mm shoot blown up to 35, on out of
date stock. That may have been intentional, to visually represent
something, but Cranky ain't smart enough to figure that out. It looks
like a student film. Its actors have very little idea of what they're
supposed to mean in the big scheme of things.  Cranky will ignore the
special effects part of his brain that says: how is the Earth going to
die? Is it falling into the sun? Is it getting hit by an asteroid? Where
are the gravitational effects? because the budget is too low to pay for
'em. Actually, the budget is too low to pay for much of anything.
There's little emotional conflict of any kind in the family scenes (has
the government spiked the water supply with valium?) and no character
performance in the overall story to sympathize with. Last Night is the
kind of flick fit for obscure film festivals where prizes are given as
freely as pats on the backs for getting the product made.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Last Night, he would have paid...
Cranky liked McKellar's writing in Red Violin, though on that project
there was a collaborator. Didn't like it here. Didn't believe the
characters. Didn't believe the situations. Doesn't believe you should
spend your cash.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Sugar Town (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Sugar Town
Rated [R], 93 minutes
Starring Rosanna Arquette, Ally Sheedy, Beverly D'Angelo, Jade Gordon,
Michael Des Barres, John Taylor, John Doe and Martin Kemp
Written and Directed by Allison Anders and Kurt Voss
It's been a generation since Cranky worked in the music biz -- I know
it's a generation because one of the principal characters in Allison
Anders' first rate flick Sugar Town refers to Stevie Nicks as "a cool
old guy." Outside of the age gap, nothing much has changed in the world
of rock and roll. Naked ambition, sheer ego, self deception, junkies,
plane crashes and all natural living come together in perfectly matched
multiple stories that fill this flick. It is the highest compliment I
can pay to co-writer/directors Anders and Kurt Voss that they not only
nail the scene and the inhabitants thereof, they at no time let their
innate knowledge of the biz get in the way of telling a good story.
No, I take that back. Stories. Easily a half dozen of 'em, all stocked
with well defined characters and a whole passel of surprises. It's the
kind of work that Robert Altman does well and, considering my mixed
feelings about Anders' Grace of My Heart, a major improvement and a
delightful slice of life tale of folk both rising and falling in the
Hollywood entertainment industries.
We start with Liz (Ally Sheedy) a thirtysomething film production
designer whose biological clock is ticking so loudly that it's making
her neurotic and scaring away potential dates. Her best friend Eva
(Rosanna Arquette) is an actress watching a career go up in flames --
once the sexy ingenue type, now she's being offered a role as Christina
Ricci's mother. Her husband Clive (John Taylor, ex Duran Duran and Power
Station) is a Brit rock star of the 80s who, with other also rans Nick
and Jonesy (Michael Des Barres, ex Power Station and Martin Kemp, ex
Spandau Ballet) is shopping a last chance demo deal with the aid of
producer Burt (Larry Klein, a real life composer and Grammy Award
winning producer) and still waiting to be paid session player Carl (John
Doe of X).
Not to mention Carl's eight months pregnant wife Kate (Lucinda Jenney);
the sexy Latina () whose tour he's playing on, and who wouldn't mind
playing him; Jane, the rich widow (Beverly D'Angelo) who wants to nail
the one rocker who won't sleep with any woman older than 21 and Clive's
heretofore unknown ten year old son Nerve (Vincent Berry) who's dropped
off at dad's doorstep when his groupie mom goes off to join an ashram.
Crossing paths with almost all of these characters is Gwen (Jade Gordon)
the would be rock goddess who will lie, cheat, steal, swindle,
manipulate, plagiarize -- you get the picture -- so that she can flaunt
her inevitable fame in front of the boys who turned her down in High
School and now repair Slurpee machines. Cranky dated a woman just like
Gwen, way back when. She's now working for a superstar and I'm reliving
old nightmares  'cuz Gordon's work is spot on, as is everyone else in
the cast. For those who are playing roles similar to their real lives,
creating a separate character is a very difficult thing because you
can't help being anything but self-conscious of the parallels. If the
Anders/Voss script hadn't provided detailed backgrounds for all of 'em,
this project could have fallen flat as a barely covered and badly told
retelling of real events, which was my feeling about Grace of My Heart.
I have no such reservations about Sugar Town.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Sugar Town, he would have paid...
Anders and Voss wrote the script in two weeks, finished the production
in six months and boasted of the fact at Sundance. As have a lot of
other boasts that have come out of that festival, that almost red
flagged Sugar Town as "sure to suck." It doesn't suck. Mightily.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
"Good morning Mr. Hunt (Tom Cruise). The picture you see is a Dr.
Nekhorvich (Rade Sherbedgia) of Biocyte Pharmaceuticals. Dr. Nekhorvich
was killed in a plane crash while on his way to deliver something to us.
We don't know what but it's really dangerous. IM agent Sean Ambrose
(Dougray Scott) was on the plane, too, and we haven't found the body.
We're not sure where he is, if he's screwed us, or exactly what your
mission is, other than to stop something really nasty from happening.
We're sure you'll figure it out along the way. Oh, you can only use two
agents and you must include a civilian thief named Nyah Hall (Thandie
Newton) on the team. We know we're not supposed to configure your team,
but we can discuss that when you come over and discuss the matter in
person with us (Anthony Hopkins). If you or any member of you IM team
should be caught or killed, yada yada yada. Have a nice day."
With all the baggage of the past buried and forgotten, John Woo takes up
the director's reigns, overseeing the one-man strike force that is Ethan
Hunt, leader of the Impossible Mission "team," in Mission: Impossible 2.
Woo, whose visual sense can make a boy giddy, lets loose with both
barrels and all the visual fireworks he can put on the big screen.
That's a good thing 'cuz the M:I2 script stinks. Like its big screen
predecessor this flick has very little in common with the television
series it is based upon, other than a self-destructing set of
instructions and characters pulling rubber mask disguises off their
faces. We don't compare to Source Material. Fans of the series can
figure out what's different from the paragraph above.
Then again, it's summertime, when all most of us want out of a movie is
onscreen fireworks and a reason to plunge our mitts into the
extra-large-super-sized popcorn up to our elbows. M:I2 delivers that in
spades, refusing to cut fight scenes that run on too long, resorting to
makeup gimmicks instead of developing a great story and, in short,
refusing to roll over and play dead when its story was done. It's almost
as if the writers and Woo sat down and figured out what would be really
cool to do and which really cool bits would be even cooler if shot in
slow motion, and then wrote the script around them. That means a
motorcycle duel, a half naked Cruise on a rock and the gun in the sand
bits that are in the teevee commercial, and a wee bit of "aerobatic
insanity" that reprises something in the last flick and which had the
audience happily giggling.
Absolutely giddy. Myself included. I told you.
If you're a novice to the concept, the IM is a secret force that
manipulates situations to bring about conclusions that punish the evil
guys and ensure that truth, justice and the American way win out. In
this case, it's the story of one renegade agent and his possession of an
artificially created strain of influenza that could devastate the world.
The "good" IM team -- our heroes include Ving Rhames, the only returnee
from M:I1 and John Polson as an almost utterly dispensable guy with an
Australian accent, useful since the film is set in Australia -- must
track and destroy another -- Richard Roxbury is the muscle on bad guy
Ambrose's side -- using the civilian and a small tracking device
implanted in Newton's ankle, as bait. The notion of one IM team against
another one is a good one. The problem is that one team leader knows all
about the moves of the other, and not vice versa. The bad guys also have
all the IM technology, so how they miss the tracking device is news to
me.
 No, it's not. It's scriptwriters ignoring the obvious. It's
scriptwriters ignoring what they've written earlier in the script. But,
just as in the last flick, this series is not so much about the story as
it is about Ethan Hunt, $20 million dollar action figure. That being the
case, Tom Cruise is absolute dynamite in black clothing. He makes a
great John Woo movie action toy. The action sequences, as in everything
John Woo does, are the reason to lay out hard cash to see the flick.
Bullets fly. Explosions, um, explode. Cruise does unbelievable physical
things believably and gets a love interest to boot. So the hell with
history and any requirement of logic in the script.
Buy the extra big popcorn and stick to the small soda. This sequel is
less complicated than the last one, but if you have to make a quick run,
you'll still miss something important.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Mission: Impossible 2, he would have
paid...
It's a summertime, popcorn dateflick. All sweetener and no nutritional
value at all.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Outside Providence
Rated [R]; 105 minutes
Starring Shawn Hatosy, Amy Smart, Alec Baldwin, George Wendt
Screenplay by Peter Farrelly, Michael Corrente, Bobby Farrelly
Based on the novel by Peter Farrelly
Directed by Michael Corrente
website: http://www.miramax.com
What do you get if you take a Farrelly Brothers movie, strip it of the
sex and the more gruesome physical gags (y'know, like a fishhook through
the face) and cast Alec Baldwin in a supporting role as a blue collar
foulmouth whose nickname for his eldest son is unprintable on these
boards?
You get a very funny coming of age movie, that's what you get.
To be historically accurate, Outside Providence is based on a novel
Peter Farrelly wrote before he and brother Bobby hit it big with flicks
like Dumb and Dumber and There's Something About Mary. As always, no
reference is made to the Source Material, which director Michael
Corrente picked up for a buck at a used bookshop. ...
Set in the Pawtucket, Rhode Island of 1974, dopehead Timothy Dunphy
(Shawn Hatosy) cheerfully helps his wheelchair bound brother Jackie
(Tommy Bone) deliver newspapers while their three legged dog, Clopsie,
limps behind them. With his equally vacant friends Dunphy smokes dope,
hangs out, talks big about girls (though the entire bunch is inept) with
a mouth which his mom would've washed with soap, had she not blown her
brains out a couple of years earlier.
OK, now that we've scared away half of my readers, Cranky'll take aim at
those of you that liked Mary...
Outside Providence, lacking the really cheap humor of There's Something
About Mary, replaces it with something even more interesting. A solid
story, with character development, terrific performances and a moral
ending. Yep. Surprised the hell out of me, too. Not only is Outside
Providence downright funny, it has a moral! Dunphy actually goes through
the kind of character transformation that film students and critics
like. Topping even Shawn Hatosy's performance is the outstanding
best-of-the-year quality work from Alec Baldwin.
After sneaking his bong out of the house -- Dunphy tells his old man
it's a musical instrument, and only the old man's poker buddy Joey
(George Wendt) knows better -- the losers hit the local disco, hit the
bong, and hit a parked police car. Dad ships Dunphy off to a prep school
where it's graduate or go to jail. While you may think this "blue collar
guy in white collar world" has been done to death in other teen flicks,
it is here that a substantial and very sweet story kicks into gear. Most
of the gross jokes fall by the wayside (though one particularly
revolting bit involving spaghetti up a nose will thrill teenboys) as
Dunphy meets, falls for and wins the much smarter, much richer and much
prettier Jane West (Amy Smart).
Yep, opposites attract. That this mook can win the heart of a preppie,
destroy her carefully planned future, regret his actions and make it all
better yields a really sweet love story. That it all came out of the pen
of Peter Farrelly is the bigger surprise. I grudgingly admitted to
liking There's Something About Mary, though Kingpin and Dumb and Dumber
were utterly tasteless and revolting, which is what they were supposed
to be -- not to my taste.
Outside Providence is better than good. It delivers an  excellent story
and great performances by relative newcomers Hatosy and Smart. Baldwin
gets a place on my year end list and George Wendt will surprise the heck
out of all of you. This is a top notch movie, though if you have
problems with four letter words, consider yourself warned.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Outside Providence, he would have
paid...
Damn fine movie. To make an good thing even better, the soundtrack (not
only in the film, but on the CD you'll shell out cash for) is filled
with absolute killer kuts of the 70s: The Who; Paul McCartney and Wings;
The Eagles; The Doobie Brothers; Yes; Badfinger; Free; and the best
track Lynyrd Skynyrd ever graced FM radio with ('cuz I played it daily
back when I was a DJ). For a full songlist and discount purchase option,
click here.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Three to Tango
Rated [PG-13], minutes
Starring Matthew Perry, Neve Campbell, Dylan McDermott and Oliver Platt
Screenplay by Rodney Vaccaro and Aline Brosh McKenna
Based on a story by Vaccaro
Directed by Damon Santostefano
website: http://www.3totango.com
IN SHORT: Perfectly average one joke pony.
Cranky had such a wretched day today that all I wanted was an average
popcorn lightweight flick to make him giggle and make him forget all the
crap that had rained down on him all day long. Three to Tango looked to
be the film that I hoped for, a teevee type comedy with stars I happen
to like.
Be careful what you wish for 'cuz when you get it, it may prove to be
far from enough. Using innuendo, double entendre and overheard
conversations as a driving force for a story of mistaken sexual identity
may work on paper, but it doesn't come off much better than any smarmy
teevee sitcom on Fox (which isn't responsible for this flick). Mix
briskly with as much below the belt humor as you can dream up and it
lays out like this:
Oscar Novak (Matthew Perry) and Peter Steinberg (Oliver Platt) are up
and coming architects (as in please give me this job 'cuz we don't want
to be designing toilets) in the Windy City. They are in fierce
competition with another firm for a $90 million dollar contract to build
a cultural center. The man in charge, zillionaire Charles Newman (Dylan
McDermott) keeps a hot piece on the side, professional glassblower Amy
Post (Neve Campbell). Believing Oscar to be gay, Charles enlists Oscar's
unwilling aid to keep tabs on his babe who he fears may fall back into
the arms of former beau, and professional football, player Kevin
Cartwright (Cylk Cozart). Why does Charles believe the very straight
Oscar to be swishy? See paragraph above.
Oscar and Amy fall at first sight After a long night's talk, and what
feels like half an hour of pratfalls and slapstick gags, all the lovely
first overtures that befit true love leave the pair apart. After which
lover-boy tells girl-on-the side that potential-new-boyfriend prefers
the Other Side of the Force. From there on in its an escalating
masquerade as word gets out, the newspapers out straight-man and a gay
pride professional organization named him Man of the Year.
Gee, what's Oscar to do? On one hand, a $90 million dollar contract. On
the other, a woman who is untouchable in almost every sense of the word,
but not to his (or her) heart. I wanted a lightweight comedy. I got a
lightweight comedy, with more variations on "is he or isn't he" than I
could ever imagine. But, then again, I thought Double Jeopardy was only
fit for teevee and it's been number one at the box office for a month.
So what the hell do I know?
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Three to Tango, he would have
paid...
Three to Tango is probably an OK dateflick if there's absolutely nothing
else of interest to you. It's a curl up and rent flick by this boy.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Free Enterprise (1998)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Free Enterprise
Starring Rafer Weigel, Eric McCormack, William Shatner; Audie England,
Patrick Van Horn, Phil LaMarr
Screenplay by Mark A. Altman & Robert Meyer Burnett
Directed by Robert Meyer Burnett
website: http://www.freent.com
IN SHORT: Geek masterpiece, with many in-jokes
Cranky was picking up his set-asides at the LCS when Stan, the man
behind the counter said to "have a good weekend." I said "I'll try" Stan
said "There is no try." and I knew exactly what came next. It was then
confirmed that I, Cranky, was a geek. Which was a week before I saw Free
Enterprise with a room full of real geeks (and felt redeemed because I
only got a third of the plentitude of in-jokes).
Let me try to explain. Free Enterprise is the story of a couple of LA
based, died-in-the-wool, more-than-major-comics-and-sci-fi fanboys and
how they overcome Geekdom to find real relationships as their thirtieth
birthdays loom larger than LastDay in Logan's Run. Along the way, they
befriend William Shatner who has woman troubles of his own and sees
these young movie biz insiders as a way to get his long cherished movie
project, a musical version of Shakespeare's Julius Caesar, made. Yes,
it's Captain James Tiberius Kirk himself, and the site of Shatner poking
fun at the fanboy idolization of Trek and Shatner himself, is very
funny. Shatner took some pokes at himself on Saturday Night Live a lot
of years ago, but in Free Enterprise he takes down TJ Hooker, too. Let's
look at the geeks:
Mark (Eric McCormack), a writer for Geek Magazine. He's ever had a
relationship that went farther than sex. He's lent thousands of dollars
to best friend Robert (Rafer Weigel) who is intelligent enough to
maintain a relationship, but can't find a woman who understands his
desire to collect Hallmark Star Trek Christmas ornaments and other
tchotchkes. That is, until he meets Claire (Audie England) in a comics
shop. Claire is the perfect woman (pros: cute, reads Sandman, Astro
City, Preacher. Cons: reads Spawn but not Strangers in Paradise. A more
than acceptable tradeoff) PLUS she's got just as much attitude as Mark
does. How struck is Robert? He borrows $60 to buy Uncanny X-Men #266
(first Gambit) on which Claire has scribbled her phone number. That's a
$40 premium over Overstreet. That's love.
As Robert falls out of his small circle of friends (which include
MadTV's Phil LaMarr, a known Trekker) they wonder how to win him back
from the Dark Side; he loses job and most of his life because he's
fallen deeply in love and he can't get up. The Question for Robert is:
When you've destroyed your old life, and then cast away the new, what's
left?
Here's where Cranky's opinion diverges, 'cuz he's seen Free Enterprise
twice. First time out, I was sitting amidst a bunch of critics even
geekier than I. They got most of the in-jokes and lines of dialog copped
from classic SF movies. I wondered what I was missing, got totally
distracted when an obvious steal came at me and I couldn't identify it,
and totally failed to lock in on the story behind the lines. That the
gimmick detracts from the story is not a good thing. We take away points
for that.
Second time out, Cranky was the solo geek. This way, despite the
preponderance of impenetrable in-jokes in the first act of the flick,
the story blasted through. It's a good one. It's about how obsession can
get in the way of developing a complete life. It's about what you'll
give up to make the complexities of a male-female partnership work. It's
about what you will do to help a friend whose lost his way. Through it
all are the recurring appearances of Bill Shatner, proving once and for
all that childhoods heroes are as flawed as Green Lantern's ring.
 Cranky should've gotten married when he had the chance . . .
As of this writing, Free Enterprise is opening only in New York and
Chicago. It may be that the only way you'll get to see it is on video,
which is so totally appropriate for geekdom the irony may be lost on us
all. 
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Free Enterprise, he would have
paid...
which is dateflick level. This is the kind of flick a former gal friend
would have "endured" because it's subject was more appealing to me. I
think the romantic subplot would have surprised her. As always, your
reactions are welcomed on the message boards.
[and composer Scott Spock does a neat trick of lifting enough musical
notes from Trek themes to cue you in, but not enough that original
composers Alexander Courage or Fred Steiner have to be paid. Producers
like that kind of effort. Cranky's cousin Fred doesn't . . .]
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Guinevere (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Guinevere
Starring Sarah Polley, Stephen Rea, Jean Smart, Gina Gershon, Paul
Dooley, Carrie Preston, Jasmine Guy
Written and Directed by Audrey Wells
website: www.miramax.com
Didn't we see enough magazine articles about Hollywood's predilection
for teaming older actors and way too young for them actresses ad nauseam
in the past year? At least in the case of Guinevere the perpetrator is a
female, the writer of the most excellent The Truth About Cats and Dogs,
Audrey Wells. Wells makes her directorial debut with Guinevere, which is
a straight romance without any of the gentle humor found in Cats and
Dogs.
To call Harper Sloane (Sarah Polley) anything other than wallflower
would be an exaggeration. She hides behind closed doors, bottle in hand,
at her sister's wedding; Asks the wedding photographer to leave her out
of the photographs; Doesn't understand why the shutterbug, Cornelius
"Connie" Fitzpatrick (Stephen Rea) calls her "Guinevere". As we will
discover, it's an opening line that Connie has used many times before.
Connie's sole claim to fame is his one published book, "Street Glory,"
which connected him with his own patron (Paul Dooley), who bought
Connie's photographs as art. In between, he shoots weddings to pay the
end of the month rent on his industrial loft. Which brings us full
circle.
Like the mentor/student story of artists Alfred Steiglitz and Georgia
O'Keefe, referenced in the flick, Connie takes unfocussed young chicks
under his wing and puts them to work, discovering their creative sides
in photography, art, painting, or other creative processes. It's a good
thing to be a mentor, to guide the young on a path towards some
manifestation of enlightenment and, if you get a little on the side, or
in the darkroom, or on the roof, so much the better . . .
Stephen Rea brings his droopy dog-eyed look to the screen and Sarah
Polley is occasionally flitty, but why the pair connect on an emotional
level is quite beyond me. There's no sense that Connie is the proverbial
"dirty old man" though, as we meet earlier Guineveres (including Jasmine
Guy and the more prominent Gina Gershon) a pattern emerges. Harper's
family, believing that she is away at college, is initially deceived.
When Mom (Jean Smart) discovers the relationship, she reacts with a cold
fury and a savage verbal deconstruction as to Connie's motives. This
scene alone is worth the price of a ticket and earns Smart a place on my
end of year "best" list.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Guinevere, he would have paid...
Pay per view level. Guinevere is just an OK flick for the indie arthouse
circuit.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Being John Malkovich
Rated [R], 112 minutes
Starring John Cusack, Cameron Diaz, Catherine Keener,
Orson Bean, Mary Kay Place and John Malkovich
Screenplay by Charlie Kaufman
Directed by Spike Jonze
website: www.beingjohnmalkovich.com
IN SHORT: A great film. Like nothing you've ever seen, or even conceived
in your wildest film fantasy dreams. . .
Unless you dream of Cameron Diaz as a plain Jane, frizzy haired brunette
who is bound, gagged and locked in a cage with a diaper wearing,
psychologically damaged chimpanzee named Elijah while her puppeteer
husband inhabits John Malkovich's head as said actor has sex with said
husband's business partner and lust object. . .
Way beyond anything conceivable, right? Once again the pairing of a
first time screen writer (Charlie Kaufman) and first time big screen
director (Spike Jonze) have floored this critic. Being John Malkovich
works so brilliantly that every outlandish gag or situation makes
perfect sense. The hard part for me is figuring out how much to tell you
without a) spilling too much and b) sounding like I'm out of my mind for
recommending something that sounds insane.
>From the opening titles, in which you see puppets manipulated in ways
that are physically beautiful and poetic, to the matter of fact
introduction of a building with a 7½th floor and beyond, almost
every scene in Being John Malkovich pushes the envelope in how it tells
its story. Jonze, best known as a video director, doesn't let his vid
chops get in the way of telling the story. Kaufman manages story
elements that are so disparate that you never figure out how they relate
to each other until it's too late.
We start with puppeteer Craig "not based even remotely on anyone in
Cranky's birth family ", Schwartz (John Cusack), who demonstrates
notable chops with his string-ed creations. Problem is, his puppet plays
use themes that are classic and very adult and, well, parents are more
likely to pop him one in the mouth than put coins in his beggars bucket.
The breadwinning part of this basement apartment inhabiting pair is
Lottie (Cameron Diaz) who works in a pet shop and provides tender loving
care to the wounded, traumatized and otherwise deficient animals she
brings home. Needing cold hard cash, Craig takes a job as a file clerk
in the LesterCorp office on the 7 ˝ th floor of Manhattan's
Mertin-Flemmer office building.
There's a very funny joke hidden in that last piece sentence, made even
funnier in the film as Kaufman's script makes no effort to milk it for
all it is worth. Most of the jokes and absurdities in Being John
Malkovich are laid out in a matter of fact style that, if you go with
the proverbial flow, you'll find yourself sucked into the hilarity of it
all.
That needs more explanation: One day at work, Craig drops a file behind
some cabinets. After moving them, he discovers a boarded up doorway in
the wall, with a tunnel on the other side of it. The tunnel, gooey messy
thing that it is, transports Craig into the mind of John Malkovich,
actor, 2 time Academy Award nominee and so on and so forth. After about
fifteen minutes of FirstPersonPOV, Craig gets ejected from JM's head and
dumped on the side of a highway in New Jersey.
Lust Object Maxine (Catherine Wheeler), who is attractive to both men
and women and knows it, also works on 7 ˝ . Craig, smitten, reveals the
existence of the "portal". Maxine writes up a business plan, getting
real folks to pay $200 a pop for the opportunity to experience life from
the first person point of view of Malkovich. The money comes rolling in.
Maxine also seduces the real victim, Malkovich who, when he gets wind of
the scheme, goes headfirst down the tunnel. What John Malkovich sees
while "being" John Malkovitch is so blisteringly funny that . . . well,
that's all you need to know. The movie still has an hour to go, with a
pair of love triangles yet to come. It gets better all the way to the
end.
Outstanding in supporting roles are Mary Kay Place as LesterCorp's
receptionist, who suffers from what can only be called dyslexia of the
ear and Orson Bean as her horny as hell, 105 year old boss. [The first
words out of Bean's mouth when he sat for CrankyCriticŽ StarTalk were
"betcha thought I was dead!" -- click for more with Bean, Malkovich,
Cusack, Diaz (and the rest...)]. Across the board,
performance and script and direction are all noteworthy
The next time Barry Diller buys a down on its luck company, Cranky's
gonna buy stock. USA Films hasn't had a major dud yet, and it's getting
so bad their publicists are laughing at me when I come calling, saying
"You're not so Cranky!" I hate that . . .
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Being John Malkovich, he would have
paid...
Oscar nomination level. Yeah, you'll be seeing this level as we get
closer and closer to statue time. We rarely see one film a year that
sets a new high mark or, to use a cliche, breaks the mold. Being John
Malkovich is the second of this year. Unlike "Run Lola Run," no
subtitles are required.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Gossip (2000/I)
Cranky has seen it before . . . when an kidlet audience heartily laughs
at "serious" (and non-comedic) lines coming out of a character's mouth
and still walks out saying they "liked" the film, that means I'm way too
old to be doing this job. That's as good a way as any to analyze Gossip,
which brings to the big screen a visual style that crosses teevee's NYPD
Blue and Miami Vice and takes a story grounded in reality and shoots it
off into the absurd like a skyrocket on the Fourth of July. That it has
a 1950s-ish stylish look to it can be attributed to producer Joel
Schumacher and that it looks like telly is no diss on episodic NYPD Blue
director Davis Guggenheim. What it is is what it is, and that is
nonsense.
Gossip is the story of students Derrick (James Marsden), Jones (Lena
Headey) and Travis (Norman Reedus) who, as part of their end of semester
final project for Professor Goodwin (Eric Bogosian), start a rumor about
a classmate to see where it leads. The rumor is that the very rich and
very pretty Naomi (Kate Hudson), whose rep for saying "no" to all the
boys on campus is the stuff of legend, got insanely drunk at a party and
put out for current would-be beau, coincidentally named Beau (Joshua
Jackson). The rumor, as rumors are wont to do, runs speedily out of
control and the next thing you know, Naomi has filed date rape charges
against Beau. And people start dying.
If Gossip had stayed on that course, it might have turned into something
interesting. As it throws gimmick and plot twist at you, again and
again, it quickly loses any sense of rhyme or reason. One of the
principal trio has old baggage re: Naomi to resolve. One may be a
psychotic sociopath. One is flat-out called a liar by the police
detective (Sharon Lawrence) investigating the "rape". One flat out lies
to the cop (Edward James Olmos) that shows up at the door. And all but
one may be scamming everyone else. That's five characterizations for
three characters and we haven't even begun to delve into the backgrounds
of Naomi and Beau . . .
What it all means is that, if you're still around nineteen or so, you
might buy into the big surprise plot twist and story revelations that
mark the conclusion of this piece o' junk (pretty much the reactions of
the audience I sat with). If so, answer the follwing question before you
dissmail Cranky: Why possible motivation did [you-know-who #1] have for
setting up [you-know-who #2] (said motivation must lie before the rumor
at the center of the piece starts getting spread, else any answer you
can come up with makes no sense whatsoever). While the kidlets are
working on that, let's talk about why films that try to look like NYPD
Blue don't seem to work on teevee, despite inflated budgets that allow
for the breakage of every piece of glass in sight.
It's 'cuz we see it every week on NYPD Blue which, even on its bad
weeks, still manages to cram a full story into less than an hour. Given
the luxury of a larger time frame writers Gregory Poirier and Theresa
Rebeck, basically, thought way too much and delivered a story that
collapses under the weight of its own cleverness (and explaining that
means giving away the end of this story, which we don't do). Personally,
we don't like walking out of a flick thinking "huh?" and we sure don't
like it when a director and/or writer falls back on visual gimmicks like
a lingering camera, as if to scream "BAD GUY! HERE'S THE BAD GUY!" And
to tell you that that lingering camera bit is just a deception layed on
top of a deception would mean we're breaking the rule about not tipping
the end. Sort of.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Gossip, he would have paid...
Pretty actors and half a story. Wait and rent.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ  movie reviews: Stir of Echoes
Rated [R], 107 minutes
Starring Kevin Bacon, Kathryn Erbe, Illeana Douglas, Kevin Dunn, Zachary
David Cope
Based on the novel by Richard Matheson
Written and Directed by David Koepp
website:http://www.stirofechoes.com
There's a big difference between knowing the "how" of a situation and
the "why," which is the case in Stir of Echoes, which begins as somewhat
of a ghost story and wraps as a murder mystery. As with an unrelated
earlier flick of this past summer, once again there is a kidlet who
talks to ghosts. A more intriguing bit of background about the boy's
talents seems to have been left in the original novel by Richard
Matheson. It's hinted at in writer/director David Koepp's screenplay,
but those hints are left tantalizingly dangling and, as always, we don't
compare to the Source Material. But we're pretty well intrigued . . .
Stir of Echoes drops us smack in the middle of a nice, law abiding blue
collar Chicago neighborhood. It is the story of PhoneCo. lineman Tom
Witsky (Kevin Bacon), his wife Maggie (Kathryn Erbe) and 7 year old son,
Jake (Zachary David Cope). Also in the picture is Maggie's sister Lisa
(Illeana Douglas), whom Tom, to put it kindly, tolerates. One night at a
party, Tom allows Lisa to hypnotize him knowing that he'll probably be
made to prance around like a chicken. That may have been the case but,
when all is done, Tom comes away a different person. He is tormented at
random by dreadful and horrible images -- there's no slice n dice in
this flick but a pair of gruesome fast cuts will make you reel in shock
-- and becomes prescient, sensing things as they are happening or are
about to happen. While these blasts of images seem to foretell the
future, they don't provide enough information to clue him in on what he
can do about it. Net result? Tom goes, to all intents and appearances,
crackers.
They should have seen it coming -- it runs in the family.
The grownups thought kidlet Jake had an "imaginary" friend named
Samantha. But she passes information to Jake that no one could know.
That leads to some very hairy moments when it turns out that Samantha
was real, a neighborhood kid who disappeared some months before. Jake's
got some other abilities, too. He seems to be "connected," seemingly at
random, to strangers. He is on a first name basis with people he has
never met and one of them, one of Chicago's finest, clues Maggie in to
an entire world of "openers," people with connections to the "other
side". Jake is one. So, now, is Tom. And damn if Cranky didn't want to
know more about this aspect of the story, but that is not to be.
The main story of this movie is the total crackup of this lineman for
the county and his link to the girl who disappeared months before. How
it affects his life and threatens his family. David Koepp's script
dangles enough clues in front of you that, with minor effort, you'll see
most of the solution to the mystery coming a ways off. As I wrote
earlier, knowing the how doesn't mean you'll know the why. Stir of
Echoes has enough depth that you'll still be interested in discovering
the details that you haven't copped to earlier. Kevin Bacon's Tom cracks
up beautifully, but Cranky found himself aware that there was just too
much of it, almost as if the story stopped so we could watch the actor
act. Luckily, Kathryn Erbe's Maggie keeps everything on an even keel as
we watch how her loving wife deals with the collapse of everything she's
known.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Stir of Echoes, he would have
paid...
A little less than dateflick level. Overall, Cranky liked Stir of
Echoes, enough to reco a theater ticket though you won't feel cheated if
you wait for pay per view.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie Reviews: Inspector Gadget
Rated [PG], 87 minutes
Starring Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Joely Fisher
Story by Dana Olsen and Kerry Ehrin
Screenplay by Kerry Ehrin and Zak Penn
Directed by David Kellogg
website:http://disney.go.com/DisneyPictures/gadget/
Matthew Broderick and Cranky agree on at least one thing; we're both too
old to have known Inspector Gadget from his teevee toon incarnation.
Cranky doesn't compare to Source Material and Matthew discusses his
angle over in StarTalk">http://www.crankycritic.com/qa/matthewbroderick.htm">StarTalk
(we were discussing a different movie, but Cranky thinks ahead).
>From an adult point-of-view, Inspector Gadget is a blend of Robocop and
Get Smart (whose star, Don Adams, voiced the cartoon Gadget and
contributes a voice cameo to this flick). For kidlets, Inspector Gadget
is the ultimate in cool. With 14-foot long telescoping legs, helicopter
blades that pop out of his head, high tech spy gadgets built into every
fingertip (not to mention a toothbrush and toothpaste dispenser --
cleanliness is next to Gadget-ness, you know) he's every fantastic
single digit kidlet fantasy come to life.
Or as my 6-year old nephew puts it: "Gadget is so totally awesome."
Since the neph wasn't available to sneak peak Inspector Gadget with the
best uncle in the world, me, Cranky sat himself down amidst a bunch of
parents who had brought their kidlets. We watched security guard John
Brown (Matthew Broderick) get transformed into uber-cop Gadget to track
down the evil villain Sanford Scolex, aka Claw (Rupert Everett), killer
of kindly inventor Artemus Bradford (Rene Auberjonois), father of the
girl John has his heart set on Brenda Bradford (Joely Fisher). We
thrilled to the utter intelligence of John Brown's niece Penny (Michele
Trachtenberg) 'cuz, as sweet as her uncle is, Gadget is a bit of a dim
bulb.
Good thing Gadget has a spare bulb in his hat, which pops up and flashes
bright yellow when he has an idea. With a surplus of cartoon imagery, us
old folks (those with attention spans that last longer than 40 seconds
or so) will be totally lost inside of the world of Gadget. Inside that
world is a fast talking super-car, the Gadgetmobile (voiced by D. L.
Hughley) built for comfort. The car not only has it's own bunch of super
gadgets, it has built in Skittles, Coca-Cola and Big Mac dispensers.
[Think about it for a second; with VCR systems now being built into
mini-vans, how long is it going to be before mini-microwaves and
refrigerators join the party?]
There's a pair of below the belt jokes that are aimed strictly at adults
-- kids'll laugh at the slapstick without feeling our pain -- and enough
references to old flicks (Mission Impossible, Mary Poppins, Godzilla to
keep our attention from flagging, but Gadget ain't for us. But we knew
that walking in. I'll let the film students complain about visual and
continuity errors, of which there are many, or a story that barely holds
together. Cranky writes for the grownups, all of whom will want to know
if Inspector Gadget is fit for their kids. Yep. No doubt about it.
So, don't be complaining about the rating, 'cuz that's for the adults,
all of whom will take the kidlets to the theater, then rent this flick
until they give in and buy it.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Inspector Gadget, he would have
paid...
Rental level for reasons previously stated. Every kidlet I talked with
or eavesdropped on, most in the 6 - 9 year old range, were thrilled by
Inspector Gadget, and wanted to see it again.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Luminous Motion (1998)
IN SHORT: another very cool psychological stomach turning twist movie
(and we never saw it coming)
A couple of other reviewers and I looked at each other after seeing
Luminous Motion last March and, basically, said to each other "what the
**** was that???" I can only speak for me when I write that my reaction
was extremely positive. What appeared, at first, to be another tale of a
fleeing parent on the road turns into an entirely different kind of
nightmare.
Right from the start, ten year-old Philip (Eric Lloyd), the first person
narrator of this little tale, tells us that his memories of his
childhood are like a ghost town. He isn't sure what was real and what
was illusory. As he guides you through a year on the run, from the law
and from his dad (Jamey Sheridan) with his mom (Deborah Kara Unger), you
won't be fully sure if the hard edged candy coating on the story is a
set up for a psychological mind shock that you'll never see coming. And
if you accept what you see before your eyes, the growing anticipation of
a horror even worse will leave you restless in your seat.
It's obvious that Phillip isn't exactly living a healthy lifestyle. His
point of view is the back of his mom's Chevrolet Impala. Philip gets to
check out each guy mom picks up for the night; gets to hear the blow by
blow encounters, compliments or descriptions, while he tries to read his
science books by the glare of neon lights. His normal life includes a
mom who likes to drink; who likes to pick up guys who like to drink. Mom
can out drink and out-sleep 'em all and, when morning comes around, she
walks out with wallets and watches and everything in the motel room that
she can get her hands on. Phillip keeps it all safe in a strongbox
stored under the car seat. They both track their journey on a map -- so
as not to hit the same town twice. Always watching for the law. Always
on the run.
It's the kind of life that might be exciting at seven or eight -- think
of the adventure of roaming "the world"; the cheap thrill of petty theft
and flight to avoid prosecution -- and it is. To Phillip. Mom is getting
tired and, after an automobile accident that almost totals the Impala,
she finds a good place to settle down, with a carpenter named Pedro
(Terry Kinney). Both adults are thinking permanent relationship but
Phillip wants to get back on the road with his mom. Phillip gets his way
and how he does comes at the moment when Luminous Motion moves into the
realm of the truly creepy.
Dad finds them anyhow. Philip starts accepting advice from beyond the
grave, though there is no resemblence to surprise as in The Sixth Sense.
Director Bette Gordon uses a simple optical effect to make you think you
know when Philip is seeing reality (versus his admitted fantasy world)
but it's a sucker punch that will have you squirming in your chair
before you see it coming.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Luminous Motion, he would have
paid...
No big stars. No big studio or ad budget. This is the kind of arthouse
flick that crits like Cranky crow about. Every once in a while a really
good one comes along that may have no chance. Hopefully you'll get the
chance to see this one.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for My Life So Far (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie Reviews: My Life So Far
Starring Colin Firth, Rosemary Harris, Irene Jacob, Tcheky Karyo, Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Robbie Norman and Malcolm McDowell
Screenplay by Simon Donald
Based on "Son of Adam" by Sir Denis Forman
Directed by Hugh Hudson
website: http://www.miramax.com
My Life So Far is the kind of slice of life old school stories that
print critics wax poetic over. I could see calling it a well-acted,
intimate portrait of a puritan Scots family confronted by the deadly
sins of lust and greed, while dealing with a young boy's awakening
sexual curiosity. That's fair, but it doesn't relay the fact that this
flick is a dud.
Cranky has thought long and hard about why this beautifully photographed
film falls short of expectations -- director Hugh Hudson and producer
David Puttnam last worked together on Chariots of Fire; Puttnam is
responsible for the most excellent and highly recommended Local Hero. My
conclusions after the synopsis.
Set in Argyll, Scotland in 1927 My Life So Far is narrated by 10 year
old Fraser Pettigrew (Robbie Norman), a red haired, blue eyed cutey. His
father Edward (Colin Firth) is a bit of an eccentric inventor, whose
obsession with creating products out of moss brings him into conflict
with brother-in-law Morris (Malcolm McDowell). Morris, a self-made
millionaire, wants control of the family's estate, called Kilronan,
currently lorded over by his mom "Gamma MacIntosh" (Rosemary Harris).
Not only is Morris rich, this sixty-ish gent is sporting a brand-new
24-year old French wife named Heloise (Irene Jacob) whose affection for
young Fraser makes daddy Edward jealous. Wife Moira (Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio) keeps a stiff upper lip when she uncovers evidence of
Edward's infidelity.
Fraser narrates the story and, from time to time, inflicts bits of
wisdom gleaned from his deceased Grandfather's "Encyclopedia of Ethics"
into the family conversations. Problem is, the "encyclopedia" documents
various sexual peccadilloes and practices that the ten year old is way
to young to understand -- he suggests, for example, that his mother and
new aunt engage in the practice of prostitution to raise money to aid
the poor.
Yes, it's funny. Kidlets talking dirty always is, especially with the
upper class language that is the territory of this tale. But having a
ten year old, who has no conception of the sexual conflicts raging among
the adults around him, narrate the tale does nothing but hinder the
greater story. While Edward explains to Fraser that Beethoven is the
music that God dreams while Jazz is music that the Devil creates, the
boy is too young to understand the sexual subtext that jazz brought to
the 1920s. And this flick is packed with sexual symbolism. Hudson does a
visual dance around the question of whether Edward raped Heloise, or if
their one and only dalliance was consensual. (It's hard applying 1990s
standards to a 1920s setting. What may have been considered sexual
pressure as little as twenty years ago is considered "rape" today.) It
matters not to Moira, whose emotions are bottled up until the very end
of the flick.
Sorry, Cranky's writing like a film student. It happens from time to
time. But there's only a paragraph or so to go, so hang in there.
The print critics may rave about fine acting performances, and there are
two to be mentioned here: Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, who has little to
say, and must bear her emotional consternation silently; Malcolm
McDowell, as the loud (sic) I-know-better-than-you uncle whose character
is a flame burning in an emotionally dense fog. As good as this pair
are, it's not enough to recommend My Life So Far.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to My Life So Far, he would have
paid...
A Dud's a dud, regardless of the big name's attached.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Teaching Mrs. Tingle
Rated [PG-13], 93 minutes
Starring Molly Ringwald, Katie Holmes, Helen Mirren, Marisa Lesley,
Barry Watson
Written and Directed by Kevin Williamson
website: http://www.dimensionfilms.com
IN SHORT: Teen dateflick. Not Scream-type horror but fairly enjoyable.
Cranky has found himself making references to his film school
screenwriting teacher in several of the reviews he's composed this week.
So, since it's appropriate to the subject at hand, let us now recall our
first efforts at screenplay writing, the stuff we hold near and dear to
our hearts. A television producer friend, under the guise of making the
move to the big screen, exercised his energy on a bad story that
exorcized the demons of his divorce and the painful process of returning
to dating hell as a nigh on middle aged guy. Cranky spent four years
novelizing the events of the accident that created him (an easier read
on the history pages).
Kevin Williamson took aim at a teacher he once had who advised the
future creator of Scream and Dawson's Creek that he had no foreseeable
future as a writer. It is that first, and previously unproduced, effort
that Williamson has resurrected as his directorial debut, Teaching Mrs.
Tingle. For some reason, the humiliated student in the movie is female.
We'll chalk that up to "keeping a distance from the subject".
The pre-release Internet buzz on this one was so bad, it was hard to
lock out. The teenboys over at AICN are way off the mark in their disses
about Teaching Mrs. Tingle for the very simple reason (I'm guessing
here) that they were expecting another Scream or I Know What You Did
Last Summer or The Faculty, in short, Williamson's usual thriller and/or
scareflick. Teaching Mrs. Tingle is a different animal. It is a
psychological battle between teacher and student, less about criminal
acts and more about mental control. It is not a bad flick.
Leigh Ann Watson (Katie Holmes) comes from a single-mom-with-two-jobs
household (Lesley Ann Warren plays mom). Leigh's a great student, she
needs to land the valedictory position to get a college scholarship. In
her way is Trudy (Liz Stauber), a rich kid and history teacher Mrs.
Tingle (Helen Mirren), a mean, nasty, tight assed witch of a teacher who
scares, humiliates and gently blackmails students and school
administrators with verve and skill. Rounding off the principal cast are
Leigh's best friend Jo Lynn (Marisa Coughlan), who has the hots for
second generation slacker Luke (Barry Watson). Luke prefers Leigh but
had his chance, blew it, and knows it. Thinking it would help Leigh land
the number one slot, Luke gets his hands on a copy of Tingle's final
exam and offers it to Leigh and Jo Lynn. Leigh turns it down, but Tingle
catches 'em in the act. Drop the curtain. Close the show. Leigh's life
is over.
That night, the three go to Tingle's house to plead their case; to
convince Tingle that Leigh is as innocent as the Salem Witch profiled in
her final. Tingle won't hear any of it, but Luke magically produces a
crossbow and Tingle is bound to a bed until the kidlets can figure out
what to do.
Talk about tight . . . Tied to the bed for a day the old lady never has
to go to the bathroom. That's control!
And that's really all I need to tell you. From this point on the film
pits Tingle versus Leigh versus Jo Lynn as the teacher spins verbal
spider webs around her inexperienced students. This is also where the
supporting actors add little comic nuggets to the story: Molly Ringwald
(and can you think of anyone better to be cast in a high school flick?)
as the substitute who covers Tingle's classes; Vivica A. Fox as the
sympathetic guidance counselor; Michael McKean as the principal and
Jeffrey Tambor as the Coach, whose secret is so titillating that the
kidlets at the screening I attended were guffawing.
For his first time in the director's chair Williamson does a good job.
There were a couple of visual continuity errors I caught and I'd have to
take another look to see if that crossbow really did "magically" appear
but, all in all, this was a good popcorn flick. The kidlets were happy
and they're the ones buying the tickets to this one.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Teaching Mrs. Tingle, he would have
paid...
Rental for this old fogey. $5 dateflick level for the teens.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
IN SHORT: Start-up sparks fizzle, but not a dud.
Before we start, this is the kind of review Cranky hates to write
because a flick with more positives is going to get what appears to be a
negative rating, if you are a new reader and don't understand how we
work. If that's you Click here now.
So . . . what's wrong with this picture? Nothing, actually. It's a
perfectly average story with an OK script and direction. It is pleasing,
intelligent, humorous and there's good chemistry between stars Linda
Fiorentino and Paul Newman. Once the sparks get pulled out of the story
mix, everything settles way down. The sense of elation that we expect
from an underdog getting away with the big score "caper" flick just
isn't here.
We start on a high school Prom night, for soon to be marrieds Carol Ann
and Wayne McKay (Linda Fiorentino and Dermot Mulroney), the highpoint of
their lives, before and after. Fifteen or so years later, Carol is a
rehab therapist in a nursing home and Wayne works the night shift at an
unspecified job. The fire is almost gone from their marriage, unless a
certain song by The Cars reminds them of what was probably the biggest
thrill of their lives.
Into the home, whose population seems to be 99 per cent elderly ladies,
comes Henry Manning (Paul Newman). Manning, a notrious bank robber,
suffered such a severe stroke in prison that he has been temporarily
transferred out. Slumped in his wheel chair, with only the twitch of his
left hand to indicate that anything at all is functioning within his
body, Manning is essentially dead to the world. Except that Carol starts
to notice things, coincidences if you will, that indicate to her that
Manning isn't the vegetable that he appears to be. She makes it her duty
to try to get a rise out of the man. Literally. (OK, guys. Linda
Fiorentino in a nurse's uniform. Go to town. The flick does...) Until
the lady manages to crack the man's shell, this flick is a very sexy and
very funny good time. And Newman never speaks a word.
Carol's ultimate goal is to put the thrill back in her and Wayne's life.
She's determined to get Manning to teach her how to rob the local bank,
and get away with it. Oh, and Wayne, too. When the hubbie senses that
something naughty may be going on between his wife and the con, he lays
down the law, and Manning says "No problem." From that point on, the
sexual sparks fizzle and we're left with an average caper flick.
Why didn't Manning flee the home? It's covered in the script. How did he
pull off the stroke? It's covered in the script. How does the caper come
about and is it logical that it could succeed? It's covered in the
script. Is there an inevitable twist that puts the plans in jeopardy?
It's covered in the script, a couple of times to keep things
interesting. Where's the elation you're supposed to feel when the
inevitable occurs? Heck if I know. The script has everything it's
supposed to. The direction gets from point A to point B, but all the
pizazz goes out of the story early on. It's up to the director to keep
that chemistry sparking; in this case not letting the leads have any
kind of flirtatious back and forth is deadly.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Where the Money Is, he would have
paid...
Pay per view level. My parents, retired and eligible for dirt cheap
tickets, would love this kind of flick. To those of us for whom Paul
Newman is still a big star name (like me), if there's nothing else out
there of interest you might risk first run ticket prices, if they're not
too much above what your cable system will charge down the line.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Hamlet (2000/I)
IN SHORT: Shakespeare, minus all the drama
The reason William Shakespeare is described as the greatest playwright
ever is that his stories stand the test of time, both in their original
form and in any derivative adaptation. Romeo and Juliet as West Side
Story or King Lear as The Lion King, for example. The difficulty lie in
the language, five centuries old, which is hard enough for a modern
actor to get his tongue around and the sheer length of each play, hours
of screen almost begging for an adaptation which shaves the fat. You can
take a hammer to Shakespeare and not hurt the basic story, if you know
what you're doing. Director Michael Almereyda's Hamlet takes a mallet
the size of a small state to the Bard, mutilating famous soliloquies and
utterly stripping the drama out of one of the bloodiest finales ever to
get the stage sticky with fake blood.
That last sentence assumes you have a vestigial remembrance of the last
scene of Hamlet. If you are utterly new to the work, you will be utterly
lost by the time it ends.
The concept for this adaptation, moving it into modern times and
restructuring the monarchy as a corporation, is intriguing to say the
least. In this version, a hostile takeover within New York's Denmark
Corporation has left its CEO (Sam Shepard) dead, his brother Claudius
(Kyle MacLachlan) in charge and married to the primary shareholder of
the corporation, Gertrude (Diane Venora) -- I'm guessing about the
stock. One of the failings of the adaptation is that it ignores all the
cultural and legal developments of the last half millennium. None of
this sits well with pasty face Hamlet (Ethan Hawke), a university
student who is majoring in video production and will use his skills to
try to bring his uncle down.
Hamlet is also obsessed with the lovely Ophelia (Julia Stiles), sister
of his friend Laertes (Liev Schreiber). Both of them are kidlets of the
"prattling fool" corporate Yes Man Polonius (Bill Murray). As Hamlet's
behavior becomes more erratic, "mad" if you will, Claudius employs other
pals Rosencrantz and Gildenstern (Steve Zahn and Dechen Thurman) to keep
an eye on him. Murder, Madness and Suicide will all work their way into
the story 'cuz Shakespeare was good at that but the adaptation strips
the story of all of its power. All the while, the Ghost of Hamlet's dad
appears to counsel his son and, thankfully, recap what's been going on
so that the audience can follow along.
That almost saves the day. While the brain can usually pierce the veil
of time and follow the path of the language if the actor's delivery is
good, none of the ones in this version of Hamlet are. Shepard's
expository speeches don't click until a third of the way through. Murray
and MacLachlan's don't seem to properly jibe with their new corporate
clothes and Hawke is undermined by the concept. The New York City
background becomes more of a player than the principals.
Almereyda is so determined to work modern technology into every scene
that, in the most grievous example, the world famous "To Be Or Not To
Be" soliloquy is presented on videotape. Hamlet with a gun in his mouth
(just in case you're a completely ignorant git) and those six words
rewound and replayed twice more before the script moves on. Lest you sit
there thinking "huh??!" as I did, the rest of the soliloquy shows up
later, recited in the aisles of a Blockbuster store. I'll let those who
prefer a perfect Bard scream about chopping and reordering the text, I
take the position that the flick should be clear as a bell first time
out, so I can't complain about the text being out of "correct" position.
All I know is what I know and, even as little as I do know about Hamlet
having seen it less than half a dozen times, I know that this version
bites mightily.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Hamlet, he would have paid...
Mid-week rental level, specifically for those who know Shakespeare up
and down. You may derive more satisfaction than I did from the
adaptation. My concern is with the folk who walk in unknowing, who will
walk out the same way.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Drive Me Crazy (1999)
IN SHORT: A teen dateflick, and not a bad bit of story either.
Anybody want to talk Generation Gap? Cranky walked in to the sneak of
Drive Me Crazy, thinking it's title was copped from a Fine Young
Cannibals song back around '86 but, no, it turns out it's from a Britney
Spears song. Oh God, I feel so old. Even worse when it's pointed out
that one of the parental units in this flick graduated from High School
the year before I did. If I had followed my breeder instincts, I could
be lugging my teenkids to the screening (and they, of course, would want
me hiding in the back so they could disavow all knowledge of my
actions). I didn't, so I'm stuck with my fingers in the popcorn while
the kidlets cackle all around me.
And cackle they did. Other aged reviewers were muttering "two weeks and
it's on video" which may be true, but the story is solid and better
written than a lot of the stuff we sit through, and there are enough
demographically targeted jokes (ie. things I didn't get) that Drive Me
Crazy will probably find its proper audience.
Rather than centering around the prom, and all its associated angst and
anxiety, the big party for the students of Timothy Zonin High is the
school's Centennial Celebration. Pretty and popular and on the
Organizing Committee is perky Nicole Maris (Melissa Joan Hart) who, for
all her good points, is still waiting for basketball star Brad (Gabriel
Carpenter) to ask her out. Next door neighbor Chase Hammond (Adrian
Grenier), formerly Nicole's pal and now just the guy next door, prefers
to hang out with the intellectual crowd at the local college coffee bar.
A spat with lust of his life Dulcie (Ali Larter) which coincidentally
hits about the time that Brad asks a rival school's cheerleader to the
Ball, pairs our kidlets in a scheme to win back the perceived loves of
their lives.
Nicole transforms Chase from a Geek to a GapKid, to the horror of his
net-surfin', eGamer friends. She, in turn, learns a true lesson about
the real nature of love. Both of them, to their horror, discover that
parental units have love lives too (in this case played out by Faye
Grant and Stephen Collins as Nicole's divorced parents and William
Converse-Roberts as Chase's widowed dad). There's a full span of kidlet
types filling in the gaps, and all the acting is professional and to the
point. The target is kids. The soundtrack is for kids and the kids
around me munched their popcorn and candy and went home happy. Game
over.
Parents out there who e-mail me about sex and language in these
teenflicks need not worry. There's no nudity and the language isn't any
worse than it was when we were in high school two decades back.
<sigh>
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Drive Me Crazy, he would have
paid...
It's a dateflick for the teens. Painless but way out of the market for
us old fogeys.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Deterrence (1999)
 Deterrence
Rated  [R], 103 minutes
Starring Kevin Pollak, Timothy Hutton, Sheryl Lee Ralph and Sean Astin
Written and Directed by Rod Lurie
website: www.deterrencemovie.com
IN SHORT: Great writing and acting almost sabotaged by poor direction
There may be a lot of argument about the politics (perceived or implied)
of Rod Lurie's Deterrence, that's how well written and acted this
nuclear thriller is. Problem is that Lurie has also chosen to direct his
script, and he's much less adept at that chore. We'll present the
positive, first.
Set in Colorado, early in the election year of 2008, Deterrence is a one
set piece in which all the characters remain, hemmed in by an unexpected
blizzard. There's a vacationing couple (Kathryn Morris and Michael
Mantell), whiling away the hours at Morty's Roadside Diner over a game
of chess. There's a local guy named Ralph (Sean Astin), eating a burger
and playing pool. Katie the waitress (Clotilde Courau) is a
French-Canadian import and Harvey (Bajda Djola) is flipping burgers, as
the owner of the joint. The snow continues to fall as the diner fills
with an entourage of suits and ties who can't make it to the local
airport.
That entourage includes the President of the United States, Walter
Emerson (Kevin Pollak), his Chief of Staff Marshall Thompson (Timothy
Hutton) and National Security Advisor Gayle Redford (Sheryl Lee Ralph).
In Colorado to campaign, the President has left it to his men in DC to
monitor a possible military hotspot in the Far East. While the prez sits
down to a chili-burger, Iraq invades Kuwait and massacres an American
military peacekeeping force.
The options are few. Most of our military units are in the Far East. The
one aircraft carrier in the area can launch missiles that can't be
recalled if Iraq doesn't back down to Presidential demands, broadcast to
the world via an IBS (think CNN) camera uplink that had been covering
the campaign. The only option Emerson offers to Uday Hussein, son of
Sadaam, is retreat or see the city of Baghdad nuked off the face of the
earth. The Iraqis, in turn, offer to turn the Western World into toast,
with their own, and unknown to us, collection of nukes. That's all I'll
tell you about Deterrence's greatest strength; a twisting, turning story
that puts two nuclear powers nose to nose on a course towards what we
used to call M.D.A., "mutual assured destruction."
While all the reg'lar folks sound off about the President's threat,
Lurie has tossed in a couple more layers of background intrigue into the
mix. President Emerson like Gerald Ford back in the Seventies, wasn't
elected to office and thus cannot be sure that he has a mandate from the
people to take the route he has chosen, a route his top aides are
strongly opposed to. As the minutes to deadline wear down, so do the
tempers of everyone in the diner. Great performances by Pollak, Hutton
and Ralph in particular kept our attention fixed on the screen at all
times -- when they are on the screen.
To get there you have to suffer through a hackneyed mess of opening
credits and a pointless mix of artsy black and white and color video
images that begin this flick. It's Lurie's lack of training as a
director that is this flick's biggest drawback, and his training is that
of a respected LA based film critic and writer. Assuming that he sat
through the hundreds of flicks the rest of us do, there is almost no
excuse for making the mistakes that he does (and here I'll shift into
film student mode, 'cuz that's the only way to make it clear).
>From year one of film school, (you) are taught three things: Do Not move
the camera unless you're making a point. Do Not fast cut a sequence if
the edits don't enhance the story telling value. Do Not pad your film
with local color above and beyond what is necessary to set up the story
(most of that is in the title sequence. You are advised to go out for
popcorn once the film starts).
One set shoots are difficult enough for an experienced director, but
Lurie shoots everything in close up. It'll look fine on TV. It's
oppressive viewing on the big screen. Deterrence might have been a fine
successor to Fail Safe. It is not.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Deterrence, he would have paid...
Pay per view level. If your tastes run to the arthouse, feel free to
drop the dollar.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: American Beauty
Rated [R], 100 minutes
Starring Kevin Spacey, Annette Bening, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, Mena
Suvari, Peter Gallagher, Allison Janney, Scott Bakula, Sam Robards and
Chris Cooper
Screenplay by Alan Ball
Directed by Sam Mendes
What do you get when you team a first time screen director (a couple of
Broadway hits under his belt) and a first time big screen writer (a
couple of TV sitcoms)? Usually Cranky gets a massive headache. But
sometimes . . .
I've said it a couple of times before on these pages or in the
occasional radio or TV appearance: Great Films always begin as great
movies. Great Movies must make you laugh or cry; touch you or move you
emotionally; offer characters and/or situations that make some
connection to something deep inside. If a movie accomplishes one or two
of those things, it's probably worth the ticket price. If it does more,
we critics shout to the moon hoping that you readers will pay attention.
American Beauty is the second movie to tackle mid-life crises as the
center of its story. Unlike Election, there is no confusing this flick
with something aimed at, and starring teens, though there is a
substantial subplot dealing with those kidlets. Thus, you can approach
this flick from two angles, which is a mark of expert writing. I'm going
to start with the old folks, 'cuz that's what I am.
American Beauty is the story of Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey), who faces
imminent unemployment after 14 years writing for an advertising industry
trade mag. Living in a contented yet loveless marriage to his real
estate tycoon (at least, in her mind) wife Carolyn (Annette Bening),
Lester is facing mighty hard times. Communication problems plague his
once vital relationship with his now distant teenage daughter Jane
(Thora Birch). Lester wonders about, in a narrative track that
accompanies the flick, where it all started to go bad. Then, a glimpse
of Jane's friend, and almost superstar model slut pal Angela Hayes (Mena
Suvari) in her cheerleader outfit, gives Les the spark he needs. Out
come the weights and the sweatsuit, 'cuz the old man wants to get buff
for the American beauty he fantasizes about.
Yeah, the idea of a 42 year old man fantasizing about a 17 year old girl
is pretty disgusting. Cranky saw it happen to at least one father of one
of his friends and the result was the same: an instant reversion to
teenhood. Spacey's Lester is almost giddy with anticipation and his
complete reversal of character is missing only the zits. Angela, it
should be pointed out, does not discourage the attention and there's a
helluva lot more to this particular plot thread that you'll have to find
out for yourself. Carolyn, on the other hand, is ready to kiss up to the
competition. He's Buddy Kane (Peter Gallagher), the self-proclaimed
"King of Real Estate" and there's a helluva lot more etc etc etc.
The question of "why aren't things the way they used to be" lingers in
the neighborhood as well. The neighbors to the left are Jim (Scott
Bakula) and his partner Jim (Sam Robards). The neighbors to the right
are retired Marine Colonel Fitts (Chris Cooper), his almost catatonic
mom (Allison Janney) and their teenage son, Ricky (Wes Bentley), who has
been stalking Jane and videotaping her every move. This brings
alternative lifestyles, homophobia, Semper Fi stereotypes and some pot
humor into the story.
For the teens out there, the stories of Jane, Angela and Ricky should
provide plenty of diversion. Like most teens, their parents are
embarrassments. Jane wishes her dad were dead. Ricky volunteers to do
the job. But American Beauty ain't no murder mystery. It's a black
comedy whose humor is razor sharp, whose story is so well written that,
even up to the very end, you will sit in your seat working the
permutations on how the inevitable will happen. That's not spilling any
secret -- Spacey's narrative informs you within 15 seconds of the start
of American Beauty that his character will be dead by the end of it.
Whether the cause is natural or unnatural, Cranky won't say.
Writer Alan Ball has done a great job and given the actors all they need
to create great, and living, characters. Sam Mendes, best known for his
direction of the current Broadway version of Cabaret leads you on a
journey from fun to reality that is seamless and sobering.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to American Beauty, he would have
paid...
Highly recommended. Oscar list level. Cranky didn't expect to have to
start thinking about those damned end of year lists for at least another
month but . . .
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
IN SHORT: Major wetworks from an incredibly well written, very funny
script
I feel like I should be in one of the old Irish Spring soap commercials
saying "but I like it too!..."
So here we have architectural engineer Bob Rueland (David Duchovny), a
year beyond the death of his wife Elizabeth (Joely Richardson), working
at a feverish pace to finish construction of a habitat for the great
apes of Chicago's Lincoln Park Zoo. Her dream. His best friend, zoo vet
Charlie Johnson (David Alan Grier) is doing the best he can to get Bob
back into the swing of things but Bob, like his dog Mel, misses
Elizabeth mightily. On one of these blind date fix-ups leads Bob to a
table at O'Reilly's Italian Restaurant. [insert rimshot here]
Waiting tables at O'Reilly's is the equally shy of the world Grace
(Minnie Driver). Grace's backstory is just as mournful. She'd been
bed-ridden since age 14 with a heart condition and, literally at death's
door, received a life-saving heart transplant. A year ago. At the
prodding of best friends Megan (Bonnie Hunt) and Megan's husband Joe
(James Belushi), Grace is only beginning to think about getting out into
the dating world. She's just as happy serving in her grandpa's
restaurant, which brings us back to Bob and a meeting that comes and
goes in the blink of an eye.
But Grace has this unusual feeling . . . Put two and two together. I'll
wait . . .
Now that all the teenboys have finished cursing and left us, and the
rest of you have figured out the what but not the how, we will point out
that there are strict rules keeping donor and donee apart in these
matters and that Grace and [Marty] have absolutely no idea of what's in
store. Grace is incredibly self-conscious about the ten inch scar
running down her chest. Marty is still pining for his lost love. It's a
perfectly serious relationship with no emphasis on sex until close to
the endgame, perfectly in keeping with the film soundtrack of songs by
Dean Martin and Frank Sinatra and Tony Bennett and its supporting cast
of old geezers led by Grace's grandpa (Carroll O'Connor).
As a nod to a long ago television series, O'Connor and pals get stuck in
a doorway. Nothing subtle about that gag but it's great background to an
intelligent, funny and heart-wrenching script that gets where you know
it's supposed to, but doesn't do what you expect it to. I know the
script is also incredibly funny, 'cuz I cracked a couple of smiles while
everyone else was rolling (this before, during and after the tears). I
don't which of the writers (which includes actor/director Hunt) knew
that those of us that are broken (see the History of Cranky for more) refer to ourselves
that way -- no one with any sense of decorum or manners that isn't would
do so -- and when Minnie Driver's character uses the phrase, well, I was
thrown.
But not enough that I didn't laugh at the jokes. Nope. When the
inevitable comes, and this story is inevitable from the get-go, let's
just applaud the fact that it doesn't happen the way you'd guess and
neither of the characters reacts the way you'd expect. What took it's
time as a standard old fashioned romance all of a sudden shifts into
wetworks mode. A femme friend of mine was gushing (my ex would have
drowned in her own tears) and even ol' Cranky got misty.
Driver and Duchovny aren't all that funny, despite the commercials, but
there is chemistry. The best gags come from the supporting cast,
particularly from O'Connor, from a way out of shape (and proud of it)
Belushi and his interplay with "wife" Hunt.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Return To Me, he would have paid...
Substantial laughs on top of a superior chick flick. Something for
everyone in this one.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Blue Streak
Rated PG-13, 93 minutes
Starring Martin Lawrence, Luke Wilson, Peter Greene, Dave Chappelle and
William Forsythe
Written by Michael Berry & John Blumenthal and Steve Carpenter
Directed by Les Mayfield
website: http://www.sony.com/bluestreak
IN SHORT: Fall's first popcorn flick. (and only two weeks early . . .)
So... Cranky mingles with the crowd filing in to see a sneak of Blue
Streak but he's stopped at the door by a press rep demanding... "Do you
need notes?" Has demographic targeting gone so far that a pale guy can't
enjoy a Martin Lawrence flick? Or is it that, after five years of
running the preview route, these guys have finally figured out that I'm
in this end of the biz for the long run? I'll choose the latter, 'cuz
Blue Streak is a decent comedy popcorn flick and good comedy knows no
racial barrier. To put it another way, Blue Streak's script lingo
doesn't drown you in street talk and the music to talk ratio is
remarkably low, so anyone in fear of rap music or slang need not fear.
Here's what I consider interesting. The reviewers who saw Blue Streak
long before me are busy making comparisons to black comedians whose
shadows dominate the field. There's a longer, and sadly long forgotten
shadow that Blue Streak's comedy is closer to, and those are the films
of Jerry Lewis, the guy who does the MDA telethon every year. Those
flicks went like this: Ordinary guy has to go to extraordinary lengths,
usually involving outrageous disguises and impersonations to obtain a
goal. That goal was usually a date with a girl -- it was the 50's.
Considering what Lewis' stock character was, getting a date was almost
as implausible as finding the Holy Grail.
In Blue Streak, ordinary guy Miles Logan (Lawrence) has to go to
extraordinary lengths, including one outrageous costume and one major
impersonation to obtain his heart's desire. This being the 90s, Lawrence
is a hi-tech jewelry burglar who gets double crossed by one of his crew,
and is forced to stash a stolen diamond worth $17 millions inside a
building under construction. When Miles goes to retrieve the loot after
a two year prison term, he discovers that the building houses the 37th
Precinct of the LAPD. To get into the building, he tries to sneak into
the building as a pizza delivery man, complete with Lewis style glasses,
buck teeth and dead on Lewish shtick. It's too obvious to be anything
but an homage, which is why I've spent so much time on the comparison.
That attempt fails, so the only logical next step is to impersonate a
cop.
Which, of course, he does brilliantly, having spent many man hours
watching COPS. Yeah, I've blabbed a gag. The shtick which comes before
and after is plentiful, so nothing's been ruined. The supporting cast,
including Peter Greene and Dave Chapelle as the rest of the burglary
crew, Luke Wilson as the traffic cop turned detective and William
Forsythe as top cop is strong and though there is one point where the
needs of the story force an unbelievable coincidence to occur, Blue
Streak provides a fun time.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Blue Streak, he would have paid...
Dateflick level. Buy the big popcorn and settle in.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
Three out of four ex-girlfriends would have sent murderous stares my way
after watching The Whole Nine Yards, to which I would have calmly
replied, "Hey, I sit through Ralph Fiennes flix for you . . ." (you can
figure out who the RF equivalent was fifteen years back. My brain
doesn't work that good).
At least, at the screening I attended, all the laughter came from the
guys. All the bewildered looks, on the way out, came from the ladies.
For this flick is a another sort of comedic spin off a mob movie genre,
with Bruce Willis parading that sort of smirk that passes for a smile
when he tries to be funny. Don't mistake me, he is funny . . . in a sort
of straight man way opposite co-star Matthew Perry (of teevee's
Friends), who pratfalls and double-takes his way through all the best
gags.
Make no mistake, this is a funny movie in which almost every character
wants another character dead. Sometimes more than one. Everyone, that
is, except for Perry, who spends most of his time trying to figure out
how to keep the killing from happening. Without giving too much of a
convoluted story away, these are the players:
Jimmy Jones aka Jimmy "The Tulip" Tudeski (Willis), a contract killer
who has just settled into a suburban Montreal home. Tudeski is on the
run from Chicago mob boss Janni Gogolak (Kevin Pollak), Gogolak's
enforcer Frankie Figs (Michael Clarke Duncan). His neighbor is a Chicago
born dentist, Nicholas "Oz" Oseransky (Perry) and his Canadien born wife
Sophie (Rosanna Arquette). Sophie is, to be kind, a bitch who won't give
her husband a divorce until she bleeds him dry.
Oz recognizes the hitman. The wife packs him off to Chicago to find the
mobster and arrange a "finder's fee" for turning The Tulip over. Oz has
no intention of tracking down Gogolak but, through circumstances
unknown, Gogolak finds him.
Which brings us to The Tulip's unhappy not-ex Cynthia (Natasha
Henstridge), a permanent "guest" on the Gogolak estate. Cynthia is
considered disposable by both her host and her hubby because, and you
know it always comes down to the money, at stake is a bank account with
$10 millions in it. Finally, there's Oz' cute and perky receptionist
Jill (Amanda Peet) whose character offers the biggest, and funniest,
surprise of the bunch.
The Whole Nine Yards is like a kitchen sink of what's been funny before.
There are the occasional fart and other bodily function gags; a frenetic
pace and judicious nudity; some horrible accents (especially Arquette,
though her exaggeration may be part of the joke); some big surprises
from the characters -- who they really are and why they do what they do.
It is an in one ear and out the other, simple comedy. Matthew Perry's
pratfalls hold it all together and, as I wrote up top, make it work for
us guys.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Whole Nine Yards, he would have
paid...
Dateflick. The Whole Nine Yards is Fairly Painless in the theater and a
sure winner for beer bashes, when it hits vid.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Minus Man, The (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: The Minus Man
Starring Owen Wilson, Janeane Garofalo, Brian Cox, Mercedes Ruehl,
Dwight Yoakam, Dennis Haysbert and Sheryl Crow
Based on the novel by Lew McCreary
Written and Directed by Hampton Fancher
website: www.theminusman.com
IN SHORT: All about Life, in a serial killer's own words. . .
On paper, it's a great concept and one which I can't recall seeing
before. Here we have Vann Siegert (Owen Wilson), a freshly scrubbed
All-American boy with truck, drifting from town to town, meeting new
people, making new friends, spiking their drinks with deadly poison and
moving on . . .
Writer/Director Hampton Fancher's script (he's best known for writing
Blade Runner a zillion years ago) offers us Vann's running commentary on
life the universe and everything else as we watch him settle in to a new
town, new lodgings and potential new girlfriend, Ferrin (Janeane
Garofalo) a co-worker at the US Mail office where he's found work as a
sorter. His landlords are Jane (Mercedes Ruehl) and Doug (Brian Cox),
whose college age daughter has gone missing and who are themselves
bordering on the edge of emotional self-destruction. Rounding off the
cast are a pair of imaginary (?) cops (Dwight Yoakam and Dennis
Haysbert) who are on the track of this killer. There's enough background
in this story to allow you to think the conversations with the cops are
Vann's own creation and rehearsal for an eventual arrest, but this is a
flick which leaves you with more questions than answers, and doesn't
allow any tension to build because there's no sense that the "pursuit"
is anything more than imaginary.
I must have been having a bad day, 'cuz my head kept trying to nod off,
and neither the script nor performances merited that kind of reaction.
The question is: How do you build sympathy for a serial killer? You
can't. How do you build tension when there's no visible pursuit? You
can't. Minus Man breaks all the traditional rules and knows it -- the ad
tag "conversation usually follows" is a perfect description of the kind
of post arthouse screening activity that will invariably happen, 'cuz
this flick is perfect for the arthouse.
The performances are uniformly good, with a most pleasant surprise being
that singer Sheryl Crow holds her own against the seasoned Wilson.
Still, the pace is rather slow and the lack of visible tension works
against it.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Minus Man, he would have paid...
Pay per view level, and where most of the arthouse flicks rank.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Deterrence (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews:  Deterrence
Rated  [R], 103 minutes
Starring Kevin Pollak, Timothy Hutton, Sheryl Lee Ralph and Sean Astin
Written and Directed by Rod Lurie
website: www.deterrencemovie.com
IN SHORT: Great writing and acting almost sabotaged by poor direction
There may be a lot of argument about the politics (perceived or implied)
of Rod Lurie's Deterrence, that's how well written and acted this
nuclear thriller is. Problem is that Lurie has also chosen to direct his
script, and he's much less adept at that chore. We'll present the
positive, first.
Set in Colorado, early in the election year of 2008, Deterrence is a one
set piece in which all the characters remain, hemmed in by an unexpected
blizzard. There's a vacationing couple (Kathryn Morris and Michael
Mantell), whiling away the hours at Morty's Roadside Diner over a game
of chess. There's a local guy named Ralph (Sean Astin), eating a burger
and playing pool. Katie the waitress (Clotilde Courau) is a
French-Canadian import and Harvey (Bajda Djola) is flipping burgers, as
the owner of the joint. The snow continues to fall as the diner fills
with an entourage of suits and ties who can't make it to the local
airport.
That entourage includes the President of the United States, Walter
Emerson (Kevin Pollak), his Chief of Staff Marshall Thompson (Timothy
Hutton) and National Security Advisor Gayle Redford (Sheryl Lee Ralph).
In Colorado to campaign, the President has left it to his men in DC to
monitor a possible military hotspot in the Far East. While the prez sits
down to a chili-burger, Iraq invades Kuwait and massacres an American
military peacekeeping force.
The options are few. Most of our military units are in the Far East. The
one aircraft carrier in the area can launch missiles that can't be
recalled if Iraq doesn't back down to Presidential demands, broadcast to
the world via an IBS (think CNN) camera uplink that had been covering
the campaign. The only option Emerson offers to Uday Hussein, son of
Sadaam, is retreat or see the city of Baghdad nuked off the face of the
earth. The Iraqis, in turn, offer to turn the Western World into toast,
with their own, and unknown to us, collection of nukes. That's all I'll
tell you about Deterrence's greatest strength; a twisting, turning story
that puts two nuclear powers nose to nose on a course towards what we
used to call M.D.A., "mutual assured destruction."
While all the reg'lar folks sound off about the President's threat,
Lurie has tossed in a couple more layers of background intrigue into the
mix. President Emerson like Gerald Ford back in the Seventies, wasn't
elected to office and thus cannot be sure that he has a mandate from the
people to take the route he has chosen, a route his top aides are
strongly opposed to. As the minutes to deadline wear down, so do the
tempers of everyone in the diner. Great performances by Pollak, Hutton
and Ralph in particular kept our attention fixed on the screen at all
times -- when they are on the screen.
To get there you have to suffer through a hackneyed mess of opening
credits and a pointless mix of artsy black and white and color video
images that begin this flick. It's Lurie's lack of training as a
director that is this flick's biggest drawback, and his training is that
of a respected LA based film critic and writer. Assuming that he sat
through the hundreds of flicks the rest of us do, there is almost no
excuse for making the mistakes that he does (and here I'll shift into
film student mode, 'cuz that's the only way to make it clear).
>From year one of film school, (you) are taught three things: Do Not move
the camera unless you're making a point. Do Not fast cut a sequence if
the edits don't enhance the story telling value. Do Not pad your film
with local color above and beyond what is necessary to set up the story
(most of that is in the title sequence. You are advised to go out for
popcorn once the film starts).
One set shoots are difficult enough for an experienced director, but
Lurie shoots everything in close up. It'll look fine on TV. It's
oppressive viewing on the big screen. Deterrence might have been a fine
successor to Fail Safe. It is not.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Deterrence, he would have paid...
Pay per view level. If your tastes run to the arthouse, feel free to
drop the dollar.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: The Bone Collector
Rated  [R], 118 minutes
Starring Denzel Washington, Angelina Jolie,
Queen Latifah, Luis  Guzman, Michael Rooker and Ed O'Neill
Screenplay by Jeremy Iacone
Based on the book by Jeffery Deaver
Directed by Philip Noyce
website: www.thebonecollector.com
The Bone Collector falls into the realm of Thriller, rather than the
slice n' dice generic horrorflick we've gotten used to over the last
bunch of years. In it, Denzel Washington stars as Lincoln Rhyme, a
quadriplegic police detective who has lost the will to live and Angelina
Jolie as Amelia Donaghy, the able bodied cop who finds herself
unwillingly doing all the leg work that he cannot.
Does that sound like a movie pitch line, or what? Of course it does. But
with an A-list name above the credits, you expect more than special
effects, and Denzel Washington is too smart an actor, and too
intelligent a human being -- we've met him. The dude's cool -- to
cheaply exploit a disabled character. Washington told us in his StarTalk that, as an
actor "I realized what a challenge it could be; we didn't even know,
going in, if it would work, playing a guy that doesn't move, could only
move one finger, and was essentially a talking head. The question is:
How do you make that interesting?"
You leave it to the writer, in this case Jeremy Iacone adapting the
novel by Jeffery Deaver, to come up with something interesting and
compelling. If the supporting cast is too small, you make the murders
especially gruesome and the mystery they present especially twisted. In
this case that means someone is roaming the New York City streets,
kidnapping the innocent and carving em up right down to the bone. It
isn't the cutting that kills the victims, it's what happens to them
afterwards 'cuz the killer is far too creative a sadistic sumbitch for
that. Small clues left at the scene, things that only an expert forensic
cop like Washington's Rhyme would understand, are deliberately left
behind. Rhyme, who has finally found a doctor willing to help him pull
the plug, finds the challenge of putting this puzzle together enough to
spark the police brain inside his head back to life. Jolie's character,
who has an instinctive feel for forensics work, is essentially ordered
into the story. Rhyme still commands a full range of police support --
Ed O'Neill as his former partner; Luis Guzman as a high tech
criminologist; Michael Rooker as the police commander adversary who has
problems with a cripple running `his officers' all around the City --
and has enough insurance to cover a full time medical aide (Queen
Latifah, who is especially good). As the murders get increasingly, um,
disgusting, Donaghy finds that her cop instincts are exactly what the
guy in the bed told here they were. Real good.
The Bone Collector gets gory but thankfully director Philip Noyce allows
most of the truly gruesome stuff to happen offscreen. That doesn't make
seeing the results any easier, but the flick never degenerates into a
standard slice n' dice. If that's what turns you were hoping for, you
are in need of serious mental help.
Those of you that have read the history page have probably figured out
that Cranky was paralyzed for a while -- I was wide awake for the very
brief time when my status went from para to quadriplegic and there's
nothing more terrifying than that. Long time readers also know that I'll
nail any flick that screws with the medical aspects of spinal injuries.
There's nothing to nail in this flick. The details are all there, if
you're looking for them but they're all subjugated to the murder-mystery
story, which is pretty damn good. Unlike most adaptations, what made it
from the print page to the screen holds together pretty well.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Bone Collector, he would have
paid...
Hmm... dateflick level for a gory murder mystery. Must be something
about the chemistry between Washington and Jolie that makes it a couples
flick. Tipping you to the one thing that didn't work for me would spoil
the ending so I'll warn those who take pleasure in using their
brainpower to try to second guess the ending not to, 'cuz when you shoot
your mouth off that you figured it out, someone'll hit you.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Bure Baruta (1998)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Cabaret Balkan
Not Rated, 105 minutes
Starring Miki Manojlovic, Sergei Trifunovic, Mirjana Jokovic and Lazar
Ristovski
Screenplay by Dejan Dukovski and Goran Paskaljevic
Based on the Dukovski's play The Powder Keg
Directed by Goran Paskaljevic
website: http://www.paramountclassics.com/cabaret/index.html"
IN SHORT: Arthouse connoisseurs only
Original title The Powder Keg, which is a name Kevin Costner has grabbed
for a flick in development. Thus, the name change.
The Website says: Over the course of one evening various interlinked
stories unravel; A boxer discovers the extent to which his life has been
a facade and fights his best friend in an act of desperate retaliation;
A former Sarajevo professor is too proud to work for the new refugee
mobsters dealing in gas, cigarettes, and other contraband, opting
instead to drive a bus; A young woman, harassed during a bus hijacking,
ends up safely in the arms of her boyfriend only to find that their
lovers quarrel places them in an absurdly dangerous situation. In his
focus on the lives of ordinary people living in the dawn of an awakening
political consciousness, Belgrade-born Paskaljevic masterfully balances
dark comedy with heightened realism, creating a compelling exploration
of the human spirit.
Cranky sat through Cabaret Balkan watching the dehumanizing portraits of
lives in a country on the brink of war thinking, were we bombing the
wrong side? As the various stories play out, there are a couple of none
too subtle remarks about racial or religious background which to
American eyes meant very little. All them Balkanites/ Yugoslavs/
Macedonians look pretty much the same. Nor do the male of the species
come off as particularly enlightened.
Lessee what we've got here. There are a pair of middle aged best friend
boxing and drinking partners, one of whom has admitted to an
indiscretion with the other's long forgotten girlfriend whom he had
promised to watch over. The other "friend" then proceeds to reveal a 20
years long systematic emasculation of his buddy. One smashed beer bottle
in the gut later, the survivor heads off in a drunken haze, boarding a
train with no destination in mind. But there's a blonde on the train
that gets the attention of his stunted little willie and while she
attempts to defend herself from the coming rape, her weapon of choice, a
grenade, works against her. Meanwhile, in a hijacked bus across town,
tough guy with a knife is sexually terrorizing the hostage passengers.
One poor woman, whose legs are spread and stroked by said blade will get
away and call her boyfriend to come get her. The lout who is her
protector automatically assumes that it is the woman's fault that she
was attacked; that she may have derived pleasure of some sort from the
attack and so has emasculated him. Like I wrote, a very enlightened male
populace. The stories get even more unpleasant, culminating in a
lynching and a string of car explosions symbolizing the "powder keg"
that is modern Yugoslavia pushing civilized behavior beyond the boiling
point to utter depravity.
OK film students and arthouse cineastes, this is the kind of stuff you
maintain you like. If it turns your stomachs and makes you ashamed to be
part of the greater human race, then it must be good film and everyone
should see it.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Cabaret Balkan, he would have
paid...
I save the zero for total drek. Cabaret Balkan wasn't drek, though it is
not to my taste. Thoroughly unpleasant and not recommended to anyone
outside of the film student arthouse circuit.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Committed (2000)
IN SHORT: talk... talk... more talk...
It isn't a good thing to be watching the big screen thinking, "My God
Heather Graham is skinny..." because it means that the story that is
trying to grab your attention and suck you into it's world, isn't doing
its job.
Graham holds the spotlight for almost every second of Committed, as
Joline, a club manager who is embarking on her lifelong commitment to
love of her life Carl (Luke Wilson). Carl is a newspaper photographer
who years for the excitement of shooting breaking news stories, but who
is always assigned to take pictures of food. 597 days later, Joline is
planning a surprise birthday party for her hubby, four months too soon,
because he seems to be in a fog. It's more than a fog. Carl walks out
and disappears out West somewhere, sending only a catus picture postcard
as news that he is still thinking of Jo.
To Jo, whose word is her bond, "for better or for worse, 'til death do
us part" means exactly that. Doing a careful budget, and renting a car,
she sets out to find her stray, using a smudged postmark as a guide and
clipping coupons all along the way. The journey leads to Texas, near the
Mexican border at El Paso. Miles of empty ranchland stretch in front of
you and a rickety fence marks the border. If ever there was a visual
representation of "getting lost in the wilderness," this is it. There
she not only finds Carl, she meets and befriends his new girlfriend
Carmen (Patricia Velazquez) and her wise-man grandfather (Alfonso Arau)
who senses in her an untapped power . . .
Actually, anyone with a modicum of intelligence knew from the very first
shot of the movie that Joline was very in tune with witchery. Though
that "w" word is never mentioned, we found ourselves thinking "is she a
good witch or a bad witch?" as the flick played out. Turns out it's a
bit of both and it's a bit of the story like all the other bits of the
story that is underdeveloped and underwritten. What could be comic, as
Joline surveils her hubby's house with brother Jay (Casey Affleck) and
Carmen in the cars behind her, also watching, isn't.
Casey is such an underachiever that, as a counterpoint to his gangbuster
sister, he isn't. Rounding off the cast of half formed characters is
Neil (Goran Visnjic) who lives in the house next door to Carl and gets
turned on by the thought of seducing a married woman. He's out of luck,
as Jo is committed to Carl, as her ongoing voice over informs you.
You're actually hearing the daily journal she's writing about her
commitment to her husband, as well as other observations on daily life,
relationships and commitment. It all reminds us of long ago, heavy duty
college conversations about the same subjects, over well stoked bongs.
Oh, yes it does (not that we have any info about writer/director Lisa
Krueger's modus operandi). Aimed at a GenX audience, Committed would be
perfect for that audience except that it is slow and way too analytical,
in the way that Thai stick induced philosophy is . . . except for the
lack of a good rush.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Committed, he would have paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Get Bruce (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Get Bruce!
75 minutes
a documentary on comedic writer Bruce Vilanch
With Robin Williams, Whoopi Goldberg, Billy Crystal, Paul Reiser Lily
Tomlin and Bette Midler
Directed by Andrew J. Kuehn
website: http://www.miramax.com
The funniest man in Hollywood that you've never heard of is named Bruce
Vilanch. Cranky has actually seen this guy on stage, in Los Angeles in
August '98 at a Hadassah benefit of some kind. Vilanch's opening line
was something about being the only Queen on a stage filled with Jewish
Princesses (ba-DUM-bah) and the rest of his act wasn't nearly as funny.
Which is why I ducked most of the press screenings of Get Bruce! Cranky
remembers watching some of the great pop songwriters of the 40s, 50s and
60s take the stage of The Ed Sullivan Show and proving to the world that
while they could write the hits, they couldn't sing worth a damn.
Writers are not necessarily good performers and even the best performers
need good writers to supplement any idea. Frankly, the star parade of
well wishers and other endorsements that fill the first ten minutes of
what looked to be an ego puff piece of a flick are enough for the
reg'lar folk to give thanks to God for the Second Amendment. Not that
you'll want to kill yourself -- that's the one thing that all of us that
have had the Near Death Experience can tell you will keep you away from
the pearly gates -- but you might feel like taking out documentary film
maker Andrew J. Kuehn for puffery above and beyond.
But then . . . when you get to hear what Vilanch has cooked up over the
past 20 years . . . Get Bruce! gets funny. So wait until the lights go
down before you head out for popcorn. Get on the longest line you can
find and, by the time you get back to your seat, this painful stuff
should have passed like whatever. What isn't painful is the simple fact
that just about anything funny that's come out of the mouths of Bette
Midler, Whoopi Goldberg, Billy Crystal, Robin Williams and Paul Reiser
at almost any awards show you've seen on television has been manhandled
in some way by Bruce Vilanch.
90 minutes of stars telling a camera that a guy is great is tiring after
about two minutes. Watching Vilanch and any of the aforementioned stars
build their material, or recall how they put it together and what was
left on the proverbial cutting room floor is very funny. Clips from
various Oscar, Emmy, Grammy or Comic Relief broadcasts, amateur video of
Bette Midler's early act are great places to start. Watching ABC
Broadcast Standards rep Susan Futterman fumph about the appropriateness
of some of the material brought a giggle to this ex-broadcaster's
throat.
But Robin Williams ad-libbing on camera alone nails the recommendation
which, as most of Vilanch's work seen here was made for the small
screen, is rental level.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Get Bruce!, he would have paid...
Vilanch has made a ton of bucks in the biz and has paid it back with a
tremendous amount of charity work. It was at these charity benefits
where most of the stars seen were corralled for their interviews.
Vilanch has written for the Williams-Goldberg-Crystal "Comic Relief"
conglomeration. Call 800-323-5275.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
IN SHORT: Almost compelling. But you know what they say about almost...
Slow and deliberate pacing is all well and good for the first hour of an
end of the year flick, but when the fireworks at the core of the story
finally hit, it would be very nice if they sustained themselves for a
bit. It would be even nicer if they weren't backed up by a soundtrack
vocal that sounds like the wail of a peasant woman being tortured. But
they don't and they are and good is not good enough in Oscar season.
Michael Mann's The Insider dramatizes the story of a botched 60 Minutes
report on the addictive properties of cigarettes. Botch may be the wrong
word; It wasn't factually inaccurate story -- at the center of the storm
is a fired research V.P. for the Brown & Williamson tobacco company
named Jeffrey Wigand (Russell Crowe). His knowledge of the effects of
chemical additives mixed with cigarette tobacco would eventually supply
the evidence that forced the `Seven Dwarves' (the big tobacco companies)
into a $246 Billion dollar settlement. When 60 minutes was ready to air
their story, the threat of a multi-Billion dollar lawsuit by B&Y coupled
with, and this is how The Insider presents it, the pending sale of CBS
to Westinghouse and all the stock option profits that would be lost
because of such a suit caused management to stomp on News. 60 Minutes
aired an `alternate' story. One which didn't include the on-camera
testimony of Wigand.
Even before the corporate power play, Wigand found himself followed,
threatened, unable to find work in his professional capacity as a
researcher (he became a schoolteacher). His marriage dissolved, and a
high powered public relations firm engineered a nation smear of his
reputation. The man he trusted his story to, who assured him (as he had
so many others) of the integrity of CBS News was Lowell Bergman (Al
Pacino). Mike Wallace (Christopher Plummer) was the correspondent the
story was produced for. Don Hewitt (Philip Baker Hall) is the CBS News
executive who guides, actually he created, 60 Minutes. All but Bergman,
to some extent, folded to pressure from Management (Gina Gershon as the
corporate lawyer who stands to lose millions if the story isn't spiked)
and aired an `alternate' version of the story, masking Wigand's face and
voice in a manner that is downright cheesy.
It isn't hard to disassociate the actors from the real life characters
they play, all but Wallace (and Wigand, if you've followed the story
very closely) are fairly anonymous to the general public. Christopher
Plummer has Wallace's vocal inflection and physical manner down pat --
and all I know about Mike Wallace is what I've seen on teevee for the
last thirty or so years -- and the real life Wallace doesn't come off as
badly as he thought he would. By which I mean . . .
In the real life news biz sometimes telling most of the story can
deliver most of the message. I speak from a couple of years experience
at NBC News (the biggest names I worked with were Jane Pauley and Roger
Mudd). In this case going with the alternate story is acceptable to
Wallace who is facing his last years and worrying about the rep that
will live on. When he reads a New York Times editorial saying 60 Minutes
had `betrayed the legacy of Edward R. Murrow,' Plummer's Wallace is
justifiably cut to the quick and reacts. You get a good sense of the
politics of the newsroom in what follows.
Al Pacino knows how to bring fire and passion to a role. Pacino's
character has a couple of other stories in development and you get a
good notion of what working the newsbeat is like. But when his Bergman
sees his story about to get spiked, he find the alternative
`acceptable.' His efforts to get the real story out should've brought
them ol' fireworks to the screen. The fuse is lit many times but the
sparks rarely fly.
Michael Mann's pacing kills the effort dead. There's nothing that gets
in the way of the central story but, when a lot of that story involves
great soul searching on everybody's part, that means we spend a lot of
time watching people think. That also means that the time devoted to
Wigand and his family, Diane Lane as his wife Liane, doesn't provide
enough info to stab our emotional hearts when she grabs the kids and
runs away from the coming media onslaught. I can't point a finger at
Crowe, he's done too much good work before. I have had problems with
Michael Mann's writing/directing; yes, I know I'm not supposed to
compare films but I'm comparing styles here, and I haven't much liked
Mann's.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Insider, he would have paid...
Wait for pay per view. At this time of year, the longer they get, the
better they should be. With nominations on the line, the contenders get
a more severe looking over. Our nod would go to Plummer's Wallace,
though Pacino is a no-brainer.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Mystery Men
Rated [PG-13], 100 minutes
Starring Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo, Greg Kinnear, William H. Macy,
Kel Mitchell, Paul Reubens, Geoffrey Rush, Ben Stiller, Wes Studi
Screenplay by Neil Cuthbert
Based on the comic by Bob Burden
Directed by Kinka Usher
website: http://www.mysterymen.com
IN SHORT: Inferior Five via Not Brand Ecch!
If it isn't obvious from the X-Men Movie updates on the homepage, Cranky
is deeply into comic books. The creative team behind Mystery Men, from
Bob Burden (who created the team as part of his Flaming Carrot book) to
the folks at Dark Horse (who have a better track record with bringing
comics to the bigscreen, and vice versa, than any of the Big Three) have
peppered this flick with lots of in-jokes that will be readily apparent
to any fanboy. That being said, no knowledge of comic history is
necessary to enjoy the world of Champion City and its defender, Captain
Amazing (Greg Kinnear).
The Captain has done such a good job protecting his city that the only
bad guys left are bands of two-bit villains who steal dentures out of
the mouths of retirees. Crime is down, as are revenues from products
like Pepsi and Mighty White Toothpaste, whose logos make the Captain's
uniform look like that of a stock car race driver. Only the return of an
evil villain, like the scurrilous Casanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush)
can improve the bottom line so, with the aid of bespectacled billionaire
Lance Hunt (who looks remarkably like Greg Kinnear ), the Captain
engineers the parole of his arch enemy and prepares for the epic battle
that will mark the Millennium. The Captain, it must be said, is quite
full of himself. That means Champion City will soon be without a
champion.
If the villains of Champion City are two bit, the remaining superheroes
are even less. There's Mr. Furious (Ben Stiller) possessed of an anger
and rage that makes him, um, angry. There's The Blue Raja (Hank Azaria),
an effeminate British accented good guy whose deadly aim with forks and
spoons (no knives -- knives are dangerous and could hurt someone) is
less than deadly. He's not really effeminate, by the way, its just part
of his superhero act. Last up is The Shoveler (William H. Macy) who
wears a catcher's chest protector and has a shovel.
Turning the superhero genre on its ear yields a flick that is,
thematically, visually and aurally delightful. Virtually all of the
heroes are emotional misfits, Mr. Furious and the Blue Raja both have
problems with their moms. The Shoveler has a wife and two kids to
support (and Mrs. Shoveler has had just about enough). The production
design of Champion City is breathtaking. The high tech talk coming out
of the mouths of the heroes (neuro-laser-hossenpfeffer-chopper indeed)
is dead on loving parody of comic book excess. As in the comics, to save
the day, a super-team of heroes must be built. That means open
auditions, held in the backyard of The Shoveler's house. What a motley
group ...
The remaining superheroes, all third string, include The Bowler (Janeane
Garafalo) whose bowling ball contains her dad's skull; The Spleen (Paul
Reubens), whose silent but deadly power yields the funniest fart joke of
the summer; Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell) whose invisibility power works
only if no one is looking at him; and the mysterious The Sphinx (Wes
Studi), whose telekinetic power split guns in two with and who trains
our team of misfits with instructional dialog that would have been at
home amidst the gobbledygook heard in The Matrix. In this case, it's
supposed to be funny. Rounding off the cast is Tom Waits as the good guy
weapons designer whose guns won't kill; Eddie Izzard (currently star of
an HBO comedy special) and Fugee music star Pras as the murderous bad
guys, the Disco Boys. You know they're bad -- they use guns.
Tomake comic heroes work, you've got to play 'em straight. William H.
Macy is the center of the team, a DC-style man in a Marvel-style group
wracked by self-doubt. Janeane Garofalo, above all the rest, nails the
schizophrenic identity shtick that accompanies the super-life.
Basically, she still discusses her actions with her dad. See it and
believe it.
Mystery Men gently pokes fun at Superman, Batman, the X-Men and at least
one teevee SF superhero (telling would spoil the surprise) and is
definitely one for us boys. On the downside, this is a popcorn flick
that may be too clever for its own good. There's not enough in it to
keep you glued to your seats -- Cranky's gut feeling is that
Frankenstein just isn't bad enough -- ducking out in the middle won't
mean you'll anything vital but, c'mon folks, this kind of cast in this
kind of flick is just too tempting to avoid.
Parents to whose kids Kel Mitchell is a superstar (from Nickelodeon's
Kenan and Kel series) will find no reason to keep their kids away from
the flick, though some of the superhero dialog shtick may confuse 'em.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Mystery Men, he would have paid...
Dateflick level. Mystery Men is terrific eye candy and a fine popcorn
movie if you've got a little boy child locked away inside. There's
nothing here that wouldn't work fine on the little screen, which should
mean a lower rating on the Cranky scale, but it's summertime and lite is
good.
Cast members William H. Macy, Ben Stiller, Janeane Garofalo, Geoffrey
Rush and Paul Reubens (formerly known as Pee Wee Herman) all reveal that
they know diddle about comic books in their Cranky CriticŽ StarTalk. A
good time was had by all.
Best non-comics in-joke: Real life magician Ricky Jay saying to Captain
Amazing: "I'm a publicist, not a magician!"
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
Have you ever had one of those moviegoing experiences where your eyes
were so fixated on the screen that your hand went down into the popcorn
.. . . and stayed there? That you called all of your friends afterwards
and told them "YOU MUST SEE THIS MOVIE!" and when they asked "Why?," you
had to answer
This is not a question of not giving away the ending, like last year's
Sixth Sense. This is a story (screenplay by Toby Emmerich) that is so
well written, with details so intricately woven into the entire piece
that some idiot reviewer somewhere will feel compelled to lay out every
detail and wreck the experience for you.
Not me. You get the bare bones, like the skeleton found out behind an
abandoned diner in Queens, New York. Through flat out sheer luck, NYPD
Detective John Sullivan (Jim Caviezel) gets a match on an old dental
record, showing that this girl was reported missing in 1968. The M.O. of
the killer makes her the first victim of the notorious Nightingale
Killer who terrorized the Big Apple and killed three nurses in 1969, the
year the Mets worked a miracle out at Shea Stadium.
In 1969, Firefighter Frank Sullivan (Dennis Quaid) is loving husband to
wife Julia (Elizabeth Mitchell) and only son, 6 year old Johnny (Daniel
Henson). At night, Frank likes to ride the airwaves of the world with
his Heathkit Ham Radio. There's a lot to talk about on the night of
October 10, for an aurora borealis has lit up the night sky with
brilliant colors that had never before been seen as far south as Bayside
Queens. That night, Frank reached parts of the world he had never talked
to. That night, he stumbled upon another Ham radio operator somewhere in
Queens, named John.
In 24 hours, Frank Sullivan will be killed in a fire . . . unless John
can convince him that, for reasons unknown, they are not talking across
distance. They are talking across time. If John can save his father's
life, his world will be inalterably changed. He doesn't realize that
until it happens and everything he's known for thirty years goes down
the tubes.
Which is all I'll tell you about the first, knockdown, get on line
immediately blockbuster to be movie of the year 2000. Except that Andre
Braugher plays an integral part as a detective whose career spans the
decades and whose path crosses both Sullivans many, many times.
And all the while Cranky sat in the screening room with a blank piece of
paper in front of him and the cap sitting on top of his pen. Not a note
was taken. Frequency is the kind of flick where you can't, no, you won't
take your eye off the screen. It's the kind of flick that falls into the
science fantasy genre and fits so perfectly with tales of time travel
(H.G. Wells started the genre a century ago) and parallel universes (and
no one messed with continuity more than DC Comics did in its Crisis on
Infinite Earths a decade or so ago)
We walked into Frequency without our SF heads screwed on, and ignoring
the press notes that explain all the intricacies and theories about the
space-time continuum and all that stuff. We did have out continuity caps
on, looking for script errors and discrepancies and the story moved back
and forth over the thirty year time period -- and didn't see any. And
while the little scriptwriter in the back of our brain was contemplating
a satisfying ending, by the time it hit, it hit like the proverbial
trainwreck. Frequency is an absolute smackdown. A flat out perfect,
mesmerizing thriller, from the director of Primal Fear (and the teevee
pilot of NYPD Blue, after a run exec producing Hill Street Blues and LA
Law).
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Frequency, he would have paid...
See it twice. Not because it's confusing or because it's so complicated
that you'll miss something. See it twice, 'cuz you'll want to. You will.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for I Dreamed of Africa (2000)
IN SHORT: I dream of a comfortable seat to snooze in.
Africa is a lovely continent and, when properly photographed,
breathtaking in its beauty. Set an incredibly strong story against such
a background (usually a foreigner against the Land and so forth) and the
effect is magnified. When the story fails to connect, to stir the
emotions in the audience, you have the equivalent of a travel brochure.
Such is the case with director Hugh Hudson's I Dream of Africa, which
hits your local movie screen with a sickening plop.
You can't put all the blame on Kim Basinger's one-dimensional portrayal
of Kuki Gullman an Italy-based American widow who takes on a new
marriage and a new life facing the extremely-alien, to her, African
continent. Settling in [Kenya] with new husband Paolo (Vincent Perez)
and kidlet son Emanuele (Liam Aiken). It's the job of the director to
get the best and fullest performance that he can out of his cast,
something the Oscar-winning Basinger is more than capable of. What makes
it to the screen indicates to me, at least, that Hudson seems more
concerned with avoiding controversial topics than with telling a
compelling story. When, early in the flick, Paolo disappears for days at
a time on a hunting expedition Kuki is p.o.'d because she hasn't learned
Swahili yet and has no concept how to run an African estate. Ducking the
question of European domination of African cultures -- heck unless I
missed a title card I'm not even sure what the proper timeframe for this
flick is, which is politically important to the background story-- we're
left with a standard stranger in a strange land story with performances
so bland that there is nothing that resembles a standard emotional story
arc. Lovely scenery, though.
We also found we got suckered by the accents and poor background
development in the first act (Italy). West Coast correspondent Paul
Fischer corrects us:

On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to I Dreamed of Africa, he would have
paid...
An utter waste of time and, in both our judgments, the worst drama we've
seen this year.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Splendor (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Splendor
Rated [R], 93 minutes
Starring Kathleen Robertson, Johnathon Schaech, Matt Keeslar,
Kelly MacDonald and Eric Mabius
Written and Directed by Gregg Araki
A threesome is about all that Splendor has in common with last year's
Two Girls and A Guy, but the symmetry of words was just too damn
attractive to dismiss. And, no, the girls didn't do each other in 2
Girls and the guys don't do each other in Splendor,
writer/producer/director/editor Gregg Araki's far lighter and funnier
flick. That's more comparison than I'm supposed to do, so let's move on.
Poor, bedraggled, dateless starving actor Veronica (Kathleen Robertson)
is lugged to a Halloween rave by her vicious and nasty lesbian best
friend Mike (Kelly MacDonald) who has the hots for a singer in the band.
[Costuming: V's a tampon. M's the tampon box. They're glued together. Go
figure]. Veronica is having a perfectly awful time, not expecting to
meet her Prince Charming but . . . there he is. PC is Abel (Johnathon
Schaech), a polite, handsome, freelance rock critic dorkily dressed as
Prince Charming. It's love at first sight, and the visuals lack only
floating animated hearts and cupids to make it, well, in keeping with
the twisted and very funny nature of the story to be. For just as V and
her PC share their first embrace, the band takes the stage. Behind the
drum kit is Zed (Matt Keeslar), properly described as having "the face
of an angel and the abs of an underwear model." We'll discover that he,
too, is struck, so, what's a gal to do when faced with the daunting
prospect of two perfect, although diametrically opposite, potential
dates?
Hell, do 'em both, says Mike. Which is a perfectly logical thing to do
at age 22. (Hell, it's a perfectly logical thing to do at age 40, though
it's a helluva lot harder on the knees, says Cranky.) It's a very funny
situation, one which could drag on for at least twoor three seasons of a
teevee sitcom, except that this is the movies and the animal vs.
intellectual battle plays out better in small spaces. As in 3 people in
one oversized apartment that none of them can afford. It works for
Friends and it works for Splendor, and we haven't even gotten to the
kink in this considerably less than kinky relationship. His name is
Ernest. He's a director on one of Veronica's jobs. You can guess his
background just by looking at the demographics of our principals. I'll
make it easier by ruling out old, fat and ugly and leave the rest of the
story to your imagination, 'cuz I've said too much.
And what is it about Splendor that has made me say too much?
Interestingly enough, the scenes of the threesome and/or Veronica with
her friend Mike are all so beautiful designed and photographed that
Cranky started thinking, "this looks like a Gap commercial as if shot on
a set designed by whoever did Friends." The digs are too big and they're
overdesigned up the wazoo -- totally gorgeous, magnificent setpieces.
Nothing realistic about any of it, but I can live with that fairy tale
feeling (Veronica did drop the Prince Charming/ Knight on Shining Armor
reference into the descriptive dialog that frames the film as a
flashback), so let's give a proper credit goes to Production Designer
Patti Podesta who did fine work. Here's the interesting thing. The
scenes with Ernest, the super-rich director dude are all grainy, with
the look of a 16mm documentary. Sure enough, DP Jim Fealy has shot both
commercials and documentaries. So what's the point of this divergent
paragraph?
The point is that if the film story were strong enough, Cranky would not
have been distracted by the set design and photography. Again, both are
marvelous. But both draw attention from the story and the story is what
counts. So points off for distraction.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Splendor, he would have paid...
Rental level for this old fart. If I were back in the post-college to
pre-yuppie days, Splendor would've passed nicely as a dateflick. It's
light and funny and most of what you see feels fairly realistic if you
buy the reasoning behind the menage.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Twin Falls Idaho (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Twin Falls Idaho
Rated [R], 105 minutes
Starring Mark Polish, Michael Polish, Michele Hicks; Patrick
Bauchau,       Lesley Ann Warren, Garrett Morris and William Katt
Screenplay by Mark Polish and Michael Polish
Directed by Michael Polish
website: http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/twinfallsidaho/
IN SHORT: Good indie. Well conceived and acted, but slow.
Most start up indie or post collegiate tend to look the same: minimal
casts and locations. Lots of people standing around talking in a script
that substitutes a lot of yadda yadda for character development. Twin
Falls Idaho is unique in that it's reason for being uses a story device
that Cranky has never seen in a non-horror flick, that being that the
main characters are conjoined. That means Siamese Twins to the rest of
us. So Cranky awards extra points for creativity to Mark and Michael
Polish, who split the writing chores and play brothers Blake and Francis
Falls, twins who live in a seedy hotel on Idaho Avenue in AnyCity, USA.
Blake Falls (Mark Polish) is healthy. Francis Falls (Michael Polish) is
not. Both have come to AnyCity in search of Mom (Leslie Ann Warren), who
abandoned them after their birth. On the anniversary of the day of their
birth, they share a birthday cake and hire a prostitute named Penny
(Michele Hicks) who runs for cover at first sight of her johns. But, in
the best gold hearted whore fashion, Penny brings a doctor friend back
to the hotel to have a look at Francis. From there on, a touching
friendship develops as Penny watches out for the boys, even taking them
partying on the one night of the year when their condition is invisible
to the human eye -- Halloween.
As word gets out, Penny's various friends and acquaintances all want a
piece. A gay friend Trey (Ant), wants to shoot photos and wonders out
loud "wouldn't it be tragic if one liked boys and the other liked
girls?" Her lawyer/procurer Jay (Jon Gries) is thinking of the money the
twins could generate; Her best friend Sissy (Teresa Hill) is supportive
and her doctor friend Miles (Patrick Bauchau) is as worried for Penny,
who he sees developing more than fondness for one of the twins, as he is
for the boys. Tragedy is looming, because as Francis gets sicker and
sicker, Penny falls more and more for healthy brother Blake.
The real tragedy is that this story moves with the pace of a turtle.
While teevee star cameos keep it interesting -- in addition to Bauchau
and Warren you get William Katt as the hospital surgeon who will have to
separate the twins and Garrett Morris as Jesus, who injects a well
needed dose of energy into this film.
Overall, Twin Falls Idaho presents a fascinating story of sibling
relationships and, from conception to execution, is a cut above most of
the other indie flicks I sit through. Only its languid pace stops it
from being superior.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Twin Falls Idaho, he would have
paid...
Pay per view level. As with anything independent, you have to be of a
mind to see it. Twin Falls Idaho may find its best distribution on the
Sundance Channel.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Ghost Dog: the Way of the Samurai
Rated  [R], 115 minutes
Starring Forrest Whitaker, John Tormey
Written and Directed by Jim Jarmusch
website: www.wayofthesamurai.com
IN SHORT: Deliberately paced urban samurai flick. Magnificent
performance by Forest Whitaker.
Cranky walked in to the screening of Ghost Dog with two preconceptions.
First: Somewhere in Hollywood there's a guy (sic) in an office who's job
it is to think of various genres that have never been combined in a
movie script before, which is normally as bad an idea as it sounds.
Second: I've never seen star Forest Whitaker give a bad performance.
And I don't know much about the Samurai way of life, for which Jim
Jarmusch's film provides more than adequate background. Each major scene
is preceded by a quote from the Hagakure an 18th century "manual" (sic)
of Samurai thought and behavior. The quotes all have their purpose; they
keep this story to a slow and deliberate pace, not unlike the Samurai we
see in this story, called Ghost Dog (Whitaker). "Slow" is a deliberate
ruse on a Samurai's part. When it is time to battle, he moves like a
cyclonic wind -- quick and deadly. A weapon is never drawn unless it is
to be used; though we see a sword used for practice, Ghost Dog's
preference is an arsenal well equipped with things that go "boom!"
Ghost Dog serves a Master he has seen, prior to the start of this flick,
only twice. Made-man Louie (John Tormey) once saved a much younger Dog
from street thugs. As an adult Samurai pledged to his service, Ghost Dog
communicates through the use of passenger pigeons, cooped near the
ramshackle rooftop shed that he lives in. It's a nice touch, as the
Master/Samurai relationship is as long extinct in the modern world as is
this species of pigeon.
The mobsters we see are middle aged, mostly overweight relics of an
older era. Louie has ordered Ghost Dog to kill Handsome Frank (Richard
Portnow), but the hit is witnessed by the Mob boss' daughter, Louise
(Tricia Vessey). Louise wasn't supposed to be present at the hit. The
boss, Vargo (Henry Silva), orders Ghost Dog to be put down, else Louie
will take the blame. As for the Samurai, there is one more thing you
should know: It is considered the ultimate disgrace to allow one's
Master to be killed (Masterless Samurai are called Ronin, and that film
of Frank Miller's graphic novel languishes in development hell.) While
anyone with half a brain can see the Ultimate Showdown coming a mile
away, getting there is a trip.
The bloodshed, when it comes, is fast and furious. Balancing it all is a
surprising amount of humor in Jarmusch's script, highlighted by a
totally whack performance by rapfan mobster Sonny Valerio (Cliff
Gorman).
Is there enough violence to make the teens happy? Doubtful. Is there
enough characterization and story for us grownups? tons. Cranky hopes
Ghost Dog isn't too slow-moving to break out of the arthouse market.
Whitaker's performance is so well worth seeing, it becomes the first
name on the list we keep locked away until December comes rolling
around.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai,
he would have paid...
Well above the arthouse average and Recommended.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
Within the first ten minutes of For Love of the Game, Detroit Tigers
pitching ace of 19 years Billy Chapel (Kevin Costner) is informed that
his team is being sold and that he is being traded to San Francisco as
part of that deal. He is offered the choice of retiring with dignity,
but he only has a day to consider his decision. In an unrelated move, he
gets dumped by the love of his life, who is leaving for a job in London,
and will miss the Big Game. As Chapel suits up to pitch what could be
his final game as a Tiger, Cranky sat in his seat thinking, gee, I
betcha he pitches . . . [think about it for a second. It's so damned
obvious that my college screenwriting professor would've slapped my
hands with a ruler.]
It doesn't matter. Neither does it matter that I've laid out as much of
the story as I have. For Love of the Game is Costner's third baseball
movie; he's scored twice before with baseball themed flicks and his
record continues to be perfect with the latest, and presumably last
(unless he decides to try on a manager's uniform) four bagger story. For
Love of the Game is a much smaller story than Bull Durham or Field of
Dreams; it's the story of one man trying to figure out what's really
important to him, his life (baseball) or his love. Or maybe a way to
balance both.
As the Tigers take the field for the last game of the Season against the
New York Yankees, in the House that Ruth built, Chapel sorts out the
previous five years in his mind. His random meeting with Jane Aubrey
(Kelly Preston) and the rocky start to their relationship. Its ups and
downs. The player friends that deserted Detroit by going free agent. The
players who weren't good enough to survive a season. A couple of
personal crises that threatened both career and love. When these lapses
draw him away from the reality of the moment, Chapel has his partner
teammate, catcher Gus Sinski (John C. Reilly) to draw him back to
reality.
It's a character driven story, and the only character we get to see
develop and change is the one who is central to all the lives of the
story. Jane and Gus and Chapel's parents all serve to mirror particular
points in this man's journey; it's a role that Costner has played
perfectly before and he does so again. Writer Dana Stevens and Director
Sam Raimi has properly balanced Costner's flashbacks against the current
events of the game in progress. Even if you guess the outcome early on,
the events of the game are so well choreographed that you'll be sucked
into a fannish appreciation. The audience I sat with broke into
spontaneous applause twice as the game played out.
It's a small story. An adult popcorn movie whose only flaw is the almost
nonstop use of songs to drive the emotional elements of the movie along.
The sound mix is so bad that the lyrics drown out the dialog; every time
a song comes up it draws attention from the story. It was overkill for
me, but I paid almost ten bucks to see the flick in a theater whose
speaker cones were cracked, so the mix may not be a problem for you.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to For Love of the Game, he would have
paid...
Cranky has a teevee critic friend that saw For Love of the Game in a
private room last week, and hated the thing. I walked in recalling
Costner's most recent bombs, but walked out with warm fuzzies. The rest
of the crowd, especially the women, were making negative comparisons
between Kelly Preston's role and Susan Sarandon's (from Bull Durham).
That's apples and oranges to me, folks. Even with that negative, the
overall reaction to the flick was positive.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: The Bachelor
Rated  [PG-13], minutes
Starring Chris O'Donnell and Renee Zellweger;
Hal Holbrook, James Cromwell, Artie Lange, Ed Asner, Marley Shelton  and
Peter Ustinov
Screenplay by Steve Cohen
Based on Buster Keaton's silent film Seven Chances
Directed by Gary Sinyor
website: www.bachelormovie.com
IN SHORT: Sometimes hilarious, all in all a not-painful average
dateflick.
Cranky remembers thinking to himself, after viewing director Gary
Sinyor's last flick Stiff Upper Lips, `if you want to produce a farce,
you'd better go really, really big.' That's what we get in The Bachelor,
which is a fairly average popcorn slash dateflick, with occasional bits
of brilliance.
In a film which pushes metaphorical limits as it compares dating and
marriage to the behavior patterns of wild animals, Jimmy Shannon (Chris
O'Donnell) is a wild mustang doing his best to avoid the noose of
marriage that has broken all of his friends and co-workers at the family
owned billiard table manufacturing factory. Three years into an almost
perfect relationship -- she's not pushing for commitment -- with the
lovely, blonde Anne (Renee Zellweger) Jimmy's close enough to the noose
that he's carried an engagement ring in his pocket for over three weeks.
He's also wild enough to keep a box filled with pictures of all the
women he's dated hidden in the closet.
Jimmy makes a dinner reservation at the one place in San Francisco where
all the single men take their significant others to pop the question.
All the gents wait for their dates with the glum look of the condemned
waiting for the executioner -- brilliant moment number one. Moment
number two follows soon after as Jimmy so totally botches the proposal,
in words not fit for this page, that Anne never wants to see his face
again. Anne's got her sister Natalie (an incredibly babelicious Marley
Shelton) to console her, as she tries to figure out what went wrong.
Of course they're perfect for each other. What would otherwise be a
generic break up to make up story raises the stakes by a) making the
botched proposal the talk of the town (moment #3) and b) knocking off
Jimmy's grandfather (Peter Ustinov) whose will leaves the boy $100
million as long as he's married by his thirtieth birthday. Which gives
Jimmy 27 hours to find the one ex-girlfriend willing to marry for money
instead of love.
With best friend Marco (Artie Lang) driving a borrowed limo and a local
priest (James Cromwell) waiting in the back seat to perform the
ceremony, Jimmy works his way down the list. Way down the list. While
each rejection should get more and more outrageous, they don't. All of
'em, including the screen debut by singer Mariah Carey are amusing
enough but they don't build up to the big climax, a totally desperate
marriage ceremony to the ex from Hell, played by Brooke Shields. I won't
spill how that one comes apart save to say it sets up what you've seen
in the teevee commercials; what I label brilliant moments numbers 4 and
5. #4 is how hundreds of women show up at the last minute and #5 is how
they react when Jimmy realizes that he can't say `I do' to anyone but
his true soul mate, Anne.
Cranky said he wanted to see `big' in farces and The Bachelor saves, and
delivers same, for the end of the tale. When all is said and done, this
is a perfectly OK flick. Lots of good moments, including cool supporting
perfs by Ed Asner and Hal Holbrook just never manage to add up to one
great film.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Bachelor, he would have paid...
The Bachelor is an OK dateflick. It's probably a better rental if you're
already paired up.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Boiler Room
Rated  [R], 120 minutes
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Ben Affleck, Nia Long, Vin Diesel
Written and Directed by Ben Younger
website: www.boilermovie.com
IN SHORT: Both a gripping story and an assault on all senses.
At a time when every over the hill teevee celebrity is giving away
millions of dollars in the new glut of prime time game shows filling our
small screens, it is somehow appropriate that we once again get a big
screen flick about the rise and fall of folk to whom the phrase "Greed
is Good" is the watchword of the only faith they worship, the Almighty
Buck.
Boiler Room, written and directed by first time-er Ben Younger, plainly
sets its sights on predecessors like Wall Street and Glen Garry Glen
Ross, and it meets its target. Even the usually annoying presence of
nonstop rap as the soundtrack music for the first half hour of the film
didn't bother me (But I digress...)
Out near the campus of Queens College, Seth Davis (Giovanni Ribisi) is
running a brisk, though illegal, business; a 24 hour a day backroom
casino for the kidlets of the campus. A college dropout himself, Seth's
occupation puts him in direct conflict with his father Marty(Ron Rifkin)
which brings up one of those father-son-mother in the middle subplots
that Cranky laps up with a spoon. Into the casino one day comes Greg
Feinstein (Nicky Katt), flashing an incredible roll of bills and a
yellow Ferrari parked in the street outside. Knowing that dad wants him
out of the illegal world of gambling, Seth bolts to the more white
collar world of the stock market.
In retrospect, Seth will liken his work to that of ghettoboys dealing to
the habits of crack whores. In this case, he is selling greed -- the
promise of riches in unknown penny stocks sold via the telephone to a
cold list of unsuspecting suckers. We follow Seth along the path to
ruin, guided by professional hard sellers, with egos the size of Montana
(and many with fists to match). It's only a bit part but Ben Affleck
burns onscreen as the recruiter for a firm called J.T. Marlin, owned by
an equally mysterious slickster named Michael Brantley (Tom Everett
Scott). The battle in the pits, where Seth rises to the top of the new
recruits, is best defined by the vicious rivalry between Greg (who found
Seth) and another senior broker, Chris Varick (Vin Diesel) who has
trained the kidlet.
Seth is taught how to dress, how to pitch, how to manipulate and lie,
how to close a sale. In short, he learns how to take the rubes for every
penny they've stashed in their retirement funds. It is a world in which
a man with no moral center can make an insane amount of money, and still
be young enough to live with their parents. So... what happens when a
man who has had all notions of ethics drummed out of him gets some? I'll
leave it at that.
Boiler Room is an electrifying assault on your senses, with performances
that scream from the screen (Ribisi, Diesel and Affleck particularly)
and a pace that doesn't let up. The necessary scenes detailing the
results of Seth's calls initially feel out of place but, as I said,
they're necessary. This is a world where testosterone is sprinkled on
the breakfast cereal at the start of the day and rivalries in the pit
extend to who will nail the lovely receptionist (Nia Long) outside the
locked doors.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Boiler Room, he would have paid...
Boiler Room is macho to the max. The rating may prove to be a half a
buck or so high, six months from now, but you haven't suffered through
the crap that I've suffered through this past six weeks. Boiler Room was
a welcome breeze despite an incredibly offensive rap over the
end-titles. (Cranky wonders if this is what his grandparents felt about
rock and roll. But that's just me.)
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Mumford
Rated [R] , 101 minutes
Starring Hope Davis, Loren Dean, Jason Lee, Mary McDonnell, David
Paymer, Martin Short, Ted Danson, Pruitt Taylor Vince and Alfre Woodard
Written and Directed by Lawrence Kasdan
website: www.mumford-themovie.com
IN SHORT: A gentle, genial comedy for post teens.
Consider the story of Dr. Michael Mumford, Ph.D (Loren Dean). He's the
new shrink in a town also named Mumford whose two other shrinks (one a
real doctor, one a fake) have seen their formerly robust practices
shrivel. The town also has a self-absorbed, ego-maniacal attorney named
Lionel Dillard (Martin Short), one of the few people willing and able to
pay the new doc cold hard cash for an hour of mental deconstruction,
whose patronage is refused ('cuz Doc Mumford can't stand jerks -- a more
colorful epithet is used, several times by different characters in
Mumford but I've got standards to uphold and parents that would complain
if I used the "a" word. So I won't). Lessee, one spurned lawyer. Two
headcases with shrinking practices. Add 'em all up and . . . can we
spell "revenge"?
Oh, let's not and say we did. The characters, and the problems, that
writer director Lawrence Kasdan has created are entirely ordinary and
normal. Given that this story revolves around a psychologist, that means
a lot of talk. A lot of ordinary and normal talk would be hailed as
"realistic" on the arthouse circuit, but would strike most folk as
tedious -- unless the writer knew exactly what he was doing, which
Kasdan does (as he has demonstrated both solo and with partners in The
Big Chill and The Accidental Tourist and a couple of action flicks
called Raiders of the Lost Ark and Star Wars episodes Five and Six).
It's a great talent to find interesting things among average people and
while there is a twist or two towards the unusual, the problems of the
people found here are normal.
Formerly a logging town, Mumford is now dependent on Panda Modems, run
by the richest man in town, Skip Skipperton (Jason Lee). Being the sole
provider for a town of several thousand yields an problem for Skip. He
can't be seen with a shrink, 'cuz that appearance problem would cause
trouble for the company and the town. So he hires Mumford to be his
"friend," to discuss intimacy problems -- Skip needs a companion more
interesting than the body parts he's working on down in the lab. You'll
discover the secret of that in the flick.
As for the other customers, there's a fat pharmacist (Pruitt Taylor
Vince) who lost his wife and family due to fantasies straight out of a
Raymond Chandler novel; a wife (Mary McDonnell) who catalog shops
incessantly as a way of compensating for the lack of husbandly attention
(Ted Danson is the louse); the divorcee with chronic fatigue syndrome
(Hope Davis) who makes the doctor's heart go all thumpa thumpa and whose
nasty old witch of a mom (Dana Ivey) hates the doc from the word go.
All of the dirt about the good doctor's patients can be had straight
from the horse's mouth, if you ask him the right question at the right
time. Which is what local cafe owner Lily (Alfre Woodard, in a role that
marks her as the sanest person in town) manages to do right at the top
of the flick. What's that you say? A doctor is supposed to keep those
clinical confessions to himself? Absolutely correct a mundo.
But, as we know from the television commercial, Dr. Mumford ain't no
doc. Not even a little. Only Robert Stack can help sort out the unsolved
mystery of who Michael Mumford really is, and getting there is a very
pleasant ride where the law is savagely broken and a town is fully
healed.
Sorry about that. Kasdan writes well. I get inspired. Shame on me.
Mumford is a cut above your average grown up dateflick. It may be a tad
too nice for those Crankier than I -- Martin Short's character is as
close to an "edge" as the script gets, and that's not much. Mumford
offers a fine time in the dark and is recommended
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Mumford, he would have paid...
This one's definitely for us grownups (cuz Cranky at 15 would've been
bored silly by all the talk. We didn't appreciate things like character
back in them halcyon days of pimplehood)
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ Reviews: Stigmata
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce
Screenplay by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage
Directed by Rupert Wainwright
website: www.mgm.com/stigmata
IN SHORT: A great commercial for a non-scary flick.
If you were fascinated by the Stigmata television commercial, try to
imagine watching 60 straight minutes of it. That editing overkill is
what stops Stigmata dead in its tracks as a movie. If it were a
mathematical formula, Stigmata would = (Blade - vampires) + (The
Exorcist - pea soup and obscenity) / story. Drawing heavily from
Christian mysticism and attacking the inner political construction of
the Roman Catholic church, Stigmata spends more time allowing director
Rupert Wainwright to show off his photographic knowledge and editing
chops than it does on the story. Cranky was ready to yell at the screen
"Hey! It's story time already" when just enough intrigue dribbled out to
keep his attention focussed for a few more minutes. Unfortunately it was
way too little, far too late.
Stigmata features a lot of effects -- levitation, blood, fire -- and
one, true mystery: how is it that the wounds of Christ manifest
themselves on the body of a cute blonde resident of Pittsburgh, PA? The
Vatican has a special section, the Special Congregation for the Causes
of Saints -- whose job it is to investigate religious mysteries and its
Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce) dispatches Father Andrew Kiernan
(Gabriel Byrne) to investigate.  This is the second investigation
Kiernan does in this movie, the first involving a South American statue
of the Virgin Mary that weeps tears of human blood. There's a tenuous
link between the two, but I'll leave that for you to discover.
When Kiernan finds the lovely Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), his
investigation ends almost as quickly as it begin, for Frankie is not a
member of the True Church. That means she, and her wounds, is of no
interest to his section. But Frankie speaks in tongues -- turns out to
be the kind of Aramaic spoken 2000 years ago in Galilee -- and has
scribbled strange characters on the walls of her loft. They, too, are
Aramaic, and the words therein are part of a hidden document that could
shake the theosophical nature of the Vatican to its core.
Stigmata features a gorgeous first hour of photographic effects and
heavy duty editing over a soundtrack of techno-heavy metal music. for
purposes of this film, it is constantly raining in Pittsburgh, which
means lots of slow motion shots of water dripping and plopping. The
Catholic Church being loaded with symbols and icons, this film also goes
heavy on symbolic things whose meaning is quite beyond the knowledge of
this Member of the Tribe. What I do know is that Stigmata is based on
two fragments (part of phrase 3 and the latter half of phrase 77) of the
Dead Sea Scroll called The Gospel of Thomas, which this film has used to
create a "new" text that is even more heretical than the "Thomas".
Anyone that has studied the Dead Sea Scrolls (Cranky pleads guilty) can
tell you that there are lots of tempting heretical bits and pieces that
would fascinate anyone that has even a mild knowledge of Christianity.
Stigmata drowns any interesting mystery in so much visual nonsense that
it defeats the purpose of any movie, to tell a good and interesting
story. There is a story here, but it's buried way too deep. And, of
course, time is wasted while the priest is tempted by the blonde . Been
there, done that.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Stigmata, he would have paid...
Rental level. Oh, yeah. The Gospel of Thomas is attributed to Didymos
Judas Thomas, founder of the Eastern Church and Twin Brother of Jesus.
Told ya it was a good bit of heretical bit info. Theoretically, the
Gospel of Mary is even worse, 'cuz it strips the Vatican of any
authority as guardian and sole arbiter of the Word. But that's a story
for a different movie.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
Dinosaur
Rated [PG], 82 minutes
Starring D.B. Sweeney, Alfre Woodard, Ossie Davis, Max Casella, Julianna
Marguiles, Joan Plowright, Della Reese
Screenplay by John Harrison and Robert Nelson Jacobs; based on a
screenplay by Walon Green
Directed by Eric Leighton and Ralph Zondag
website: www.dinosaur.go.com
It's kind of like watching the powers that be draw lines in the sand and
egg each other on with one technical achievement after another. Steven
Spielberg and George Lucas pushed ILM to the limits to create and
integrate live action and CGI animation with both Jurassic Park films
and Star Wars Episode One. Dreamworks SKG and its partners cracked the
problem of CGI'ing realistic water in Antz. The Disney folk built a
digital studio from scratch to deliver Dinosaur, the most perfect
integration of animation and "live" film since the Lumiere Brothers came
up with the idea about a hundred years ago [From the Earth To The Moon,
in 1896???], or since Winsor McCay stepped from the vaudeville stage
into his animation of Gertie the Dinosaur, and rode off into the sunset
on her back. I know it's most perfect because I sat dead center of the
theater thinking, "nice water" before I realized that I was watching
"live" footage of water with animated splashes and dinosaur feet in the
middle of it. When you totally lose the idea that you're looking at
something created in thousands of mega-gigabytes of computer memory,
that's kind of transcendent.
While I catch my breath, I'll point to the West Coast where our Paul
Fischer sat down with directors Eric Leighton and Ralph Zondag, and the
voice cast, to explain how they done it. Click here.
I admit to being swayed by the technology, whose soul is the work of
hundreds of animators and technicians and the equivalent of 70,000
CD-ROM's worth of CGI power. At it's heart, Dinosaur is a simple "get
from point A to point B" story, one with a couple of moments of where
those of us of parental age shuddered to think that there were four year
olds in the audience. The four year olds next to me had no such problem.
More on that below. And while some of the classifications and names of
dinos have changed over the years, I'm sticking to the old ones 'cuz I
think most of y'all would have a better mental image of a Brontosaurus
than a Bracchisaur, which looks pretty much the same to me. So . . .
With a camera point of view that moves around, below and above a herd of
leaf-eating, egg-laying Iguanodon munching in a meadow. Other species of
dino flitter and fly about until a meat chomping T-Rex comes crashing
out of the bush, stomping on nests of eggs and making a quick breakfast
of a not too fleet of foot beastie. Other scavengers sift through the
wreckage, carting off an egg, which will be tough enough to withstand
several new owners, a river dunking or two, a flight through the air in
the jaws of a pterodactyl and a long plummet to earth. Discovered by a
tribe of lemurs led by Yar (Ossie Davis), whose initial reaction is to
order the death of the new hatchling, though the calmer view of his
mate, Plio (Alfre Woodard) prevails. Raised to adulthood, Aladar (D.B.
Sweeney) and his lemur pals frolic in the pre-historic forests and watch
with wonder as meteors come plummeting through the atmosphere to wreak
havoc on the Earth.
That's two sequences that'll have you going "oo" and we're only twenty
or so minutes into the flick.
Barely surviving the nuclear level detonations nearby or the churning
waters drowning most of his pals, Aladar and his "family" make it to the
barren mainland, where a herd of a similar species plus remnants and
stragglers of stegosauruses and brontos (and so on) is being led to
their equivalent of a Promised Land, a verdant nesting ground whose
image is lovingly maintained in their memories. At the head of the pack
is Kron (Samuel E. Wright) a marine sergeant of a dino who prefers to
leave the stragglers behind so the trailing 'raptors can pick them off.
Only the strong survive in Kron's world, and his second in command,
Bruton (Owen Klatte), is quick to make the cut of the old and weak.
Behind the 'raptors, though, is something much, much worse and much,
much larger. They're called "carnotaurs" which, for purposes on old folk
like me, means more pumped up than T-Rex, and a lot nastier. Rounding
off the story is Aladar's love interest, Neera (Julianna Marguiles),
sister of Kron. You know that's gonna mean trouble somewhere down the
line.
Aladar, though, has been raised to be cooperative and kind. Cut from the
herd 'cuz he's helping the strays, which include an elderly stegosaurus
named Eema (Della Reese) and equally old brontosaurus called Baylene
(Joan Plowright). Aladar, with best friend Zini (Max Casella) and the
rest of his mini-herd learn the meaning of teamwork and find their own
route to the promised land . . . and then head back to help the rest of
the dinos and teach them to cooperate with each other to defeat the
carnotaur. This is where the battle sequences made this old wimp a wee
bit antsy. As for the two four year olds sitting in the adjacent seat,
one turned to the other and said "This is the scarey part" and the other
said "OK". So, parents note, if your kid made it through either of the
Jurassic Park flicks, and to this day I still cannot watch the first one
on my big screen TV, this Dinosaur story should pose no problem.
Were it not for the perfectly matched sound effects that accompanied the
battles between the lead beasties of each group; the battle for control
of the herd; the battle against nature just to stay alive, this simple
story could have sunk for the reason that it is just too simple. I have
no problem with teaching kidlets that cooperation is a good thing. The
Dinosaur story felt like a back to school kind of experience for this
man two score beyond first grade. No big deal. I could watch the CGI all
day, even if the furry lemurs look more like Muppets than monkeys.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Dinosaur, he would have paid...
Dinosaur was a pretty satisfying sit. I didn't walk out feeling pumped
but I sure did enjoy it.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Kirikou and  the Sorceress
Not  Rated, 71 minutes
Written by Michel Ocelot
Directed by Michel Ocelot with Raymond Burlet
website: www.kirikou.net
IN SHORT: An enchanting and delightful tale for kidlets and the li'l
kidlet inside.
How does this figure? A French Guinea born animator takes a West African
fairy tale, gets Peter Gabriel collaborator Youssou N'Dour to do the
music and delivers the whole thing in an English dub to four American
theaters where no one will see the thing. This is the curse of the indie
flick, folk, and this is one of the times I'll screech about something
that was delightful.
>From the first frame, you know that you're looking at a story that is,
to say the lease, unusual. A very pregnant African sits. A voice comes
from her belly saying "I am ready to be born now!" The soon to be mother
replies "Any child that says to me it is ready to be born can do it
himself" (I'm paraphrasing). So the kidlet crawls out of mom, snaps the
umbilical with his hands and proclaims to the world "I AM KIRIKOU!" and
walks away. Not only can he walk and talk, he can run at speeds akin to
The Flash of comic book fame. The kidlet is adorable and the film is
entrancing from the start.
Like all good fairy tales, there is an evil witch. In this case it is
the Sorceress Karaba, who lives in a hut outside the village. Nearly all
the male warriors of the village disappeared, presumed dead, after going
off to fight her. Karaba's lust is for all the gold of the village, and
her demands are constant. Kirikou decides that he will end the threat of
the Sorceress and, even more, discover why she hates the village so. It
is a question that no one has thought to ask.
Again, like the good fairy tales, Kirikou gets help. From the plants and
animals of the local forest. From a mystic wise man who lives at the end
of a very dangerous trek through territory controlled by Karaba. With
the knowledge he has gained, Kirikou's final confrontation with the
sorceress is quite surprising.
The animation keeps the African feel of the story. The Masai natives are
dressed according to their style (think National Geographic) but there
is no sexual implication that could concern parents of tiny kidlets.
N'Dour's music is a perfect complement to the story and, darn it, this
kidlet is plain out adorable.
I can't tell you much about this flick. It's distribution is almost nil.
Even if you have to search it out on tape, 'toonheads will want to see
this beautifully told tale which, like all archetypal folk tales, finds
its parallels in fables like Androcles and the Lion and intellectual
explanations by Joseph Campbell. Long time readers know Cranky eats that
stuff for breakfast, which means I walked out of the screening as one
happy camper.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Kirikou and the Sorceress, he would
have paid...
That release schedule I've got puts Kirikou and the Sorceress in New
York on February 18, Chicago on March 10 and Northern California on
March 24. Other than that, read the fine print in your newspapers.
Badger your video stores. Find this flick.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Runaway Bride
Rated [PG-13]
Starring Julia Roberts and Richard Gere
Screenplay by Sara Parriott & Josann McGibbon and Audrey Wells
Directed by Garry Marshall
website: http://www.runawaybride.com
Consider Runaway Bride the film equivalent of a ten year reunion of the
folks who made Pretty Woman (it's a couple of months short, but close
enough for rock n roll). Rather than retread old ground -- high-powered
successful businessman plays Prince Charming to a hard-working working
girl whose Chosen Profession would indicate a deep seated aversion to
commitment -- The Runaway Bride ups the stakes by making our principle
characters, a nationally syndicated newspaper columnist and the
hard-working woman he wrongs in his column, natural enemies.
Richard Gere is Ike Graham, whose problem meeting deadlines finally
brings him down when he runs with a storyline picked up at his local
bar. Target of the column, as usual, is a woman (Graham so irks his
femme readers that they all slap him on sight). Maggie Carpenter (Julia
Roberts), who lives in Hale, Maryland, has run from the altar at least
three times and her misadventures have made her the laughingstock of the
community. Thus the film title. Ike's ex-wife Ellie, also his editor at
USA Today (Rita Wilson), fires him when a letter from Maggie points out
seventeen factual inaccuracies in the column. Ellie's new husband Fisher
(Hector Elizondo), also Ike's best friend, finds an assignment for him
at another magazine, to cover Maggie's fourth attempt. If Maggie runs,
Ike is vindicated.
But when he hits town,  Maggie recognizes Ike. She and best friend Peggy
(Joan Cusack) do their best to humiliate and otherwise ignore the man,
who still manages to befriend almost everyone in town, including
Maggie's family and fiancee, Bob (Chris Meloni). The friendlier Ike
gets, the more frustrated Maggie gets, until she realizes it's just
better to cooperate with his research and  story and prove that, yes
indeedy, she can make the walk down the aisle without bolting for
freedom.
Which is where the star chemistry kicks in and I'll leave you hanging.
Face it folks,  you know how it's going to turn out, when all is said
and done. The part we all want to see is that moment when Gere and
Roberts look at each other and know this is it. Getting there is a
fairly average dateflick. That moment, when it arrives, is absolutely
perfect and electric.
But this flick ain't over. heh heh heh.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Runaway Bride, he would have
paid...
It's a date flick, and a pretty average one, until the star power kicks
in. From that point, things pick up mightily.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
.. . . raved a whole bunch of sixteen slash seventeen year olds on the
way out of a sneak of Pitch Black, a sci-fi thriller with more than a
couple of good shocks, great scenery, good effects and a mean mutha of a
bad guy who can take down big bad aliens, um, with both hands. Scary?
Sometimes. Watching Pitch Black is more like taking the really big,
really dangerous 'coaster ride at a nearby themepark. You know you're
going to have fun, but you also know you're walking out safe. I ain't
getting Cranky about a fun ride. The scenery is great (same location and
much of the same crew from the Mad Max flix) the effects work, and there
are at least two or three really, and I mean REALLY good ones. More than
worthy of the oversized popcorn.
Somewhere in deep space, a large transport -- three crew and forty
passengers in hypo-sleep -- crashes onto a desert planet. Docking pilot,
and now babelicious Captain of Our Survivors Caroline Fry (Radha
Mitchell) is the leader of the bunch. Second to her is a bounty
hunter/cop named Johns (Cole Hauser) who is transporting mass murderer
Richard B. Riddick (Vin Diesel), the meanest mother... you know... to
another round of imprisonment. The survivors (and I'll not comment on
who they are, lest I give away which folk don't make it -- there are a
pair of good surprises in there, too) bake under the rays of three,
count 'em three suns. They search for water and discover that the local
lifeforms may not be friendly. They bake to a golden brown. They find a
settlement, and a ship, abandoned 22 years earlier. It is readily
apparent to our victims-in-waiting that the only way off the planet is
to get the abandoned ship working. To do that, they have to transport
gear from the crash site to the settlement.
When the three suns are eclipsed by a huge, ringed planet and the
planetary natives come out in the dark for a wee bit o' lunch. Not
knowing how long "night" is, the fools decide to make the journey in the
dark, with Riddick's ability to see nocturnally (explained in the flick)
their only ticket to salvation. Otherwise, they're sushi-on-a-skeleton.
But the question hangs over their heads: will Riddick help or will he
slit the throats of everyone else and high-tail it to freedom. The
journey in the dark; the inevitable confrontation between Riddick and
Johns work beautifully. Get yourself in with an audience that talks back
to the screen and it'll get pretty damned noisy 
Writer/director Dave Twohy rightfully conceals as much about the alien
critters as possible. This builds the tension. But there are thousands
of em! At first, you get a real rush from the thought of an impossible
task and the sneaky way the forms of the creatures and their numbers are
revealed. These aliens tend to swarm, and that tires fast. Though it's
not non-stop thrilling, you get at least two one-on-one confrontations
courtesy Diesel's Riddick. Both totally rock.
Trust me. If this sucker didn't work, it'd be slammed as a second rate
Aliens (or maybe a first rate Screamers, which was a similarly themed,
real stinker of a couple of years back). Pitch Black was a fun ride.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Pitch Black, he would have paid...
Definite date flick, especially for the teen kidlets.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Dog of Flanders, A (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: A Dog Of Flanders
Rated [PG], 100 minutes
Starring Jack Warden, Jeremy James Kissner, Jesse James, Jon Voight,
Cheryl Ladd, Steve Hartley and Bruce McGill
Screenplay by Kevin Brodie and Robert Singer
Based on the story by "Ouida" (Marie Louise de la Ramee)
Directed by Kevin Brodie
website: http://www.dogofflanders.com
IN SHORT: A bleak tale for the kidlets.
Let's talk image for a second. You see a dog. You see a boy. You think
happy thoughts, just as everybody else would, and pack up the kidlets to
see A Dog Of Flanders. Before the title credits, a young mother dies
from exposure to a brutal snowstorm, leaving her young son in the care
of her widowed father. Within ten minutes, a dog is brutally beaten by
its master and left for dead on the side of the road, where it is found
and restored to health by the boy. It's a good thing that this thing has
a happy ending, 'cuz without it, the smallest of kidlets would be
confused and the nine year olds would be upset.
Parents exist, so I'm told, to protect their kidlets from thoughts like
"Life sucks and then you die." So what do you do when that very
sentiment parades across screen as a kidlet story, and then tacks on a
"unless you choose not to (die)" Hollywood happy ending?
Well, that's not fair. The happy ending may have been in the original
story. We don't know. We've never seen 'em. We're guessing that they
were inspiring reads. What makes it to the screen isn't.
The boy is called Nello, played as a single digit kidlet by Jesse James
and pre-teen by Jeremy James Kissner. Grandfather Jehan Daas (Jack
Warden) is a tenant farmer beholden to evil landlord Stefan () and makes
his money selling milk to the people in the town. The dog, Patrasche,
whose entrance into the story is mentioned above, pulls the milk cart.
Nello, who has shown a distinct talent as an artist, is on the verge of
that wonderful childlike love with the blonde girl next door, Aloise
(Farren Monet and Madyline Sweeten) when they are banned from seeing
each other.
With a fatherless orphan as the center of the story, we get to look at
the males onscreen, as if to figure out which is the real dad. There's
the local blacksmith, William (Bruce McGill). There's a local artist,
Michel La Grande (Jon Voight) who stumbles across Nello at the foot of a
statue of the famous artist Peter Paul Rubens, and takes an interest in
the boy. Of course, there is Aloise's father, Carl (Steven Hartley). Has
he banned Nello from seeing Aloise because of the differences in
economic class, or is there some deep dark secret yet to be uncovered?
Aloise's mother (Cheryl Ladd) knows some of Nello's secrets, but she's
not telling. Nello himself hopes to win an art contest, whose rich prize
money and art school scholarship will lift him out of the poverty he has
known all his life.
Without going into detail, let us say that A Dog Of Flanders plays more
like a 19th Century Book of Job than a Horatio Alger story. This poor
kidlet, never advantaged in anyway except for a strong moral character,
lives a miserable life. At the end, a community is brought together to
face what it has done and what would be an inspiring conclusion falls
apart under the weight of a script that tips its hand way too soon and
fails to build up enough solutions to the mystery of Nello's father.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to A Dog Of Flanders, he would have
paid...
With most kidflicks hitting the $3.00 rental level, I place this one
just below the average. A Dog Of Flanders is not this film that will
inspire the kidlets. Only with good parents explaining how you can never
give up, how Nello overcomes the obstacles he faces, does it fulfill the
purpose it sets out to.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
Sometime in the next week I'll get eMail from some outraged teen who
will call me an idiot and tell me that The Skulls was the best movie
ever made. To which I'll reply "Were you drunk when you saw it?"
(usually the answer is "yes" and I know this because the kidlets
inevitably spills the beans in the last line of the eMail) and "Did you
laugh at what you were seeing happen on the screen?" (which, if there
was even one person in that audience anything like the multitude I sat
with here in New York City, the answer is also "yes"). Net response:
look up the word "Ludicrous" in your Funk and Wagnall's and you'll
probably see, as definition 6: "as in a movie: ie. The Skulls" If ever
there was a movie that enabled its audience to feel inherently superior
to the alleged upper-classes seen in its scenario -- and that smug sense
of superiority is the key to laughing at, and thus enjoying, this flick
-- it is this one.
The idea of it all -- that a centuries old college secret society has
tendrils into the highest and lowest corridors of power in the country
-- is so fit for the conspirati madness that has gripped our country
ever since JFK got his head popped that I thought, "OK let's see where
it goes."
It went down pretty quickly. From the very first second of the flick,
after an ominous chord of music and a title card informing us of some
background material the audience I sat with was in stitches. We are
introduced to Luke McNamara (Joshua Jackson), a poor boy hoping that
he'll be tapped for The Skulls because he's heard that they'll cover the
ridiculous cost of the legal career he hopes to pursue. He's got a hot,
upperclass girl friend, Chloe Whitfeld (Leslie Bibb) and a journalism
major roommate, Will Beckford (Hill Harper), who is secretly trying to
do an expose on the secret societies that infest the campus (which is
Yale, though that word is never spoken in the flick).
Luke gets tapped, of course. Thus begins an elaborate ritual of
introduction to the group, called the Revelation process. Luke is
attached to a "soul mate," Caleb Mandrake (Paul Walker), to whom all
secrets must be revealed, and swiftly gets sucked into the world of The
Skulls, who provide money, cars, clothing, connections and even women
for the candidate's bed.
Then, the roommate commits suicide. The police detective (Steve Harris)
says it wasn't. Luke finds secret Skulls material belonging to "soul
mate" Caleb among Will's effects. Is it possible that The Skulls have
orchestrated a murder coverup to protect their own? And what would they
do to one of their own, if he spills the beans? Add to the mix a subplot
of a battle for control of The Skulls involving Caleb's father Judge
Litten Mandrake (Craig T. Nelson) and U.S. Senator Ames Levritt (William
Petersen), with Luke and friends stuck in the middle. The whole thing is
so lightweight ridiculous, filled with manipulative would be thrills,
that it is to laugh. Which half the audience did. To be fair, a good
hunk cheered at parts of this nonsense, but not I.
There are flat out stinkers and then there are the flicks that are so
bad that they're deserving of the purchase of the super-extra-large tub
o' popcorn with extra golden flavored topping to go with that bottle you
snuck into the theater, which pretty much sums up The Skulls. One day
you'll be sitting through this thing at a midnight show. The Skulls is
so bad that someone will proclaim it to be good.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Skulls, he would have paid...
And God bless the audience member who walked out saying "It's Eyes Wide
Shut all over again. This was terrible," while another walked out saying
"This wasn't even worth renting." Cranky says maybe it'll be fun if you
get a friend to pay for the rental and get incredibly drunk before you
sit through the tape. That way you point at your pal afterwards and yell
SUCKER! and cackle some more.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Back in the days of the "good war" the German Nazi war machine had an
unbreakable code generated by a device code named ENIGMA. Over the
course of about three years, Allied Forces managed to piece together
parts of the code,culminating with the capture of a complete machine in
1944. Having broken the code, Allied Command was forced to watch as the
other side continued to sink our ships, for getting word to those ships
would tip the Germans to the fact that we knew what they were thinking.
That's a story for another day, unlike the compressed story told by
writer/director Jonathan Mostow in U-571, is a superb thriller and a
great ride, once things in the story go from bad to worse.
Mostow sets his story in the Spring of 1942, with the US fresh into the
war and still running World War I era subs like the S-33, which will
never be captained by Lt. Andrew Tyler (Matthew McConaughey) who has
been passed over for promotion. Tyler's hopes have been shot down by his
Lt. Commander Mike Dahlgren (Bill Paxton) and, before he can request
transfer to another boat, the S-33 ships out on a mission of utmost
secrecy and importance. It seems that Intelligence has tracked radio
signals from a floundering Nazi sub (and how that happened starts this
story in high gear) in the mid-Atlantic. The Germans have dispatched a
rescue sub; The S-33's mission is to get there first, waylay the crew
and steal the Enigma coding machine and code books. Best estimate is
that our side can get there ten hours before their side.
Nope. Nothing I've written spills anything that isn't in the trailer or
teevee spot, so don't complain. Let's just say that the nine Americans
who find themselves in control of a crippled, leaky U-boat must fight
the impossible fight against the full strength of a healthy Nazi Navy,
determined to send that Enigma machine to the depths. Among the American
crew (some will live and some won't) are Chief Klough (Harvey Keitel in
a low key, dead on dramatic performance), Lt. Peter Emmett (Jon Bon
Jovi), crewmen Mazzola (Erik Palladino) Wentz (Jack Noseworthy) and mess
steward Eddie (T.C. Carson) and Special Ops officers Lt. Hirsch (Jake
Weber) and Major Coonan (David Keith). German officer Kapitanlieutenant
Wassner (Thomas Kretschmann), a captive below decks plays a key role as
well.
We were taught in school of the "can do" effort of wartime America,
recovering from the almost complete destruction of the Pacific Fleet at
Pearl Harbor and Mostow's script, filled with depth charge and torpedo
battles and the decreasing odds for survival of our heroes, exploits
that spirit to the letter. His direction exploits the claustrophobic
conditions of the ship and the special effects run the gamut from bone
shaking to downright beautiful. I never thought I'd say that about a
depth charge going off, but you'll know the scene when you see it.
U-571 is a great popcorn flick, and while I usually use that term in a
deprecating fashion, I don't now. Outside of a short pause at the
beginning of the flick, catch your breath - you'll need it, U-571
doesn't stop. Not in its action, not to slow down and detail what
happened to the crewmen that don't make it. Put the popcorn hand on
autopilot and have a good time. 
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to U-571, he would have paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Perfect Blue (1997/I)
IN SHORT: Seriously inappropriate for anyone under 17. Period. No
discussion necessary.
That summary line is from the publicist. Cranky endorses it
heavy-handedly. Long time readers know of my love for animation and my
admitted lack of education about Japanese anime. There are three types
of anime; without embarrassing myself by using a language I don't
understand they break down to "standard" animation, cute-stuff for
kidlets a la Sailor Moon or Pokémon, and absolutely hardcore adults only
material.
Perfect Blue is absolutely hardcore. I'll be blunt to scare the parental
units first, then we'll get into the bones of the story. Fundamentalists
will consider Perfect Blue to be pornographic, as its main character
moves from a pop-star music world to a soap opera career in which
photographers get her to pose nude for publicity shots. By the end of
the film she will be attacked and raped and confined to a mental
institution. Or maybe not, as this tale of schizophrenia, stalkers and
image sublimation tears into your cortex.
Understand the difference in culture demonstrated here. In Japan, hard
core pornography in comics is considered normal. Phonebook sized XXX
comics are read by the suits on their way to work on the train. It's a
different world from where we come from. More disturbing, to these eyes
at least, is the graphic violence depicted in Perfect Blue. Ice picks
into the eyes, a couple of bloody murders and the aforementioned rape.
If this film were rated, it would carry an NC-17, no question about it.
Parents, and the rest of us grownups, have been warned. This is
absolutely not for children. It's not for most American adults, either.
The story: Mima Kirigoe has had a good career as part of a popmusic girl
group called Cham. Think Spice Girls at the bitter end and you've locked
in to Mima's position. Prodded to leave music behind for a career as an
actress, she bows off the mainstage leaving shocked fans behind,
including a gray haired, pale thin geeky looking stalker type. Needing
to lose the squeaky clean image, Mima is convinced to take a role which
will require her to be "raped" and whose publicity shoot turns into a
soft core bonanza. The Cham fans aren't happy, and Mima's advisors and
scriptwriters start getting killed in gruesome ways. It may be the
stalker, who is maintaining a detailed daily website which purports to
be from Mima herself or it may be a schizophrenic Mima, whose split
personality is asserting itself in an attempt to set right what has gone
wrong. As a straight psychological drama, there's a good nut of story
here.
Cranky couldn't lose himself in the story because the quality of
animation varies wildly. The changes aren't indicative of Mima's mental
state, or of anything symbolic that I could figure out. Then there's the
violence, which is nauseating, disturbing, creepy, you add the synonyms.
Cranky was gasping for air and reeling from the very unpleasantness of
this story.
You know how I've been describing the thought of an animated flick for
grownups? This ain't it. The thing is, this story could do gangbuster
biz as a live action flick, it's certainly deep enough and has enough
twists and turns. We accept the violence in "live" movies because, at a
most basic level, we know it's all fake. Graphic cartoon violence is way
beyond our parameters. Perhaps we've been mind-wiped by Disney, but
watching this kind of violence in cartoon format is truly stomach
turning.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Perfect Blue, he would have paid...
Which is mid-week rental level Perfect Blue is reco'd only if you're a
die hard anime fan or curious and self-confident as all get out (as in
"no cartoon is gonna make me sick...")
Give it five years and you'll probably see a live action remake.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
For those out there that aren't long time readers, Cranky's a 'toonhead.
Loves animation. Almost wept when he had to sell a Gertie the Dinosaur
cel to support this site (didn't 'cuz I had two). In general, of the
post-Lion King run of animations from all the major studios, in general
I hate the second banana characters and really don't have much temper
for the multitude of songs that usually get in the way. Now that you're
up to speed . . .
What's a Cranky Critic to do when there are no second banana characters
-- to keep the kidlets giggling at the expense of grown up attentions --
to complain about? You know the type -- supporting monkeys or gargoyles
or whatever that usually infest toons from the other "D" studio but less
so from Dreamworks. You can blame or thank Jeffrey Katzenberg for this,
he did oversee The Lion King and many others at the Mouse, and is the
partner in charge of animation at Dreamworks SKG. The 'toons we've seen
from them in the last couple of years, Antz and The Prince of Egypt have
both aimed a wee bit higher, with more themes for the post thumb-sucking
set and less base comedy for the kidlets. Cranky likes that.
This year's offering, The Road To El Dorado, upgrades the second banana
type from support to lead and tries to duplicate the kind of chemistry
that made Hope & Crosby (or Lemmon & Matthau) a good screen team. El
Dorado tries and succeeds for the 'Works, delivering the most family
friendly of all their 'toon output. I know 'cuz I saw El Dorado twice.
Once with other critics, in preparation for StarTalk interviews with
lead voices Kevin Kline and Kenneth Branagh. Again, on the biggest
screen in New York, with an audience filled with media and their
kidlets. The kidlets were cackling at stuff that makes kidlets cackle
(don't ask me why) and the double entendre went right over their heads.
The big screen effect is discussed a couple of inches down.
Branagh and Kline voice Tulio and Miguel, two Spanish con artists who,
through every fault of their own, find themselves stowed away on the
conquistador Cortez' flagship on its journey to the New World. Cortez
(Jim Cummings) is searching for the legendary City of Gold called El
Dorado and has no tolerance for the stowaways (who just happen to have a
map to the city in their possession). The pair get washed overboard,
along with Cortez' stallion Altivo (who never speaks a word but is
"voiced" by the most expert and rightfully legendary Frank Welker) and
make it to the New World ahead of Cortez.
We're not telling how. It's funny. As is the pair's personal search for
El Dorado, which culminates in their finding it and being declared Gods
by the Chief Priest of the City, Tzekel-Kan (Armand Assante), who is
fighting a political battle with the Chief (Edward James Olmos) for
control of the tribe. Their Protector and Partner in Crime is the lovely
and equally greedy Chel (Rosie Perez) who tries to guide these
nincompoops in the how-to of breaking the bank, and winds up breaking
Tulio's heart. The interplay between Kline and Branagh's characters is
incredibly funny and dead on target (Kline's the Crosby, btw) and both
are topped by the vocal effects of Welker. To say the horse is smarter
than both men put together is a fine compliment, indeed. As for the
animation . . .
Let's talk honestly for a second. We all know the biggest market for all
feature toons is the post bigscreen video market. All of you with
kidlets know that for a fact -- how many times have you parked your
kidlets in front of [title here] or, for that matter, been parked by
your kidlets in front of [title here]? As I wrote, I saw The Road To El
Dorado twice. First, on a screen that was probably the size of the
bigger theaters in your local multiplex, which was enjoyable though some
of the CGI/traditional animation mix onscreen seemed obvious. Second
time was on a monstrosity of a screen with no such apparent "problem".
While there have been notable improvements in the technology of
background CGI character movement and water animation ('toonheads'll
catch it all), the climax of the film, in which a boat with sail
unfurled and filling with air evades a stone pillar crashing into the
water behind it -- absolutely breathtaking.
If you've got a theater nearby with a screen the size of the side of a
house, that's where you want to see The Road To El Dorado.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Road To El Dorado, he would have
paid...
Elton John and Tim Rice pick up their partnership where they left off on
The Lion King, though they've just done Aida for Broadway as well. The
songs in this flick are meant to narrate which they do better than
entertain, though the opening title and the Kline/Branagh sung "It's
Tough To Be A God" two (of five) are real toe-tappers. The radio hit
runs during the end credits, so it doesn't count. Sorry.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews:  The Virgin Suicides
Rated [R], 97 minutes
Starring Kathleen Turner, James Woods, Kirsten Dunst
Based on the novel by Jeffrey Eugenides
Screenplay and Directed by Sofia Coppola
website: www..com
IN SHORT: For once, an arthouse flick with an open ending (so to speak)
didn't make me want to barf.
OK, that gets the Cranky attitude stuff out of the way so that I may
praise a remarkably coherent first effort (as a writer/director) by
Sofia Coppola, who took an unfair amount of razzing for appearing in her
dad's Godfather III. Sofia's opening gambit is a story set against the
teenaged angst of coming of age in the 1970s. While you know how it's
going to turn out from the very beginning of the story, it's up to you
to try to figure out the "why" of it all. For those of us past our teen
years, there are enough touchstones in this flick to wake the dead
(memories) and make us recall our own toying with suicidal impulses.[not
me of course... I had to hit college to get seriously depressed...]
In a pleasant enough house in a pleasant enough suburb somewhere in the
US of A live the Lisbon family. Mom (Kathleen Turner) is an overweight,
frumpish woman. Dad (James Woods) is an emasculated and wimpy looking
math teacher at the local high school. The young ladies -- played by
Leslie Hayman, AJ Cook, Chelse Swain, Hanna Hall and Kirsten Dunst --
range in age from thirteen to seventeen and, as the story's adult
narrator points out, no one in town can discern how two shlumpy parents
turned out five examples of feminine perfection. Lux Lisbon (Dunst) is
the centerpiece of the quintet; her introduction is shot in the manner
of teevee commercials of the time (slo-mo and soft focus, with sun
blasting from behind. All you need is Donovan singing "Wear Your Love
Like Heaven" and you could sell soap or shampoo]. Five boys, distant
admirers all, are the counterpoints to the five girls, though they can't
do more than admire from a distance. By keeping most of the film
focussed on Lux, and by lumping the boys together as an anonymous pool,
Coppola keeps the story clean, focused and easy to follow.
The sisters all attend the local public school. They don't go to dances.
They don't date. They don't go out, period. They rarely do much more
than lounge on the lawn, and that happens only once in a blue moon.
Being so unreachable naturally makes them all the more attractive. The
sole male to make the effort, football star Trip Fontaine (Josh
Hartnett) is brushed off succinctly by Lux.
As our narrator (voiced by Giovanni Ribisi) tells us: "Cecilia was the
first to go," though she will survive the attempt and be counseled by a
hospital shrink (a cameo appearance by Danny DeVito). This unexpected
behavior on the part of their youngest daughter gets the parents to
loosen up a bit. The age appropriate boys are invited to a closely
supervised party and we, the audience, get our first peek inside the
cloistered world of the Lisbon clan. While the parents are strict, the
world inside the Lisbon household is not that far from "normal." Even as
Lux leads the charge towards teenage sexual rebellion after a group date
for the homecoming dance, the clues that point to the inevitable are so
subtle that I leave them for you to discover . . . which means that I'm
so dense I could have easily spent hours doing the film student
post-viewing dissertation thing.
Cranky should point out that his teenage years fell in the same time
period, the 70s, and that there was one suicide among his peer group --
but not for any reason that matches what happens in this film. Still,
the cast and production design, under Coppola's hand, nailed the look
and feel of the Seventies. Dunst continues her run of notable
performances but James Woods absolutely takes the cake as daddy wimp.
While it's easy to picture Kathleen Turner as an evil shrew mom, her
performance is restrained. The Virgin Suicides is a fair portrait of a
fairly conservative family on whose heads tragedy falls like an
avalanche.
I should point out that the reason I normally dislike open ended
arthouse flicks is that most of 'em leave an open end 'cuz the
screenwriter, usually the director as well, is just too damned lazy to
do the job. So we get an artsy-fartsy excuse for an ending, and
something to argue about over espresso afterwards. Coppola makes no
excuses here. We know the girls are going to die, and they do. The exact
reasons why are the mystery. Discussion is inevitable.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Virgin Suicides, he would have
paid...
On our scale, that's well above average for films on the arthouse
circuit.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Love & Basketball (2000)
Love and Basketball
Rated [PG-13], 120 minutes
Starring Omar Epps and Sanaa Lathan;
Alfre Woodard, Dennis Haysbert, Debbi Morgan, and Kyla Pratt.
Written and Directed by Gina Prince-Bythewood
website: www.loveandbasketball.com/
IN SHORT: a color blind GenX dateflick
Tracking the life stories of two childhood neighbors as they age and
make their way towards lives as professional basketball players, Love
and Basketball is the movie producer Spike Lee wanted last year's The
Best Man to be, a flick staffed by an African-American cast whose appeal
is color blind. That may be because what little rap slang is in the
flick is easily translatable by middle aged white guys like Cranky or
because stories of true love, in which the couple to be don't
necessarily like each other for most of the story, are old hat and don't
require much to figure out way in advance. That leaves the question of
whether there is chemistry between the stars (there is) and whether the
performances are interesting enough to sustain you (they are).
The bigger problem with writer/director Gina Prince-Bythewood's creation
is that she slaps soundtrack songs over the action (literally) every
five minutes or so. This may be a wonderful marketing tool for the
soundtrack CD, which often outsells box office tickets, but it's
irritating as hell to a grownup audience. Which would be me. At least
the [PG-13] rating means the soundtrack free of obscenity laden rap
songs. Cranky can't vouch for the CD.
Starting in 1981 at age eleven, we meet Quincy McCall (played as a
youngster by Glenndon Chatman), son of NBA star Zeke (Dennis Haysbert)
who is determined to follow in his dad's footsteps, with his dad's
number on his back.  The just moved in tomboy neighbor Monica Wright
(ditto Kyla Pratt) who is determined to be the first femme player in the
NBA and is already kicking out enough punk attitude fit to put any
competitor in his place. Their first game results in physical damage to
Monica. Their first relationship lasts about fifteen seconds. This
"first quarter" of the movie lays out all that follows. Jump forward to
senior year in high school, where Quincy (Omar Epps) is the hoop star
and hottest high school prospect in the country. Monica (Sanaa Latham),
still reeking of attitude and lacking in team spirit, can't get a
recruiter to look her way. The parental units on both sides (Haysbert
and Debbi Morgan; Alfre Woodard and Harry J. Lennix) both want their
kidlets to get an education; the McCalls knowing that a pro career is a
temporary fix at best, the Wrights knowing that there's no foreseeable
place for a woman in the NBA.
The story continues into college, where both play for USC, and beyond.
With one plot twist to keep it all interesting, you can figure out
Prince-Bythewood's story with a careful analysis of the above paragraph.
If you don't want to expend the brain power, everything to come should
ring clear as a bell about halfway through the flick.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Love and Basketball, he would have
paid...
A average dateflick for the teens and GenXers is what Love and
Basketball is. There's little here to interest us old farts.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Last September, The (1999)
IN SHORT: For the arthouse. Better for rental.
Welcome to County Cork, 1920. That would be after the time of "The
Troubles" detailed in Michael Collins; in the period when the English
Army and the Irish Republicans were still battling for control of the
Irish countryside. The big losers in this war are the Ascendancy,
English gentry and former Lords of the Land who, after hundreds of years
of occupancy, consider themselves Irish. The other tribe of Eire, of
course, consider these folk to be English and want them to go back where
they came from. Since where they came from is Ireland, you can see the
cultural problems looming.
But balancing cultural differences against army action and a blooming
relationship that puts both of the aforementioned things in conflict is
a mighty difficult thing to do. That's why novels are huge. That's why
screen adaptations, most of the time, come up short. Such is the case of
The Last September and, even as we ignore the Source Material as a
baseline comparison, we can tell stuff got lost.
As The Last September begins, we see a young couple of obvious monetary
plenitude. Lois Farquar (Keeley Hawes) dances down the rural avenue of
the estate run by Sir Richard (Michael Gambon) and Lady Myra Naylor
(Maggie Smith), flirtatious pheromones pouring from every pore. Laurence
Carstairs (Jonathan Slinger) follows. Behind the pair is a burly
handyman (Tom Hickey), carrying the portable Victrola which is pumping
out an Al Jolson tune. Back at the estate, eyebrows are raised at this
flirtation, which Lois pooh poohs because she is her uncle's niece and
Carstairs is her (Lois') aunt's nephew.
Nope, makes no sense to Cranky, either. Either something didn't make it
from the pages of the novel by Elizabeth Bowen or these Ascendant
Irish-English don't know diddle about genealogy. Anyway, Lois is more
interested in the Army Captain Gerald Colthurst (David Tennant) as a
suitor, though Lady Myra will see that this person with no money
dispatched post haste. While Sir Richard knows darn well that this year
will be the last, Lady Myra is content to believe that the English will
continue to rule this small part of the Empire. Danielstown, aka The Big
House, is chock full of guests, including Hugo and Francie Montmorency
(Lambert Wilson and Jane Birkin), who have sold their estate and are
looking for a suitably luxurious place to squat, and Marda Norton (Fiona
Shaw) who still harbors a major attraction for Hugo. Marda is suitably
engaged to a man in London, but still hopes she can insert herself
between Hugo and his wife.
The last guest is an unwanted one. Hiding in an old mill house on the
estate is Peter Connolly (Gary Lydon), an IRA fugitive wanted for the
murder of an English Army officer. While the Army keeps an eye on
Connolly's parent's house, he is being tended to surreptitiously by Lois
-- who still finds herself attracted to the boy she grew up with, all
the while knowing that aiding the fugitive could get her put to death.
The story arc of that particular trio is easy to follow. Problem is, and
this is just a dumb kid from Brooklyn talking, that the story arcs of
the supporting characters aren't clear and, even with dialog explaining
why each is staying at Danielstown, there's no great sense that any of
their particular stories matter. If Lois is truly meaning to see if any
kind of spark still exists between her and Hugo, it isn't apparent.
Hugo's wife, Francie is as meek and nonexistent as the proverbial fly on
the wall. As for the elderly Lord and Lady Naylor, even with the minute
amount of screen time they receive, they firmly establish the background
of the tale, and Smith's performance is (as usual) head and tails above
all else as she brings the full weight of English class consciousness
crashing down on the head of the poor Captain.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Last September, he would have
paid...
Rent, even if you're into this kind of flick.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
Didja ever look at a cake and know that you should only eat a slice but,
maybe the munchies were setting in and, you ate the whole thing? That
kind of describes Edward Norton's debut directing style in Keeping the
Faith, a stylishly written and at times extremely funny story of a
priest a rabbi and the girl they've both loved since the sixth grade.
What starts at a boil (consider the idea of your local religious leader
doing standup at Services) soon falls to a low simmer, only
occassionally coming back to the full boil.
And only the priest walks into a bar, so you'll get none of those jokes
from me.
Brian Kilkenny Flynn (Edward Norton) is the Priest. Jacob Schram (Ben
Stiller) is the Rabbi. Anna Reilly (Jenna Elfman) is the grownup
corporate exec now returning to New York after a twenty something year
absence. The visit is temporary, Anna's gonna save another corporation,
but it affords her the opportunity to catch up with old friends.
Both men go to pick up their friend at the airport and when she walks
through the gates, both draws drop and testosterone levels flare. Of
course, one man is wearing a Roman collar and the other man is of the
wrong Faith, so whatcha gonna do other than be friends?
They're gonna do everything your dirty li'l minds are contemplating,
even as we speak. And they're gonna do it with style and sass and it's
all nicely written and a joy to watch . . . and watch some more . . .
and on and on and on, past the two hour mark (which is at least half an
hour too long for a romantic comedy). While it's a welcome change to see
Edward Norton do something light, when Elfman isn't on the screen,
mostly in the third act, the movie fades. Which is a roundabout way of
saying that Jenna Elfman delivers a terrific, big-name star level
performance (and this from a guy who doesn't like her teevee sitcom
Dharma and Greg at all). When she's on screen, any instinct to look at
your watch vanishes. She's funny, she's hot, she's kicking out the star
jams right and left.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Keeping the Faith, he would have
paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
IN SHORT: At least there's a satisfying ending
His brother, Donnie, was right, Mark Wahlberg can't sing. But he can
play the average middle class guy, in this case a homesick soldier,
well. Ice Cube finally delivers a good performance and George Clooney is
subtle and superb in Three Kings, in which greedy Ugly Americans learn
all about moral courage. I've said this several times on CNN, the better
movies should offer you characters that you can believe in. They should
push your buttons (good or bad) and provoke some kind of reaction --
whether it's laughter or anger -- and Three Kings provoked both in
Cranky.
The setting is the 1991 Gulf War, cheered by those too young to remember
Vietnam, because "we kicked Sadaam's ass," and reviled by us old folks,
liberal and conservative alike, because we didn't finish the thing and
take Sadaam Hussein down for good. David O. Russell's script for Three
Kings, inspired by a true event during the Vietnam War, doesn't dance
lightly around the politics and violence of the situation. Soldiers are
ordered to do nothing as Iraqi troops gun down their own civilians --
this after we said we'd support any uprising against said troops. Things
organic and non-organic, explode as necessary and always to make some
kind of story point. Nothing gratuitous, here, so points to Russell for
that. Politically, being the old fart that I am, my stomach was turning
to the point that it got in the way of enjoying the flick. Across the
board, after the fact, everyone I spoke with after the screening was
positive towards the movie. So I'll stay the hell away from the
political soap box as much as possible and get on with the nitty gritty.
The Gulf War, as we see it, is populated by enlisted men who are not
exactly the best and the brightest, enemy troops who are even dumber,
jaded Special Forces officers who want a bigger payoff and bulldog tough
television reporters with inferiority complexes. The humor in Russell's
script runs close to satire (and satire has killed three very funny
movies this year alone). His directorial style is hard core, liberally
tossing film processing and camera tricks at you, to the point that they
intrude on the telling of the tale. The strength is in his script, which
allows for redemption and a happy ending that we all hold so near and
dear to our hearts.
Our grunts are Army Sgt. Troy Barlow (Wahlberg), who has spent the war
doing cleaning up after the hi tech troops. As the film starts he still
hasn't notched his first kill. Still, he's the moral center, and looked
up to by Pvt. Conrad Elgin (Spike Jonze), who is illiterate,
undereducated and unemployable back home. Rounding up surrendering
solders they discover a map that Staff Sergeant Chief Elgin (Ice Cube)
believes to show the location of bunkers containing gold and other goods
Sadaam Hussein has boosted from Kuwait. Rather than turning the map over
to their Commanding Officer, they fall under the spell of Special Forces
Captain Archie Gates (Clooney) who convinces the grunts that, with a
borrowed truck and a couple of hours of AWOL time, they can go home and
never have to work a day in their lives. Materialistic to the core, it's
off to raid the bunkers.
Adding a bit of humor to the location is a CNN type reporter, Adriana
Cruz (Nora Dunn). Clooney's character is supposed to be leading her to
the good stories (just what we train our Green Berets to do) but Clooney
is shtupping one of Cruz' much younger, and prettier, rivals. Labeling
both of 'em as burnout cases would be kind, but would be true. The
conflict between the two  she's annoying, he doesn't want to play the
PR game, even under orders -- helps take some of the edge off the rest
of the flick.
This isn't a "greed is good" flick, though that's how it begins. Yes,
the gold is found. Yes, our boys stand by and do nothing as Iraqui
troops trash their own civilians (it was part of the cease fire deal, as
explained ad nauseum). Yes, the violence is graphic and sobering and
shut up the laughing audience very quickly. And, yes (finally) they do
the right thing, made even more poignant because the rest of the Army
doesn't want to.
I've been staring a the keyboards for two hours now folks. This thing is
pissing me off politically and I promised I'd stay the hell away from
that. So, goodnight.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Three Kings, he would have paid...
I'll say it again. Despite skipping the bleach, Three Kings is well
made, well acted, and it sure as hell got a reaction out of this guy.
That's what I say I want 'em to do. That's what Three Kings did and why
the flick hits the "recommended" level. I also know my history, folks.
Films that piss me off like this invariably become monster hits, so
don't bother with the flame mail. I've seen it all before.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Eyes Wide Shut
Rated [R], 2 hours 40 minutes
Starring Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman;
Screenplay by Stanley Kubrick and Frederic Raphael
Inspired by the novel "Traumnovelle" by Arthur Schnitzler
Directed by Stanley Kubrick
website: http://www.eyeswideshut.com
BEFORE WE BEGIN: American movie theaters will show a CGI censored
version of Stanley Kubrick's Eyes Wide Shut. It has nothing to do with a
lack of corporate cajones on Time-Warner's part. No, the folks at the
MPAA, fearful that 65 seconds of frenetic thrusting in a simulated
sexual frenzy would warp our little minds, initially rated Kubrick's
final cut a deadly [NC-17]. To attain a commercially viable [R], a
couple of computer generated bodies, some clothed some not, were
inserted (sic) with permission of Kubrick's producer (his
sister-in-law). You try to figure out the MPAA thinking on this.
"Thrusting" is OK when it's, like, a spear through an eyeball (pick a
slice 'n' dice flick) or a fireplace poker through (and castrating) a
man's genitals (Carrie 2). But a little hererosexual ass wiggling is
verboten. Naked homosexual touchy feely and tongue entwining (Edge of
Seventeen) is OK for [R] but simulated breeder bump and grind is
perverse? Someone at the MPAA needs a reality check.
Well, you need some anecdotal background first, thoughtfully provided by
director Peter Bogdonavich whose oral history of Kubrick ran in the http://search.nytimes.com/search/daily/bin/fastweb?getdoc+site+site+78135+0+wAAA+stanley%7Ekubrick"
target="_blank">New York Times Magazine (the link is free, but
registration is required). In it, Jerry Lewis recounts a conversation he
and Kubrick had when they were in adjoining editing suites, Kubrick
working on 2001: A Space Odyssey and Lewis on something only the French
would like. Lewis said to Kubrick "You cannot polish a turd". Kubrick
responded "You can if you freeze it."
Eyes Wide Shut is visually stunning and emotionally cold. It moves as
slow as molasses, and the damn piano thumping (heard in the teevee
commercial) soundtrack is incredibly annoying. As for the performances,
my colleague, Harvey Karten, put it better than I ever could when he
wrote: "Conversations ... are almost painfully deliberate, as though
Kubrick were petitioning his audience to lean on each word as though
concocted on Mount Sinai." Cranky cannot praise or condemn the work of
Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman or Sydney Pollack because the heavy hand of
Kubrick's direction has squashed any emotional nuance they could have
delivered to the density of a black hole.
That being said, those film students inclined to see Kubrick's Eyes Wide
Shut will do so regardless of what any critic says so, in deference to
them: As with The Shining, the cinematography is outstanding. That
Kubrick intentionally shifts to a grainy look at the very end of the
flick is a symbolic move that is in keeping with the meticulous
production planning he is known for. The title of the movie itself is
itself symbolic, as researched and explained by Entertainment Tonight as
psychologically indicative of a waking dream state. Cranky's real time
experience indicates that "Eyes Wide Shut" is more indicative of his
struggle to keep his eyes open while waiting for the film to make its
point, which it does only in the final line of dialog, nine thousand
seconds or so after the initial, visual revelation that Nicole Kidman's
character is adverse to wearing underwear. By the time that final line
of dialog hit, Cranky didn't care.
Cranky writes for the people that pay cold cash for their movies, and
reports that paying full ticket price for Eyes Wide Shut would be a
waste of your money. It is definitely a waste of your time.
Dr. William Harford (Cruise) and his lovely wife Alice (Kidman) have
been invited to a Christmas party, they are not sure why, by the
fabulously wealthy Victor Ziegler (Sydney Pollack). At the party, Bill
sees his wife dancing way too closely with a smooth-talking Hungarian
Sandor Szavost (Sky Dumont). Alice sees her husband flirting with, and
disappearing with, models Gayle and Nuala (Louise Taylor and Stewart
Thorndike). She assumes the worst but doesn't slip off with the
Hungarian. Post party, fueled by a couple of tokes on a doobie, the
couple get into an argument about marital fidelity and Alice reveals
that, once, she thought about cheating with a naval officer she met in a
holiday hotel. Bill is shocked (Shocked! I say!) by the admission and
can't get the fantasy images (thoughtfully photographed in black and
white just in case we, the viewing audience, can't distinguish fantasy
from reality) of his wife and her naval officer out of his mind.
When presented with the opportunity to do something about it (ie. cheat
with a damn fine looking street whore, played by Vinessa Shaw, who comes
on to him after he's been assaulted by some drunken collegiates who
assume this good looking guy wandering down Christopher Street, a known
gay area in New York, is gay), he doesn't. In short order, Bill is
tempted by a teen slut (Leelee Sobieski); crashes a super-exclusive orgy
in which the emotionally vacant super-rich, all in masks and robes,
watch the hired help copulate; is threatened with great bodily harm for
crashing said orgy; is again tempted by the teen slut, this time with
full encouragement of said slut's father (Rade Sherbedgia). Then his
friends get beat up and various acquaintances start dying, all in a
24-hour period. It may be coincidence. It may be conspiracy. It may be
someone screwing with his brain. Regardless, It is boring as hell.
Cranky wonders if Kubrick is cackling from the Great Beyond at the
critics who have missed the point of Eyes Wide Shut; that point being
you can read way too much into any situation and blow your perceptions
up into a delusion bordering on the epic. Having worked on big budget
films, I report from experience that no professional filmmaker that I've
met intentionally sets out to make a bad film but, based on what I saw
at the screening, I'm wondering if Kubrick did just that. In his best
work (Dr. Strangelove, 2001: A Space Odyssey, A Clockwork Orange and The
Shining) he pushed genre and expectations far beyond any previously
conceived boundary. So why not create a plodding, tedious, emotionally
tight-fisted two hour and forty minute endurance test just to see how
many film critics would write knee jerk acclamations based on
non-existent symbolism they interpret to have a greater meaning? Having
set the high bar for political satire, SF, horror and war flicks, why
not out do Ed Wood? It's the only explanation that makes sense.
Wood's final film masterpiece, I Woke Up Early The Day I Died, starring
Billy Zane, will probably take the title back when it's released in
September.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Eyes Wide Shut, he would have
paid...
For what you would spend on a pair of tickets, you could buy legitimate
Kubrick masterpieces on VHS
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Happy Texas
Rated  [PG-13], 104 minutes
Starring Jeremy Northam, Steve Zahn, William H. Macy, Ally Walker,
Illeana Douglas
Screenplay by Ed Stone and Phil Reeves
Directed by Mark Illsley
website: http://www.happy-texas.com
Lessee what we got here. We got three bankrobbers: one dumb, one brutal
and one average, normalguy con, all escaped from a Texas chain gang.
We've got an old maid school teacher. We've got a straight arrow cop and
a beautiful woman as a (business) authority figure in a small town in
which none of the principals have anything resembling a love life. Toss
gently with a case of mistaken identity and whether you call 'em stock
characters or stereotypes, if you've seen 'em once, you've seen 'em a
thousand times, written by a thousand different hacks, banging away at
their keyboards trying to pay the rent . . .
And on try number One Thousand and One, you find a pair of writers who
know what they're doing, in this case Ed Stone and Phil Reeves. The pair
take ordinary people in, for the most part, ordinary situations and give
a fistful of good actors some great material to build greater characters
with. When stuff like this happens, and it's usually with the "smaller"
and mostly independently produced films, we critics jump up and down and
yell until we're blue in the face, to try and drum up support for 'em.
Especially as the deluge of Oscar wannabe monstrosities comes surging at
us. But, being as the citizens of Happy, Texas are good, quiet folk,
Cranky will say it quietly: "please see this movie." It's sweet and it's
simple and it's heartfelt and it's well worth your time.
Simply: Three cons escape from a chain gang. Bob Maslow (M.C. Gainey)
finds the keys, unlocks himself and runs away. Harry Sawyer (Jeremy
Northam) and Wayne Wayne Wayne Jr. (Steve Zahn) either don't try to find
the keys that Bob has tossed, or are just to dim to go looking for 'em.
It doesn't matter; chained cons are just funnier. Harry and Wayne steal
a broken down RV and through coincidences to, um, coincidental to give
away, find themselves taking on the identities of the actual owners of
the RV in the sleepy little town called Happy. Year after year, Happy
has sent their happiest little kidlets off to the "Little Miss Squeezed
Pageant". Year after year, they failed to place any contestants. So the
good citizenry hired David and Steve, professional beauty pageant
coaches, to better their chances. The town knows they've hired pros 'cuz
they read about 'em in a magazine . . .
And, of course, the men are gay, which is probably why the people of
Happy think they've got the best. That's as far as any stereotypical
"gay" jokes go. "Steve" (formerly Harry) sees a bank ripe for plunder,
and a lovely bank manager named Joe (as in Josephine, played by Ally
Walker) to fall in love with. "David" (formerly Wayne) is left to teach
the seven year old kidlets how to sing and dance. He can do neither, of
course, but he has the aid of the local old maid schoolmarm, Ms.
Schaefer (Illeana Douglas). The entire town is protected by, and under
the watchful eye of, Sheriff Chappy Dent (William H. Macy) who also has
his eyes out for "love".
We spoke with William H. Macy back when Mystery Men came out and he made
a point of mentioning how happy he was with this movie. We're going to
go hunting down the clip so you can hear it for yourself. In the
meantime, if Happy Texas comes around (its initial release is so limited
you're going to have to keep your eyes peeled) do your approximation of
a two step shuffle-on-over to your local theater. You'll be remembering
Steve Zahn (first noted as the Peter Scolari lookalike last seen in Tom
Hanks' That Thing You Do) whose Wayne sets new standards for dense and
lovable.
With the new teevee season starting, I thought I'd mention that Walker
comes via the small screen's "Profiler" on NBC. Douglas is currently in
Fox's "Action". And once upon a time "Beast" Ron Perlman has a small
supporting role as the Texas Marshal from the next town up the street.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Happy Texas, he would have paid...
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Saving Grace (2000)
Saving Grace
Starring Brenda Blethyn and Craig Ferguson
Screenplay by Craig Ferguson and Mark Crowdy; story by Crowdy
Directed by Nigel Cole
Another death in a small British town story, complete with a Steve
Harley song in the soundtrack, is Saving Grace. This film, which proves
that "intelligent dope humor" is not an oxymoron, is co-scripted by star
Craig Ferguson of the Drew Carey Show, who did a similar turn on The Big
Tease earlier in the year. This one is much funnier and allows us Yanks
to see a much lighter side of twice Oscar nominated actress Brenda
Blethyn. It also maintains a streak of small Brit films that, like
Waking Ned Devine and The Full Monty, are gangbusters comedy and sweet
as fine chocolate.
The talk in the town of Cornwall is that Grace Trevathan's husband was
looking for the loo when he stepped out the door of a plane and
plummeted ten thousand feet or so to his death. It matters not to Grace
(Blethyn), who has spent the last thirty or so years in her greenhouse,
cultivating hybrid flowers. After hubby shuffles off, the dear widow
discovers that her old man had mortgaged the house and all their assets
up the wazoo, leaving her half a million dollars (give or take) in debt.
With a minimum monthly nut of Ł2000 to meet -- and we haven't even
gotten to what the greedy banker in London wants -- this poor woman,
who's never worked a day in her life finds herself involving her
gardener Matthew (Ferguson), who also has never worked a day in his
life, in a very illegal scheme.
Y'see, Matthew has a small stash of hemp plants out behind the local RC
church which provides a poor quality smoke for the local bartender and
doctor and friends. But winter is coming in and his plants are getting
sick and he asks the best plant person he knows, Grace, for help. Grace
recognizes the plants. She knows they are illegal, but the beating
horticulturist heart within allows her to take one and only one plant
from its resting place, and save it in the quiet of her greenhouse.
There, the weed grows like gangbusters. Quite innocently, Grace askes
Matthew how much the plant is worth? "It's like gold" he says, and a
plan sprouts in Grace's head. Grace rescues the remainder of Matthew's
hidden stock and sets to work breeding new sprouts in a hydroponic
garden. That takes an enormous amount of capital, specifically, hours
and hours of the brightest light, which illuminates the countryside for
miles around. The entire town sees the lightshow. They set their clocks
by it and the local constable seems blissfully ignorant. The plants
which Grace has cultivated, when all is said and done, would win raves
from anyone who has ever had any exposure to raw buds on a stick. High
Times magazine could do a cover story.
Two things to emphasize here: Grace is not a dopehead. She doesn't have
anything to do with the stuff until she insists on a sample so that she
could know what this pernicious weed is doing to people. Second, Grace
doesn't want anyone taking a fall for her illegal actions, so she packs
up a couple of sticks and heads for London's sleazy market district on
Portobello Road, leaving Matthew far behind. She sticks out like a sore
thumb and is rescued from certain doom by her late husband's mistress.
There's little anger between the two ladies, though one has connections
the other doesn't. Then, in slam bang fashion, a street hippie is
praying to his God after two tokes on a sample, a connection is made
with a sleazy underworld type Dealer (Tcheky Karyo), and a breakneck
chase is on as Grace heads back up to Cornwall to fulfill her part of
the bargain. Following her is a lackey of the Dealer and the hippie.
Following them are the local cops. And waiting at her home is the
banker, ready to seize the estate.
Wrapping it all off is a surprising, and totally legal, pair of
sequences which have to be seen to be believed. So see it already.
Blethyn's Grace may be sweet and a bit naive, but she's got gumption.
Ferguson's Matthew is a perfect example of a lackadaisakle man who must
face up to his responsibilities as a life partner to Nicky (Valerie
Edmond), a woman who can gut a mackeral in ten seconds flat and the
mother of his forthcoming child -- he doesn't know about that, which
adds a nice layer to the story.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Saving Grace, he would have paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
IN SHORT: For once, a Bullock flick I didn't like. . .
Even while going through the alcoholic/pill-popper withdrawal that
occurs early on in 28 Days, the closest thing to a "heavy" flick Sandra
Bullock has done in the last few years, try as she might Bullock just
can't look bad. And while you might assume that, since the premise is
party-girl-in-forced-rehab, this flick is one bit of bad news after
another, you'd be wrong. It's not a giggle a minute,
let's-make-fun-of-the-addicts, laugh-fest either, though there is a
helluva lot more humor in the piece than you would expect. Once again,
we point the finger at director Betty Thomas who has, since moving up to
the movie director's chair after many years as a teevee actor on an
"obscure" show called Hill Street Blues), taken material that we all
thought was impossible to bring to the big screen (last time out with
Howard Stern's Private Parts) and made the impossible happen. A fistful
of talent and the earnest endeavors of her cast almost do it again.
Almost.
That's about as close to a rave as you're gonna get from me, 'cuz over
all this is one of those situations where good intentions fall flat and
we get just an OK movie.
Gwen Cummings (Bullock) is the party girl. She likes The Clash, beer (or
anything else suitably alcoholic to wash down the Vicodan pills she
pops) and night long sloppy sex with boyfriend Jasper (Dominic West).
Not necessarily in that order. When a nightmare hangover pushes Gwen to
reup the stupor levels, she ruins her sister Lily's wedding and in short
order trashes a wedding cake, a limousine, and a suburban home (complete
with ornamental lawn jockey, so un-PC these days, on its front lawn).
Given the choice of jail time or 28 days in rehab, Gwen chooses door
number two. . .
.. . . and is welcomed with open arms to Serenity Glen, a lovely oasis of
tranquility and positive affirmation out in the country. Here, Lawrence
Welk blares from the public address system, Bill Wither's "Lean on Me"
is transformed into a life enhancing chant and your first day includes a
full search of your possessions and confiscation of any cell phone,
coke, booze, pills, heroin, pot, syringes or glass objects (heck, if you
had to chant "Lean On Me" a dozen times a day, you'd wanna slash your
wrists, too!) that you'd try to sneak in.
Cigarettes are fine, though. Virtually all the characters smoke like
fiends. That may be the way it is in real life but that little
inconsistency is like a stone stuck in your shoe that you can't shake
out. It's always calling attention to itself. Onwards...
While the flick is filled with characters whose backgrounds are colorful
and just well developed enough that they're not stereotypes -- Gwen's 17
year old junkie roommate Andrea (Azura Skye), a famous baseball player
(Viggo Mortensen), a gay German guy (Alan Tudyk) whose problem even I
couldn't figure out -- Gwen must battle the question of whether to dump
her enabler (that would be Jasper) who willingly smuggles in booze and
pills (One at Gwen's request. The other as an attempt to lure her back
to the Dark Side) or shovel horsepoop with a smiling face (it's
therapeutic) for a month and then get back to "normal".
As proof that there is life after rehabilitation, we get to meet
Counselor Cornell (Steve Buscemi). Buscemi's casting alone is such a
stroke of genius that I can only report that the sum of the parts is not
greater than the whole. Nor is it a total disaster. The plus is that the
flick doesn't resort to stereotypes for a cheap laugh. The minus is that
I didn't care even a whit for Bullock's Gwen.
That lack of sympathy doesn't come from my own baggage, which I've
always laid those out so you can decide if I've tinted the picture: I'm
virulently anti-drunk driving, having lost a dear friend to one. On the
flip side I go through a self-imposed detox every three months off the
addictive medications that keep me alive. Personally, I think one
offsets the other and now you know.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to 28 Days, he would have paid...
Pay per view level. As much as I adore Sandra Bullock (yeah, I do), I
didn't adore 28 Days.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Into My Heart (1998)
IN SHORT: Too damn precious, even for the intended arthouse circuit
What do you do if you fall in love with your best friend's girl? If
stories like these haven't been done to death in movies, they've sure
been done to death in rock 'n' roll songs. You'd save a lot of time
sticking to worn out CD's by Clapton and The Cars (yeah, I'm dating
myself) because Into My Heart will not satisfy on any level. What ticks
me off about this flick is its insistence on forcing an open ending to
stir discussion after the fact. Like all other arthouse failures it
pushes the button that immediately makes its characters behave in
unbelievable ways. That's my read. The alternative critique would be
that the performances are so understated that a mook like me is left
staring at his watch. I think better of actors than that. But I'm still
a mook.
Within a minute or so of the film's start, one character has fallen off
the side of a old stone tower up in Massachusettes. It may have been an
accident. It may have been a suicide attempt. In flashback, we meet and
greet our principal players and spend all our time watching the process
of character development.
Adam (Jake Weber) and Ben (Rob Morrow) have been friends since nursery
school. They went to college together. They were together when Adam saw
Nina (Claire Forlani) and was struck down hard. Ben goes west for grad
school. Adam and Nina stay east and marry. Ben returns with new flame
Kat (Jayne Brooke) on his arm. Two happy, loving couples. So far, so
good, if you've got 20/20 hearing 'cuz both men mumble almost every line
of dialog. If you make it through that barrier, pay attention. This
script is all comfortable friends stuff, and not all that interesting
dramatically. Emotionally, except for a line of expository dialog here
and there, not much occurs, either. Along the line, Ben makes an advance
on Nina and they eventually spend a night in bed together while their
partners are out of town doing that workaholic yuppie thing.
Later on down the line, Adam and Ben are reminiscing about childhood
memories. Nina interrupts the mumbling and calls Ben a s***thead. This
translates in Adam's head as "my wife is sleeping with my best friend"
and a man who didn't cry when a fireworks accident blew out his eyeball
sheds a single solitary tear at the recognition of betrayal. That's
artsy-fartsy pretentious, friends, and this flick is swimming in it.
Into My Heart best demonstrates the peril all writer/directors go
through on their first film -- they are so familiar with their
characters and the inner motives and worlds of the same, that little of
these necessary bacground pieces are laid out in front of the audience.
The utter lack of chemistry between Morrow and Forlani strip out any
emotional accessibility you might want. It all comes to a head when the
film snaps back to "real" time when Morrow offers his sympathy in a
manner that should have got his face slapped. The writer/director team
choose to go in a different direction, thus enabling your post viewing
conversation. Either way, the emotional reactions are so muted, they may
as well not be there.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Into My Heart, he would have paid...
For Jayne Brook who, as the "outsider" to this intimate trio, delivers
the only believable performance in the movie. Even if you live in an
arthouse, viewing such a pretentious and precious work is more than you
should endure.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for East Is East (1999)
IN SHORT: And now, an awards laden flick from across the Pond
"Tradition" may have been a rousing song from Fiddler on the Roof, but
the concept of maintaining old country ways after immigrating to the New
World is universal. It's also at the root of East Is East, a very funny
tale of cultures clashing and a father's doomed effort to force his
kidlets to adhere to the old ways. It's a bigger problem than it reads,
because Papa hasn't toed the line perfectly.
As if in rigid opposition to My Son The Fanatic the last Om Puri starrer
in which he played a tried and true assimilationist, in East is East,
Puri's character is determined to maintain "traditional" Pakistani
culture and traditions in his Manchester, England based family. But for
George Khan (Puri), tradition stopped when he changed his name and
abandoned his still in Pakistan wife. George marries the English native
Ella (Linda Bassett) and bows to her wish to remain in her Catholic
neighborhood. Twenty five years down the line, while his seven kidlets
have been raised in the Muslim faith, they take delight in participating
in the pageantry of Catholic holiday street parades. East is East gets
off to a delightful start as the mom and kidlets, carrying a statue of
the Virgin Mary in such a parade, are tipped that dad has come home
early from Mosque and is spectating a couple of blocks up the road.
Think Keystone Kops as they dash through back alleyways to avoid
George's fearsome wrath.
And George's wrath is fearsome as is his overwhelming need for control
over every aspect of his family's life. Central to the story is the Paki
tradition of arranged marriages, which is where we start this flick.
Eldest son Nazir (Ian Aspinall) is the first to the altar, dressed in
traditional and very colorful gear. But, for reasons that will lead to a
good chuckle in the third act, Nazir bolts for the door and leaves his
attractive bride to be at the altar. George declares that his son is
"dead" and that no one in the family will have contact with the boy.
Completely ignorant to the fact that this particular tradition is
abhorrently retro to the raised as English kidlets, George begins work
fixing up sons 2 and 3, Tariq (Jimi Mistry) and Abdul (Raji James).
Outside of dad's earshot, these boys call themselves Tony and Arthur,
and are having quite a nice time entertaining the local girls and
hitting the discos, once mom and dad are asleep. Abdul is a fairly
observant Muslim, Tariq is the exotic boy toy beloved by the girls in
the clubs. When they meet their matches, oh, the horror.
Culture clash movies, if they're well written, are usually fun to watch
because you can step way back as an outside observer. While most of the
situations in this film are terrifically funny, George is a brute, with
all that implies. At his core is a worn down terrified man who, for all
his attempts to adhere to tradition, is as hypocritical as he sees his
kidlets. His balance is Ella, and the reasons she puts up with George
are what you'll be discussing afterwards. Love, I guess, is a strange
and wondrous thing.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to East is East, he would have paid...
Good performances by both Puri and Basset got them nominations for the
Brit equivalent of Oscar and the film has taken noms as Best Picture and
Best British Film. Those who frequent the arthouses will flock to this
flick. Those beyond teenflicks who want something a little more
substantial should head there as well.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Stiff Upper Lips (1998)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Stiff Upper Lips
Starring Peter Ustinov, Prunella Scales, Georgina Cates, Samuel West,
Brian Glover, Robert Portal
Screenplay by Paul Simpkin & Gary Sinyor
Directed by Gary Sinyor
website: http://www.cowboybi.com
IN SHORT: An almost outrageous parody of period films
The point of Stiff Upper Lips, a dead on parody of films made by
Merchant Ivory and Miramax, was to take apart the character value of
legendary British reserve, to savage the class structure imposed by the
royalty and upper class upon the lower (or "scum of the earth") class
and, in short, to pop the balloon of overinflated Brit Empire ego. What
the producers wanted to do was apply a Zucker Bros. comedy mentality (a
la Airplane! or The Naked Gun) to Merchant Ivory period piece dramas to
create the kind of Brit humor not seen since the halcyon days of Monty
Python's Flying Circus. Would that they had waited a year to make the
film, for in that intervening year the Zucker Bros. production deal was
terminated, and they could've landed the real thing.
Here's the setup: Facing old maid-hood at the ripe age of 22, young and
fair Emily (Georgina Cates) is introduced to the black-suited,
Latin-spouting bookworm Cedric Trilling (Robert Portal), a friend of her
brother Edward (Samuel West). When sparks fail to fly (and Cedric is
such a priss you'll wonder if he would rather be with Edward) the
matriarch of the family, Aunt Agnes (Prunella Scales) packs everyone up
for a holiday in Italy. Believing that a piece of England should always
be with them, they also pack up the lawn and employ local "scum of the
earth" handyman George (Sean Pertwee) to lug it, and a multitude of
luggage, around.
When he's not packing up the lawn, George is packing up Emily, proving
once and for all that the hired help is usually a man's/woman's best
friend. This, of course, doesn't make Cedric any more attractive for
Emily, so our merry band is off to India, where they guest with Cedric's
right-lunatic great uncle Horace (Peter Ustinov). Horace, in turn,
introduces Agnes to the joys of extra large bathtubs, probably the
funniest jibe on youth oriented period pieces. True, the idea of fat
wrinkled bodies doing the prune thing amidst torrents of bubbles may
turn your stomach, but it's a very funny bit.
And once Emily starts tossing her cookies at breakfast, well, Cedric may
be a priss, but he's of the right class, right?
Stiff Upper Lips, on the whole, is a funny, but not hysterical, take on
English period piece movies. It is slow paced; not the three gags a page
humor that was the standard in Airplane! Sure, half of the jokes in
Airplane! fell flat on their butts, but the audience never had time to
think about it before the next zinger came, um, zinging their way. Stiff
Upper Lips allows you too much breathing room.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Stiff Upper Lips, he would have
paid...
Rental level. Samuel West looks so much like the late Graham Chapman of
Monty Python that you'll wonder why the film didn't capitalize on that
visual connection.

Title
Review for Bats (1999/I)
IN SHORT: Guano. Perfect for 10 year olds.
Here we have a timed-for-Halloween-release scareflick about killer bats.
We're not talking small, potentially frightening domestic bats, which
don't eat meat. We're talking imported, endangered species variety,
genetically engineered to become perfect, controllable soldiers in the
war against who the hell knows what.
>From the pounding music accompanying the fast visual cuts slashing
across the screen, even before the opening credits hit, Cranky knew
(from experience) that this was going to be painful. A random attack
somewhere in Texas takes down two teens who had been debating whether he
was scum and whether she should put out. Typical teen stuff. Then, in a
flash, something attacks their car, fast cut, fast cut, fast cut, and
they're dead. A terrible start.
We meet eminent bat researcher Sheila Casper (Dina Meyer) and her
assistant Jimmy (Leon), pulled from a research assignment by a high
powered suit (Carlos Jacott) from the Center for Disease Control. With
him is the mysterious scientist, Dr. Alexander McCabe (Bob Gunton), who
bears a remarkable resemblance to a guy who used to sell frozen peas on
TV for a local supermarket chain. But I digress...
Down in Texas, the local badge belongs to Sheriff Emmett Kimsey (Lou
Diamond Phillips) who appreciates the high tech equipment that's been
choppered into his town. Problem is, anyone who has sat through any
number of would be scary flicks can see almost everything coming a
thousand miles away. The scientist has a secret. Check. The government
is somehow involved (but I'm not telling how). Check. One character
sacrifices him/herself to save another. Check. The black guy makes
jokes. Check. The dialog is funny without meaning to be. Double check.
Cranky, and the other reviewers, were almost rolling in the aisles -- we
weren't supposed to, but when you get lines like "I'm a Scientist. It's
What We Do." pronounced with all the self-importance of a Papal decree,
well, that's how incredibly tacky and dumb John Logan's screenplay is.
Director Louis Morneau uses a special lens to give us the "bat's eye
view" from time to time. Problem is, he uses the effect when there
aren't bats around, wasting the concept.
      Now remember that bats, the animal, move with stealth and can
attack before you know they're there. Bats are supposed to instill fear
and scare folk, and we all know what they did to a young Bruce Wayne,
which led Joel Schumacher to make to a pair of movies even worse than
this one. I'll be blunt about this. The only saving grace of Bats, the
movie, is to be found in the special effects. I'm talking about swarms
of bats attacking trucks, buildings, battering their way into locked off
spaces. With effects split between different companies, some of 'em
work. Some of 'em look cheesy. The models of the bats themselves, are so
damned ugly they're almost funny to look at, as they stalk their
victims.
But the first major attack, on a truck bearing our beloved pair of
heroes, is so damned cool looking that Cranky wonders what this thing
could've become if better hands where on the wheel.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Bats, he would have paid...
Dumb dialog. Little tension. Some nice effects. If you don't care about
story and just want the effects, fine. If my nephew were ten, he'd
gobble this up with a spoon.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Adventures of Sebastian Cole, The (1998)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: The Adventures of Sebastian Cole
Rated [R], 99 minutes
Starring Adrien Grenier, Clark Gregg, Aleksa Palladino,
Margaret Colin, Mami Lustig, John Shea
Written and Directed by Tod Williams
website: http://www.paramountclassics.com/cole_frame2.html
The Adventures of Sebastian Cole is one of those arthouse-centric movies
that goes heavy on character development and light on big story points.
Which is fine if the characters actually develop in some way. If they
progress from point A to, say, Point S. If they only get as far as Point
B, you're left to do all the work that the filmmakers should have done.
Sebastian Cole looked to be another coming of age story but is, in
actuality, more a series of reactions by the main character to small
events. Actors like pieces like this, because they get to develop Inner
Worlds to work from. If they their jobs well, we don't get to see them
"act". (usually a good thing). They do their jobs here, which means
there wasn't enough provided in writer/director Tod William's script to
satisfy me. It isn't that this is just a "small" film. It's downright
tiny.
The Adventures of Sebastian Cole begins with promise. Told in flashback,
we meet an upper-middle class family living life in the early 1980s.
Daughter Jessica (Mami Lustig) is leaving for college. Son Sebastian
(Adrian Grenier) is closing in on his last year of high school.
Step-father Hank (Clark Gregg) announces that he'd rather be Mother
Henrietta. Mom Joan (Margaret Colin) decides to take her son and return
to her native England.
That's a great beginning. Think how you'd react to this literally life
altering news. You could get angry, as Jessica does. You could meekly
accept, as Joan does. You could try to deal with it, which is what
Sebastian will do eight months on when he returns from England looking
like an 80s version of a mod. He's got frosted hair, styled clothes, not
as extreme as Flock of Seagulls but on that track.
His friends welcome him back. He finds a girlfriend, Mary. He balances
his real dad (John Shea) and that family with the very masculine
authority figure, who is always wearing a dress, that he lives with.
While Clark Gregg makes a really ugly woman, he pulls off the transition
with great skill. Indeed, his is the only character that you get a real
feeling for as Hank/Henrietta makes the full move from imitating
woman-hood to establishing a full identity as a woman to the final trip
to the clinic for the snip snip that will permanently end one life and
begin another.
Which leaves Sebastian, who has the usual rebellious streak that
teenagers have. Despite the strange twist life has presented, he seems
to be a fairly normal kid. He harbors ambitions to have great adventures
and to write of his experiences, as the young Hemingway did. While he
does have what he considers to be adventures, he never writes of them.
In short, just your average slightly-better-than-slacker teen.
When I first started writing this review, just after the screening, I
was really prepared to dump it into arthouse hell. Now, 24 hours later,
I've softened but not much. I don't consider The Adventures of Sebastian
Cole to be a great flick but the performances, at minimum, were good
enough to keep my attention focused while waiting for something to
happen. When that time hit, and I won't tell you what it was, it wasn't
enough for me.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Adventures of Sebastian Cole, he
would have paid...
Rental level. The Adventures of Sebastian Cole is strictly for the
arthouse and festival circuit. If this is where you hang, this is what
you'll see.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark and Copyright Š 1999 by Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved

Title
Review for Muppets From Space (1999)
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Muppets From Space
Rated [G], 90 minutes
Starring Jeffrey Tambor, F. Murray Abraham, Ray Liotta, Andie MacDowell,
"Hollywood" Hulk Hogan
Written by Jerry Juhl and Joseph Mazzarino and Ken Kaufman
Directed by Timothy Hill
website: http://www.muppetworld.com
The Muppets are performed by Dave Goelz, Steve Whitmire Bill Barretta
and Frank Oz. Created by Jim Henson.
Cranky must admit, he always did prefer it when the Muppets dropped
their personalities into literary classics, as in the riotous Muppet
Treasure Island. Then again, they've always had scripts that wrote humor
a couple of levels deep. With Muppets From Space, everything is much
simpler and will appeal mainly to the single digit kidlets, even with a
brilliantly funny opening sequence; a fever dream of Biblical
proportions. Gonzo the Great, whatever he is, is tormented by nightmares
of being turned away from Noah's ark. F. Murray Abraham is Noah, in the
first of many celebrity cameos that the Muppets are known for.
No role playing here. We see the Muppets in their daily routines. Miss
Piggy goes off to work at a local television station. Kermit deals with
the everyday chores of running the rooming house they share. Gonzo's
cereal talks to him.
It's The Muppets, folks. Of course the cereal communicates. Andie
MacDowell challenges Miss Piggy for dominance of the teevee airwaves.
David Arquette plays the evil research scientist. Pat Hingle is a
military man who has no tolerance for aliens or felt. Simply, Muppets
>From Space is totally painless for us grown-ups. Then again, we ain't
the demographic target for this. As for kidlets, well, Cranky lugged his
niece Sherri, age 9, to a private screening. Then I stuffed her with
Chinese food and ice cream and put her to work.
Ladies and Gentlemen, the Cutesy Critic ...
 
Right from the horse's mouth, people. The screening room had lots of
kidlets, most of 'em single digits, and all were wowed. More cameos,
keeping the adults entertained: Rob Schneider, Rob Liotta, Hulk Hogan,
and Kathy Griffin. As well, the entire film pulsates to some of the
great rock 'n' soul tunes of the long ago 70s -- Billy Preston, Earth
Wind and Fire, the O'Jays, Commodores and Isley Brothers.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Muppets From Space, he would have
paid...
There are lots of flicks aiming at the teenkids, very few that a
parental unit can take the smaller younguns to. Muppets From Space fills
that bill nicely. So why is the rating at rental level? We rate for
grownups, and this flick is one we'll rent for the kids.
[and it's Animal. Did you even have to think about it???]
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Love Stinks (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Love Stinks
Rated [R], 93 minutes
Starring French Stewart, Bridgette Wilson, Tyra Banks, Bill
Bellamy;       Tiffani-Amber Thiessen, Steve Hytner, Jason Bateman
Written and Directed by Jeff Franklin
website: http://www.lovestinksthemovie.com
IN SHORT: The kind of story that requires you to have a decade or so of
dating hell under your belt, to appreciate the niddling nastiness that
plays out on screen.
Before we begin: In Cranky's last day of film school screenwriting
class, oh so many years ago, the teacher (in real life a script reader
for a major studio) warned us about the art of titles. Her main
suggestions: be very sure of your work, especially if you give your
project a title that the critics can use against you.
That would include words like "stinks", which aptly describes the first
15 or so minutes of writer/director Jeff Franklin's debut on the big
screen, after a very successful career on the small. That quarter hour
kickoff is so totally unfunny that one critic walked out of the press
screening. His loss, 'cuz from that point on, slowly but surely, Love
Stinks develops as an insidious and occasionally hilarious black comedy.
It's a small story, told in flashback from the toilet of a Las Vegas
bound jet. Inside said cubicle are best buds and TV sitcom writing
partners Seth Winnick (French Stewart) and Larry Garnett (Bill Bellamy).
Yeah, think all you want about the Mile High Club, I warned you that the
set up to this flick stinks. A year earlier, Larry married the ever
scrumptious Holly (Tyra Banks) and groomsman Seth met bride's maid
Chelsea (Bridgette Wilson). It was lust at first sight for Seth, Chelsea
knew immediately that he was "the one." From that moment on, well once
they dumped their dates, it was a fast track through the self-proclaimed
rules of when to hit the hay and generate tremors readable on the
Richter scale, even though she's a cat person and he's into dogs.
Before Chelsea turns into a angry, nasty, manipulative, controlling
rhymes-with-witch, she gets to parade around in lingerie and garters.
Which is a lovely diversion while French Stewart searches for the
background of the character he's portraying. After a year of waiting,
Chelsea goes ballistic because Seth presents her with diamond earrings
instead of a singular diamond ring. For his part, the battles are more
fodder to plug into his hit sitcom which allows California palimony laws
a full field of action to play on.
What makes Love Stinks different from, say, The War of the Roses is that
all the battles are fought on a very small field. Think of it this way:
if everything that your partner does that annoys you, that you still
ignore, were pushed just a bit further, how would you increase the vice
versa while trying to maintain some kind of civility? Cranky got sucked
into the humor when the flatulence jokes were unleashed -- 'cuz it comes
in the same way it does for all of us who have been coupled up, in bed.
Yes, I'm making a broad assumption here, but the comedy goes much
broader but no further down the toilet. Warren Zevon put it simply in a
song title many years ago, "Lawyers, Guns and Money..." but what is a
very small movie turned from painful to painless in a relatively short
period of time.
On the negative tech side, Franklin's teevee roots show. Love Stinks
looks like a television shoot, all close-ups or medium close-ups shot
well within the crop lines etched onto a film camera's viewfinder. Extra
points are deducted for allowing a sound boom to be seen in his visual
field.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Love Stinks, he would have paid . .

Title
Review for Passion of Mind (2000)
IN SHORT: One for the ladies. 66% interesting for the guys.
Passion of Mind, which brings Demi Moore back to the big screen, is a
fairly interesting and intriguing tale of what may be a severe case of
schizophrenia or flat out insanity or a very credible dream life on the
part of the main character. It would have been easy enough to turn this
movie into a SF fantasy of parallel worlds, which would have made this
boy happy, but that wasn't what it was meant to be. Here's the
interesting part . . .
Somewhere in the sun-drenched south of France lives the young widow
Marie (Moore) who is raising two beautiful girls. Marie is a freelance
writer whose income comes from penning book reviews for the New York
Times, though there is a stack of unpublished stories sitting in a box
in the closet. She has no man in her life, indeed, she is still in love
with the one she lost and is not seeking out new companionship. Each
night she puts her kids to bed, locks her bedroom door from the inside
and goes to sleep. Each morning she wakes up in New York City, as Marty,
owner of the MMT & Associates Literary Agency. A single woman with no
children and no love life who dreams about a family in France.
No schizophrenia here, folks. Each woman is very aware of the "life" of
the other woman. Each believes it to be a wonderful dream reality and
each is envious of aspects of the other. Marty, with a severe demeanor
and hair pinned back wishes for love and children. Marie, a veritable
earth mother, dreams of the high powered career. Each seeks out a shrink
to help deal with the dream fantasy and come to grips with reality. Each
falls in love, Marie with a writer (Stellan Skarsgaard) and Marty with a
client's accountant (William Fichtner). The big question is, of course,
which reality is "real" and what happens if Marie/Marty lets her lover
stay the night. Who will be in the bed when she wakes up?
That's a very interesting pair of parallel stories playing out on
screen. Moore does a fine job keeping the characteristics of each woman
clearly defined. We all know that, sooner or later, one life is going to
assert itself. There were several ways this story could have gone when
it reached that point, and the back of my brain was working in overdrive
as it anticipated the possibilities. The direction the film takes,
though, sets its sights at the ladies -- when Passion of Mind's big
psychological revelation hit towards the end, the screening room was
filled with sniffling like a thing alive. This poor old male sat there
thinking "huh?" as the rest of the story played out.
It wasn't that I couldn't follow which one was real. Everything that
follows was way beyond this dumb guy. Passion of Mind has all the feel
of an arthouse flick. Whether the tear factor is enough to get the
ladies to lug their gents along is a matter of word of mouth. The first
two acts of this eventual chick flick are well done and should hold male
interest. The last act is going to need explanation.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Passion of Mind, he would have
paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Sunshine (1999)
IN SHORT: Ralph Fiennes finely acting in yet another epic . . .
An epic tale of five generations of (what begins as) a Jewish family in
the heart of the Austro-Hungarian Empire, writer/director Istvan Szabo's
Sunshine allows star Ralph Fiennes to flex his acting muscles as he
plays three separate roles as a hundred years of time rolls endlessly
across the big screen. With its three hour running time, two thoughts
may flow through your heads...
1) if it's so good, why isn't it being held until November?, and
2) if the air conditioner is broken, three hours in a cool theater is
better than a hundred and twelve degrees in the shade . . .
Both thoughts are legit and both make it sound as if Sunshine is an
utter bomb, which it is not. It is, actually, a splendidly acted and
dazzling-to-watch two hours of film, recreating a world that hasn't
existed in almost a century. The problem is that this two hour wonder is
followed by a third, which essentially kills all the fun. But, says the
film student inside, historical epics aren't supposed to be fun!, to
which I reply that I would rather be left wanting to see more, than to
walk away without a positive, spirit enhancing conclusion to the piece
-- which Sunshine tries to deliver and doesn't.
Sunshine is the story of the family Sonnenschein, whose patriarch
Emmanuel (David De Keyser) made his fortune peddling an herbal tonic,
brand-named "Sunshine," from a pack on his back. Once successful and
established, with a factory cranking out his product and its recipe
secreted inside a hidden notebook, Emmanuel takes a wife and raises his
family. Gustave (James Frain) and Ignatz (Fiennes) are his pride and
joys. Valerie (Jennifer Ehle), an orphaned cousin on his wife's side, is
also raised as a sister to the boys. The family is nearly split in two
by political affiliations and the declared love of Ignatz and his
cousin, who marry despite "their" father's wishes. Ignatz, an
incorruptible judge, changes his name to "Sors" for political reasons --
no obvious Jews are allowed government -- and rises higher and higher in
the Empire, until historical events shuffle him off the screen. Gustave
flees to France, to be seen later, and Valerie raises her son Adam
(again, Fiennes), who becomes a champion fencer and a Gold Medal
recipient on the Hungarian Olympic team in Berlin.
To do so, Adam must turn his back on his religion and become a Roman
Catholic. In doing so, he meets his also-to-be-converted wife Hannah
(Molly Parker) and fathers a son, Ivan (again, Fiennes). Then comes The
Big One, where conversion and/or status in the country cannot protect
everyone in the family from doom. All of this, the epic tale of a
family's rise and fall and redemption and survival, is enough.
Once you get past the War (you'll hear a crowd chanting "Stalin! Stalin!
Stalin!") we suggest you pack up and leave, wanting more. If you wish to
sit through the Communist era, prepare to emerge like a balloon that has
deflated. It isn't that Sunshine fails here, it is just that the film
(perhaps all too accurately) portrays a love-less, joy-less, and fully
hypocritical time. Ivan and the remains of his family, including his
grandmother Valerie (Rosemary Harris) a returned uncle Gustave (John
Neville) must survive under Communism. Ivan must deal with his
experience in the camps and can never let the war go; his job is to hunt
down the traitors, first from the war and then the witchhunt of the
Stalinist purges. Important characters in this stage include William
Hurt as Ivan's boss and Deborah Kara Unger as the wife of a connected
party. For Ivan and his family this era, called "The Great Diminishing"
by Szabo is one bad turn after another. Even with a conclusion set in
the post-Communist free era, all that is left for the living is a sense
that they have survived.
And survival is not enough. Ivan's redemption, such as it is, is not
enough -- and I've left out tons of material laying out the bare bones
of the story for you. The first two hours are truly a magnificent
recreation of that time and world . . . and here you should know that I
can trace my family back to a time they were called Wittenbourg and
lived dead center in the middle of the Austro-Hungarian Empire. I may
bring more historical baggage into the theater with me, but this does
not mean I've overinflated my enjoyment of the first two acts. Fiennes'
roles, and Rosemary Harris' later, are both unique and touching. The
staging and production values are equally great. Szabo's original five
hour long script, in Hungarian, has survived both translation and
reduction with the help of noted playwright Israel Horwitz. The film
dearly needs an intermission and, I'm guessing, another half hour to
show if and how Ivan is truly redeemed.
The Commies wrecked it for everybody, I guess . . .
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Sunshine, he would have paid...
Rental level. If you can find it on the big screen at a decent price,
the first two hours are well worth the expenditure of cash.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
Jackie Chan was always different from all other martial arts stars 'cuz
he always laced his fights and his films with humor. Lots of it. Between
sight gags and his wonderful facial reactions, no language got in the
way of the fights and his movies made the international jump well. But
we are far past the time in which we could expect a nine point two
minutes long battle every nine point four minutes. As I wrote about Rush
Hour, and a phrase that applies as well to Shanghai Noon, this is not a
"Jackie Chan" flick in the chop sockey sense. So let's take it as a
regular movie starring Jackie Chan and see where that takes us.
There are certain things every good Western flick should have. Horses.
Injuns. A huge church bell clanging. A showdown on an empty street. A
hanging or two. A runaway horse and wagon. A damsel in distress and some
pony-tailed Jewish guys in dresses . . . That'll make sense when you see
the Shanghai Noon, which has everything a Western is supposed to have,
and twice again as many laughs. They're in the script. They're onscreen
in visual gags. They're all over Jackie Chan's face.
Beginning in the Forbidden City in the Western Year numbered 1881, we
first see the Chinese Imperial Guard and witness their utter devotion
and subservience to their Princess, Pei Pei (Lucy Liu). She, by Imperial
decree or custom, is to marry the next Emperor of China, who happens to
be a pudgy twelve years old boy. Her American tutor says he can smuggle
her out of the country and she, thinking it is of her own free will,
agrees. Only Chon Wang (Jackie Chan) sees her sneak out, but she orders
him to let her go. He, obedient servant that he has been trained to be
since birth, obeys. What the Princess doesn't know is that the tutor has
left a ransom note behind. And the Royal Court sends their best men to
retrieve the Princess . . .
.. . . which wouldn't include Jackie but he gets there anyway. On his way
to Carson City, where the ransom is to be paid, Jackie picks up a horse,
a Indian wife (Brandon Merrill) and an incompetent outlaw companion
(Owen Wilson) whose non-stop mouth offers up all the gags that Jackie's
English isn't good enough to provide. He battles both Cowboys and
Indians and ultimate bad guy Lo Fong (Roger Yuan) while picking up a
nickname and getting a bounty levied on his head. Once you get past the
opening sequence, set in the Forbidden City, there's some kind of gag in
every scene. Parents should note that there is some language and dope
humor that isn't exactly family friendly, thus the PG-13 rating on what
otherwise could've passed muster.
As in his last outing, Chan lets his sidekick steal the show. That would
be Wilson, sounding like a 90s California dude and taking apart the
classic showdown with an internal monolog that is flat out funny. Said
showdown also adds a psychotic marshal (Xander Berkeley) who dogs our
heroes as they search out the princess. Lucy Liu doesn't get a lot to
do, though she does show up some karate chops which'll be on better
display in Charlie's Angels later this year.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Shanghai Noon, he would have paid...
For the old school fan, it's thirty minutes between each Chan fight but
the last one is a whopper.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
IN SHORT: Start-up sparks fizzle, but not a dud.
Before we start, this is the kind of review Cranky hates to write
because a flick with more positives is going to get what appears to be a
negative rating, if you are a new reader and don't understand how we
work. If that's you Click here now.
So . . . what's wrong with this picture? Nothing, actually. It's a
perfectly average story with an OK script and direction. It is pleasing,
intelligent, humorous and there's good chemistry between stars Linda
Fiorentino and Paul Newman. Once the sparks get pulled out of the story
mix, everything settles way down. The sense of elation that we expect
from an underdog getting away with the big score "caper" flick just
isn't here.
We start on a high school Prom night, for soon to be marrieds Carol Ann
and Wayne McKay (Linda Fiorentino and Dermot Mulroney), the highpoint of
their lives, before and after. Fifteen or so years later, Carol is a
rehab therapist in a nursing home and Wayne works the night shift at an
unspecified job. The fire is almost gone from their marriage, unless a
certain song by The Cars reminds them of what was probably the biggest
thrill of their lives.
Into the home, whose population seems to be 99 per cent elderly ladies,
comes Henry Manning (Paul Newman). Manning, a notrious bank robber,
suffered such a severe stroke in prison that he has been temporarily
transferred out. Slumped in his wheel chair, with only the twitch of his
left hand to indicate that anything at all is functioning within his
body, Manning is essentially dead to the world. Except that Carol starts
to notice things, coincidences if you will, that indicate to her that
Manning isn't the vegetable that he appears to be. She makes it her duty
to try to get a rise out of the man. Literally. (OK, guys. Linda
Fiorentino in a nurse's uniform. Go to town. The flick does...) Until
the lady manages to crack the man's shell, this flick is a very sexy and
very funny good time. And Newman never speaks a word.
Carol's ultimate goal is to put the thrill back in her and Wayne's life.
She's determined to get Manning to teach her how to rob the local bank,
and get away with it. Oh, and Wayne, too. When the hubbie senses that
something naughty may be going on between his wife and the con, he lays
down the law, and Manning says "No problem." From that point on, the
sexual sparks fizzle and we're left with an average caper flick.
Why didn't Manning flee the home? It's covered in the script. How did he
pull off the stroke? It's covered in the script. How does the caper come
about and is it logical that it could succeed? It's covered in the
script. Is there an inevitable twist that puts the plans in jeopardy?
It's covered in the script, a couple of times to keep things
interesting. Where's the elation you're supposed to feel when the
inevitable occurs? Heck if I know. The script has everything it's
supposed to. The direction gets from point A to point B, but all the
pizazz goes out of the story early on. It's up to the director to keep
that chemistry sparking; in this case not letting the leads have any
kind of flirtatious back and forth is deadly.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Where the Money Is, he would have
paid...
Pay per view level. My parents, retired and eligible for dirt cheap
tickets, would love this kind of flick. To those of us for whom Paul
Newman is still a big star name (like me), if there's nothing else out
there of interest you might risk first run ticket prices, if they're not
too much above what your cable system will charge down the line.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Breakfast of Champions (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Breakfast of  Champions
Rated  [R]
Starring Bruce Willis, Albert Finney, Nick Nolte, Barbara Hershey,
Glenne Headly, Lukas Haas and Omar Epps
Screenplay by Alan Rudolph
Based on the novel by  Kurt Vonnegut
Directed by Alan Rudolph
website http://www.breakfastofchampions.movies.com
IN SHORT: Like eating Tang straight from the bottle
As a rule CrankyCritic.com doesn't compare to Source Material, but we
will make these observations: Among Cranky's favorite authors are Hunter
Thompson, whose work doesn't translate to the big screen. Neither does
Tom Robbins. Tom Wolfe is batting .500. I keep waiting for someone to
take a Kurt Vonnegut story and get some of the madness and
totally-perfect-for-the-page-and-only-the-page storytelling therein,
wrestle it to the ground and figure out how to stuff it into the
celluloid frame in a way that doesn't require immersion in the published
text. The wait continues.
Writer/Director Alan Rudolph sure has pumped some of the craziness onto
the big screen in his adaptation of Breakfast of Champions, but the fact
remains that Vonnegut doesn't translate. Part of it has to do with the
fact that the cultural climate of his most famous work included the post
WWII parents of Vietnam era kidlets and all the nutzoid schisms of the
60s. Thirty years later, give or take, the touchstones don't ring with
the same vibrancy. Well, maybe in California . . .
But the location on the map reads Midland City, which looks very much
like Twin Falls Idaho, a town with Dwayne Hoover's (Bruce Willis)
massive car lot on one side and the expansion settlement called Sugar
Creek -- built on a toxic waste dump -- on the other. In between is a
major traffic jam. Hoover's wife Celia (Barbara Hershey) is zonked out
on a tranquilizing medication called Relax. His son George (Lukas
Haas) prefers to be called Bunny, after his slippers and backpack, and
entertains the local patrons and various adulterers at the AmeriRest
Inn, coincidentally owned by and patronized by Dwayne, and dedicated
secretary Francine Pefko (Glenne Headly). Wait, there's more . . .
Frank Le Sabre (Nick Nolte), Duane's sales manager, likes to wear
women's clothing. Frank's dominating better half (Vicki Lewis) wants to
move to Maui. And there's an ex-con named Wayne Hoobler (Omar Epps)
idolizing the similarly named Dwayne Hoover living in a car on the lot.
Not to mention the looming presence of an EPA investigation of Sugar
Creek, or the Midland Arts Fair featuring "world renowned" author
Kilgore Trout (Albert Finney), who believes mirrors are better called
"Leaks" because parallel universes leak into each other via their
reflective properties. Or something. It is only when Hoover meets Trout,
is a sort of sanity and understanding imparted into a world which has
pushed him to the brink of eating a .38 shell for lunch.
Trout, whose work is published as filler in porno magazines of the type
not seen since the 50s, is a recurring character in Vonnegut's books as
a reflection of the author, so I've read. Finney says Vonnegut told him
to go out and create a character. What Finney delivers is the only
"sane" performance in a story that is otherwise about going insane. Of
course, Trout looks and rants like a paranoid homeless person as he
hitchhikes towards Midland City. This performance, grounded in reality,
is the one I walked away happy with. But it's been many years since I
avidly devoured Vonnegut, and my brain turned to mush long ago. I should
have liked Breakfast of Champions more, but I didn't.
It is strongly recommended that you read the book first.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Breakfast of Champions, he would
have paid...
Rent it. Trafalmador is never mentioned, but you get a glimpse of it at
the end of the flick, if I remember my books correctly. If not, it still
doesn't mean much to the overall scheme of things.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Big Kahuna, The (1999)
The Big Kahuna
Rated [R], 91 minutes
Starring Kevin Spacey, Danny DeVito and Peter Facinelli
Screenplay by Roger Rueff; based on his play
Directed by John Swanbeck
website: www.lionsgatefilms.com/thebigkahuna
A couple of things I've noted in other places about plays adapted to the
big screen, compiled here for the first time: They are "places" where
no-name actors can make a name for themselves if their performance is
great and if the film director can figure out how to make one set
interesting. They are opportunities for star-name actors to stretch
their acting chops with "pure" theater in which the odds are much
bigger. If the director can't make it interesting then the job of the
actors is magnified. Simply, if you walk into a theater thinking you'll
see, in this case, Kevin Spacey and Danny DeVito "on stage," and you
walk out thinking you've saved $65+ dollars from the cost of a Broadway
ticket, then they have failed. If you walk in to see Space and DeVito
perform and walk out having seen them transform into Larry Mann (Spacey)
and Phil Kooper (DeVito), then you've experience what would be called in
the theater, a "magic" night.
That didn't happen for the two critics (female) behind me, both of whom
admitted in their post screening talk that they didn't like Spacey's
movies, in general. Cranky admits to no such problem and can point with
great specificity to the point at which The Big Kahuna, essentially
three men in a hotel room, made that transformation from stars
performing a play to great acting performances on the screen. The set-up
.. . .
Mann is the salesman. Kooper the account manager. Both have been sent to
a convention in Wichita, Kansas with the intent of meeting, schmoozing
and signing up potential client Dick Fuller, President of a Company
which is the largest user of industrial lubricants in the Midwest. Third
man on the team, representing the research "brains" of the company is
Bob Walker (Peter Facinelli), a just-married, utterly devout Baptist who
has no idea of the kind of land he has wandered in to. The two veterans
snipe at each other like an old married couple and vie for influence
over the new kid. Both have their minds focussed on landing Fuller's
account as they schmooze a roomful of lesser freeloaders. When Fuller
doesn't show, both know that only the teetotaler Walker, who spent the
evening ineptly tending bar and talking about dogs and Jesus to some old
guy, will survive when the ax falls back at the main office.
Dogs and Jesus. A moment of revelation that hits you before it hits the
poor saps onscreen. Walker, with his priorities all in the wrong place,
essentially exits stage left to allow the veterans take full command of
the screen; characters that have been beaten and know they will never
rise higher in the corporate ranks talk grown-up talk about life, the
universe and everything. This third act alone is worth the ticket price
for it is here you sense all the power that you'd get from watching the
men live on stage.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Big Kahuna, he would have
paid...
When you're aware that you're watching a play, The Big Kahuna is a
better than average adaptation. When it hits the magic button, well,
that's what it is. Magic.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Forever Fever (1998)
Cranky CriticŽ Movie Reviews: That's The Way I Like It
Rated [PG-13] , 95 minutes
Starring Adrian Pang, Madeline Tan, Pierre Png and Anna Belle Francis
Written and Directed by Glen Goie
website: www.miramax.com
Try to imagine this: Bruce Lee as John Travolta in Saturday Night Fever.
While you furrow your brow in consternation and confusion, Cranky'll
describe That's The Way I Like It, which he adds to his list of required
viewing for filmmaker wannabees. It's not that That's The Way I Like It
is a drop everything must see flick. It's a perfectly average popcorn
flick, set in Singapore during the rage of disco, back in 1977. Watching
Caucasian culture/movie iconography dropped into a Chinese/Western mix
yields a couple of belly laughs of recognition, one big surprise, and an
attempt to toss the light comedy, "what is my place in all this?" kind
of story with some fierce mob-style brutality. Luckily, the budget is so
low, there are no big blood effects or shootings, just a beating or two.
But I'm getting ahead of myself.
Ah Hock (Adrian Pang) is just an average guy in a low paying dead end
job, stocking shelves in the local grocery store. He still lives with
his parents, and they lavish praise on his med student younger brother
Ah Beng, who has taken the "Western" name Leslie (Caleb Goh). For the
twenty-something Hock, there isn't much to do in Singapore, other than
hang out with his friends at the local bowling alley or movie house,
where Bruce Lee flicks run almost continually. Hock is such a Lee
devotee, that he can lip-synch and hip-synch (i.e. do the moves) of
every movie.
One day though, Fists of Fury is no more at the local cinema, having
been replaced by some disco monstrosity called Forever Fever, an obvious
knock off of Saturday Night Fever, right down to the white suit, music
and camera shots. As Fever's song hits "Staying Alive," "Jive Talking,"
"You Should Be Dancing" and "How Deep Is Your Love" pour off the screen,
something in Hock is stirred. He wants to be the disco king. He wants
the hair. He wants the clothes. He wants the moves. But, most important,
he wants the $5000 cash prize being given away by the local discotheque
to the best dance team in the land. The cash will more than pay for the
brand spanking new Triumph motorcycle sitting in the dealer's window
that he passes every day on his way to work.
And I betcha thought you had seen this before; that these internal
revelations would turn Hock "gay". Nope. Sorry.
Guided by his Guardian Angel (Dominic Pace as the John Travolta clone
who steps out of the screen to advise Hock) he enlists gal pal Mei
(Madeline Tan) to secretly take lessons with him. Mei is greatly
attracted to Hock, though he's ignorant of it and has his eye on fellow
student Julie (Anna Belle Francis). Julie's partner, Richard (Pierre
Png) is ego-personified, totally jealous and not above having his rival
beaten to a bloody pulp. There you have it, folks, enough story to fill
any movie. Friendships are strained. Rivalries explode, both on the
dance floor and in violence, and local family values are severely tested
(which is the surprise in the film that I wrote about above, but will
not spill).
Last year, Cranky blasted the disco flicks 54 and Last Days of Disco for
not spending the bucks on rights to the songs that best exemplified the
era. So, how does That's The Way I Like It manage all them Bee Gees
tunes, plus the title, and other disco staples such as "Instant Replay,"
"Rock The Boat" and non-disco smash "Kung-Fu Fighting"? They bought the
rights and produced imitations of the original hits. Just like K-Tel did
with their record collections back in the 70s, or teevee producers like
Glen Larson did on their shows in the 80s. It's just another lesson on
how low budget productions can get by. For those of you who aren't
filmmaker wannabees, the copies aren't so close to the bone that you
can't tell the difference, but the songs are strong enough that you
won't care.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to That's The Way I Like It, he would
have paid...
In one word, it's "cute". A perfectly adequate rental. Had we seen
anything like this before now, the rating would've been much lower. Than
again, watching Bruce Lee moves in a Travolta white suit is worth the
price of the rental.

Title
Review for Best Man, The (1999/I)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: The Best Man
Rated  [R], [116] minutes
Starring Taye Diggs, Nia Peeples
Written and Directed by Malcolm D. Lee
website: http://www.best-man.com
IN SHORT: A Rockin' African-American targeted date flick.
We begin with Harper Stewart (Taye Diggs), a novelist just months away
from the publication of "Unfinished Business," his first book. Based on
his friends from college, the writing is so steamy that Oprah Winfrey
wants to feature it in her book club. Not only does success beckon, so
does his beautiful girlfriend Robin (Sanaa Lathan), a caterer whose
business, too, is starting to take off. Three pending jobs is keeping
her from journeying from Chicago to New York, for the wedding of two of
Harper's friends. Truth of the matter is, they're his friends. Robin'll
just catch up at the wedding. Besides, she's getting just a bit
discouraged that her beau can't make the slightest move towards either
commitment or saying those three little words.
Those friends, quickly, are: the groom, Lance (Morris Chestnut), a NFL
running back (NY Giants?) who has used his fame to great advantage with
the ladies, if you know what I mean; his save it for the wedding night
bride Mia (Monica Calhoun); Jordan Armstrong (Nia Long), Harper's woulda
coulda shoulda but never did gal; career-phobic Quentin (Terrence
Howard), who plays a mean guitar; equally career-phobic Murch (Harold
Perrineau) who's staring down a six figure legal gig and his controlling
bitch of a girlfriend Shelby (Melissa DeSousa), whom everyone in this
group, save Murch, detests. With Robin away until the day of the
wedding, Jordan determines that she's going to nail Harper, one way or
the other.
The New York weekend means reunion for this crew. Thanks to a
prepublication copy of Harper's book obtained, and circulated among all
concerned, by teevee producer Jordan, old secrets come out in the open.
Each real person sees themselves in the book's fictional characters and
when the groom finally gets his turn, let's just say his eyes are opened
to the fact that his virginal bride may not be. A joyful weekend
escalates into something much more as the groom wants vengeance and each
of the other single men get to reevaluate their own relationships.
That doesn't give anything away as writer/director Malcolm D. Lee
fashions strong characters and the actors make you feel as if this group
had indeed been friends for years. Then again, the African-American
acting community isn't a very large one so they may actually be friends.
And, yes, I may be a middle aged white guy who ears can't follow the
vocal rhythms; I didn't catch half the lingo, but there's enough here
that when push came to shove and the film hit its edge of the seat
climax -- I know, for a comedy that's a bit of a stretch to imagine, but
that's what it was -- I was there, baby.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Best Man, he would have paid...
Much better than the average dateflick. The Best Man is not the kind of
African-American targeted movie that may not be accessible enough to
white audiences to cross over big time, but I'm an old fogey. The
kidlets who speak in rap rhythms may get this with no problem. With
dating couples all around me, and running commentary on the action from
all of 'em (there are advantages to sitting with "real" people), The
Best Man wasn't hard to follow. Just watching the crowd, as I've done at
other A-A starring flicks, left me with the impression that this is
bigger and better than the average flick targeted at them.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Price of Glory (2000)
Price of Glory may try to look like another kind of Rocky, but it's a
different kind of story -- as boxing movies never really are about
"pure" boxing. This is a father-son story hip deep in broken dreams,
miscommunication and sibling rivalry. At its center is Arturo Ortega
(Jimmy Smits), once upon a time screwed by a manager and pummeled into a
pulp by a better fighter than he. With his wife, Rita (Maria Del Mar),
he is raising three young sons. Two will fight. One will go to college,
or so Arturo plans. We all know what happens to the best laid plans . .
..
While the film moves through the Silver Gloves years quickly, the very
idea of putting single digit kidlets in the ring is brutal and
unappealing and downright unpleasant to sit through. But a boxer has got
to learn somewhere and this film, written by former NY Times sports
columnist Phil Berger, doesn't shy away from detailing the years of
training necessary to lead to the point where a man can fight to be a
champion. More important, these years establish the connections between
parent and child, brother and brother, that will mark their adult lives.
Sonny (Jon Seda) is the eldest son. He has the power but not the
ambition that his father wants to see. While he wants to be champion, he
also wants a wife and an outside life. In short, he wants some control,
which papa isn't ready to give. The middle son is Jimmy (Clifton Collins
Jr.), who's fast and fights furiously but doesn't think his way through
his bouts. He's incredibly jealous of the attention that Sonny gets --
and Sonny gets it because Arturo knows that Jimmy will never be a
champion. With two substantial paychecks in the bank, Arturo tells Jimmy
to hang it up. Problem is, Jimmy doesn't want to retire. The littlest
kidlet is Johnny (Ernesto Hernandez), "destined" for college but
possessing the spark that could make him the greatest champion of all.
The money men see the future in Johnny and while Arturo negotiates with
Nick Everson (Ron Perlman) across the years, an acrimony builds between
the two men that will lead to disaster, in the form of Everson's right
hand man Pepe (Paul Rodriguez).
All three sons will enter the ring. All three will fight in the same
weight class. While your brain, if it's anything like mine, waits for
the inevitable clash between brothers (whether it's in the ring or
outside of it), said inevitable comes about in a surprising manner. That
four strong character stories can play out without infringing on one
another is a good thing. This flick is a good sit.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Price of Glory, he would have
paid...
Price of Glory allows you the satisfaction of watching the "good guy"
win (well, duh) but doesn't provide the same elation found at the ends
of Rocky I and II. As a story of a family shredded by ambition and
misfortune, that rebuilds itself and survives despite all that happens,
it works very well.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000 by,
Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Drop Dead Gorgeous
Rated [PG-13], 95 minutes
Starring Kirstie Alley, Ellen Barkin, Kirsten Dunst, Denise Richards
Screenplay by Lona Williams
Directed by Michael Patrick Jann
website: http://www.ddgorgeous.com
We've seen more than an average number of satirical movies this year,
some of which have been extremely sharp-edged and witty, packed with the
kind of black humor that Cranky likes. Somewhere in the middle is Drop
Dead Gorgeous, uses the mockucumentary style made famous in the
groundbreaking This is Spinal Tap and takes aim at a fictional Teen
Beauty pageant. DDG is set in lovely Mount Rose, Minnesota, a
God-fearing town where the good girls see the Sarah Rose American Teen
Princess®© Pageant as a coming of age obligation and
potential ticket out of their dead-end town. The bad girls, for your
information -- pierced, drunk and pregnant social misfits all -- hang
out hang in school bathrooms to smoke their cigarettes and wait for
their water to break.
As the COPS-style documentary crew films the festivities, we meet ten
good girls of St. Rose, all of whom have reasons for being in the
pageant and all of whom know that the fix is in favoring Becky Leeman
(Denise Richards) the daughter of the richest family in town. Her mom
Gladys (Kirstie Ally) won the pageant seventeen years earlier and has
groomed Becky to inherit the tradition. Mom is also the organizer of the
preliminary contest, and has selected a panel of malleable judges. It's
pretty much a done deal. Problem is, there are two talented teens who
actually have a chance of winning on merit alone.
Amber Atkins (Kirsten Dunst) is the trailer trash girl who serves up
lunch in the high school and carries a second job applying makeup to the
corpses in the city morgue. Not only does she have talent with a brush,
the isolation of the dead zone provides a wonderful arena to practice
her tap dancing talent and dream that she can follow the same career
path as her idol, ex-beauty pageant contestant Diane Sawyer. As the
documentary crew filming this Fiftieth Anniversary pageant documents,
the prime contenders in the pageant and the male contender for Amber's
heart bite the dust in quick, accidental succession. Could this be some
kind of bleak conspiracy? Gee, you think?
Of the over-twenties in the cast, Kirstie Alley does a lovely
Fargo-style accent but Ellen Barkin, as Amber's mom, eclipses almost any
white trash femme role Cranky can recall and graphically demonstrates
how a can of beer can be both best friend and/or the bane of trailer
trash existence. Barkin is almost topped by Allison Janney as her
incredibly horny best friend. Yes, there are men in this flick. The
setting being Minnesota, there must be a town moron, and that role is
hysterically filled by MadTV's Will Sasso, who proves there is life
after Corky and the Juice Pigs.
Of the kidlets, Dunst is by far the star of the show. Her character
innocently battles all odds, and even with the blatant attacks against
her home, her potential boyfriend, her mom and her stage gear, she keeps
a fairly stiff upper lip. Just the kind of character you root for. When
the fix comes down, lets just say the ultimate resolution doesn't mark
the end of the movie. No, Amber doesn't do the All American thing and
grab a twenty aught seven and blow away the cheating bitch who stole
what was rightfully hers. The resolution is even bleaker, blacker and
funnier. Unfortunately, bring the tale to its logical conclusion means
it keeps going long after you're ready for it to be over.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Drop Dead Gorgeous,  he would have
paid...
pay per view range. I can't get enthusiastic enough to reco your
spending the big bucks for a theater ticket. It's territory that has
been mined on teevee before, and is probably where Drop Dead Gorgeous
should be seen even now.
 Parodying the guns and religion mentality (well that's how us Godless
city folk look at rural Minnesota -- Mary Tyler Moore lived in the big
sinful city, don'tcha know) Drop Dead Gorgeous delivers an adequate
satire whose writing is a lot sharper than its direction and production
values let on. Fact of the matter is that Spinal Tap did it first, did
it better, and there have been enough similar teevee movie tales of
dismal doings behind the main curtain that there isn't much new in the
way of parody of the event. The script by Lona Williams allows the
characters to slip in lots of sly gags, most of which strike out like a
Wendy Liebman punchline on top of another punchline. Would that there
were more.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.
